Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB878.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 416 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The power of eminent domain is hereby abolished in this Commonwealth.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an entity operating within this
Commonwealth, governmental in nature or otherwise, including but not limited to
cities, counties, municipalities, localities, commissions, departments, school districts,
mines, boards, railroad authorities, corporations, and public-private entities, shall not
exercise the right of eminent domain to force property owners to sell or lose their
property.
Section 2. KRS 3.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The United States is authorized to acquire, pursuant to [the provisions of ]this
section and[, as well as in pursuance to] KRS 148.111, [148.121, ]148.141, and
148.151, the lands, including the caves and caverns underlying the lands[same],
within the area [hereinafter ]referred to in this section, as well as any [lands
]contiguous or adjacent lands[thereto] which may hereafter be duly authorized for
acquisition for national park purposes, for the purpose of converting the
lands[same] into, and for the establishment and maintenance thereon of, a national
park as contemplated and provided for by the Act of Congress entitled "An Act to
provide for the establishment of the Mammoth Cave National Park in the State of
Kentucky, and for other purposes," approved May 25, 1926 (44 Stat. 635), as
amended[and any amendments thereto]. The lands, consisting of approximately
70,618 acres, are situated in the counties of Edmonson, Barren, and Hart, in
Kentucky. The general boundaries of the land[thereof] are set forth in the report of
the Southern Appalachian National Park Commission to the Secretary of the
Interior, dated[under the date of] April 8, 1926.
Page 1 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(2) The jurisdiction of Kentucky is ceded to the United States over, within, and under
all the territory [so ]acquired by the United States under this section. Kentucky
reserves the right to tax sales of gasoline and other motor conveyance fuels and oils
for use in motor conveyances, except to the extent that any[such] gasoline and other
fuels and oils are used by the United States and its agents in the administration,
protection, improvement, maintenance, development, and operation of the land, and
the right to tax persons, their franchises, and properties, on the land so acquired.
Persons residing on the land shall have the right to vote at all elections within the
respective counties of their residence the same as if the land had not been acquired
by the United States. Jurisdiction shall not vest in the United States until the United
States, through the Secretary of the Interior, notifies the Governor of Kentucky that
the United States assumes police jurisdiction over the land [so ]acquired under this
section.
Section 3. KRS 6.741 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A legislator, his or her spouse, or any business in which a legislator[he] or his or
her spouse own or control an interest of more than five percent (5%) shall not
intentionally lease or sell any facility, building, or other real property to a state
agency while the legislator is a member of the General Assembly.
(2) This section[provision] shall not:[ apply to sales or leases made under threat of or
pursuant to KRS Chapter 416, relating to eminent domain, and does not ]
(a) Impair any lawful contract existing on September 16, 1993; or[. This section
shall not ]
(b) Apply to a lease or sale for a nominal consideration if the lease or sale is
preapproved by the commission.
(3) Violation of this section is a Class D felony, and the court upon conviction may
void any sale or lease violating this section[provision].
Section 4. KRS 11A.040 is amended to read as follows:
Page 2 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(1) A public servant, in order to further his or her own economic interests, or those of
any other person, shall not knowingly disclose or use confidential information
acquired in the course of his or her official duties.
(2) A public servant shall not knowingly receive, directly or indirectly, any interest or
profit arising from the use or loan of public funds in his or her hands or to be raised
through any state agency.
(3) A public servant shall not knowingly act as a representative or agent for the
Commonwealth or any agency in the transaction of any business or regulatory
action with himself or herself, or with any business in which he or she or a member
of his or her family has any interest greater than five percent (5%) of the total value
thereof.
(4) A public servant shall not knowingly himself or herself or through any business in
which he or she owns or controls an interest of more than five percent (5%), or by
any other person for his or her use or benefit or on his or her account, undertake,
execute, hold, bid on, negotiate, or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract,
agreement, lease, sale, or purchase made, entered into, awarded, or granted by the
agency by which he or she is employed or which he or she supervises, subject to
[the provisions of ]KRS 45A.340. This subsection[provision] shall not apply to:
(a) [A contract, purchase, or good-faith negotiation made pursuant to KRS
Chapter 416 relating to eminent domain; or
(b) ]Agreements which may directly or indirectly involve public funds disbursed
through entitlement programs;[ or]
(b)[(c)] A public servant's spouse or child doing business with any state agency
other than the agency by which the public servant is employed or which he or
she supervises;[ or]
(c)[(d)] Purchases from a state agency that are available on the same terms to the
general public or that are made at public auction; or
Page 3 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(d)[(e)] Sales of craft items to a state park by interim state employees designated
as craftspersons under KRS 148.257.
(5) A public servant shall not knowingly accept compensation, other than that provided
by law for public servants, for performance of his or her official duties without the
prior approval of the commission.
(6) A former officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) shall not,
within one (1) year of termination of his or her employment, knowingly by himself
or herself or through any business in which he or she owns or controls an interest of
at least five percent (5%), or by any other person for his or her use or benefit or on
his or her account, undertake, execute, hold, bid on, negotiate, or enjoy, in whole or
in part, any contract, agreement, lease, sale, or purchase made, entered into,
awarded, or granted by the agency by which he or she was employed. This
subsection[provision] shall not apply to:
(a) [a contract, purchase, or good-faith negotiation made under KRS Chapter 416
relating to eminent domain or to ]Agreements that may directly or indirectly
involve public funds disbursed through entitlement programs;[. This provision
shall not apply to ]
(b) Purchases from a state agency that are available on the same terms to the
general public or that are made at public auction; or[. This provision shall not
apply to ]
(c) Former officers of the Department of Public Advocacy whose continued
representation of clients is necessary in order to prevent an adverse effect on
the client.
(7) (a) A present or former officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to
(g) shall not, within one (1) year following termination of his or her office or
employment, accept employment, compensation, or other economic benefit
from any person or business that contracts or does business with, or is
Page 4 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
regulated by, the state in matters in which he or she was directly involved
during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure.
(b) This subsection[provision] shall not prohibit:
1. An individual from returning to the same business, firm, occupation, or
profession in which he or she was involved prior to taking office or
beginning his or her term of employment, or for which he or she
received, prior to his or her state employment, a professional degree or
license, if[provided that,] for a period of one (1) year, he or she
personally refrains from working on any matter in which he or she was
directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her
tenure in state government;[. This subsection shall not prohibit ]
2. The performance of ministerial functions, including but not limited to
filing tax returns, filing applications for permits or licenses, or filing
incorporation papers; or[, nor shall it prohibit ]
3. The former officer or public servant from receiving public funds
disbursed through entitlement programs.
(8) A former public servant shall not act as a lobbyist or lobbyist's principal in matters
in which he or she was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his
or her tenure for a period of one (1) year after the latter of:
(a) The date of leaving office or termination of employment; or
(b) The date the term of office expires to which the public servant was elected.
(9) A former public servant shall not represent a person or business before a state
agency in a matter in which the former public servant was directly involved during
the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure, for a period of one (1) year after
the latter of:
(a) The date of leaving office or termination of employment; or
(b) The date the term of office expires to which the public servant was elected.
Page 5 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(10) (a) Without the approval of his or her appointing authority, a public servant shall
not accept outside employment from any person or business that does
business with or is regulated by the state agency for which the public servant
works or which he or she supervises, unless the outside employer's
relationship with the state agency is limited to the receipt of entitlement funds.
(b) The appointing authority shall review administrative regulations established
under KRS Chapter 11A when deciding whether to approve outside
employment for a public servant.
(c) The appointing authority shall not approve outside employment for a public
servant if the public servant is involved in decision-making or
recommendations concerning the person or business from which the public
servant seeks outside employment or compensation.
(d) The appointing authority, if applicable, shall file quarterly with the Executive
Branch Ethics Commission a list of all employees who have been approved
for outside employment along with the name of the outside employer of each.
(11) The prohibitions imposed by subsection (5) or (10) of this section shall not apply to
Professional Golfers' Association class A members who teach golf lessons and
receive a fee or lesson charge at golf courses owned and operated by the Kentucky
Department of Parks. Instruction provided by an employee of the Commonwealth
shall only be given while the employee is on his or her own personal time. The
commissioner of the Department of Parks shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish guidelines for the
process by which Professional Golfers' Association class A members are approved
to teach golf lessons at Kentucky Department of Parks-owned golf courses. The
exception granted by this subsection is in recognition of the benefits that will accrue
to the Kentucky Department of Parks due to increased participation at state-owned
golf courses.
Page 6 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(12) The prohibitions imposed by subsections (6) to (10) of this section shall not apply
to members of the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation.
(13) (a) This section shall not be construed to prohibit employees of the Department of
Agriculture who are not employed within the Kentucky Office of Agricultural
Policy established in KRS 246.030 from participating in, applying for, or
receiving funds, awards, or contracts administered by the Department of
Agriculture through the Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy.
(b) This subsection shall be retroactive to March 12, 2021.
Section 5. KRS 29A.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The sheriff or city police, as appropriate, shall be responsible for meals, housing,
and other incidental needs of grand jurors and petit jurors in Circuit Court and in
District Court when the jurors are kept overnight or otherwise sequestered when
ordered to do so by the judge of the court for which the jurors were summoned. The
expenses for these services shall be borne by the Finance and Administration
Cabinet and the officer shall be reimbursed in accordance with administrative
regulations issued by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in accordance
with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) The sheriff or city police, as appropriate, shall be responsible for the transportation
of jurors and other authorized persons to views of the scene or other locations
authorized by the court pursuant to KRS 29A.310. In criminal cases the expenses
for these services shall be borne by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the
sheriff shall be reimbursed in accordance with administrative regulations issued by
the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS
Chapter 13A. [Excepting views conducted under the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky, ]In civil cases, these expenses shall be paid by the party requesting the
viewing.
(3) The sheriff or city police, as appropriate, shall be responsible for providing any
Page 7 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
specialized security personnel, equipment, and services which the judge, with the
consent of the Chief Justice, shall deem necessary for the conduct of a trial in which
the judge believes that special security precautions are necessary or desirable. The
expenses for these services shall be borne by the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, and the officer shall be reimbursed in accordance with administrative
regulations issued by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in accordance
with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A. In such cases, the judge may also request the
Chief Justice to provide the services of the Department of Kentucky State Police to
ensure proper security precautions relating to the case.
Section 6. KRS 36.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The adjutant general shall:
(a) Represent the Governor in all military matters pertaining to the
Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(b) Be the executive head of the Department of Military Affairs and exercise all
functions vested by law in the department;
(c) Establish the internal organizational structure of the major organizations of
the department;
(d) Organize and supervise all programs, functions, and personnel assigned to the
department in accordance with all state and federal statutes and administrative
regulations;
(e) Be responsible to the Governor for the proper carrying into effect of all laws,
rules, and regulations of the United States and of this state affecting the militia
and other military organizations established by law;
(f) Perform the duties prescribed for him or her by laws of the United States and
regulations issued thereunder;
(g) Direct and supervise the chiefs of staff departments and supervise all troops
and all departments, arms, and branches of the Kentucky Army and Air
Page 8 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
National Guard;
(h) Supervise the preparation of all returns and reports of the Department of
Military Affairs;
(i) Keep a register of all the officers of the Kentucky National Guard, and make a
written report to the Governor for the annual period ending on June 30 of each
year of the operations and conditions of the Department of Military Affairs;
(j) Cause to be prepared and issued all necessary blank books, forms, and notices
required to carry into full effect matters assigned to the adjutant general under
[the provisions of ]KRS Chapters 36, 37, and 38;
(k) Direct and supervise the safekeeping and repairing of the ordnance, arms,
accoutrements[accouterments], equipment, and all other military property
belonging to the state or issued to it by the United States;
(l) Notify the Finance and Administration Cabinet of all military property of the
state which after inspection is found unsuitable for use of the cabinet;
(m) Keep an account of:
1. All expenses, including pay of officers and enlisted persons[men],
allowance to officers and organizations;
2. Any other moneys required to be disbursed by the adjutant
general[him] and through his or her office, including subsistence and
transportation of the National Guard; and
3. All military property of the United States;
(n) Issue and make requisitions for military property under the direction of the
Governor, but no military property shall be issued to persons or organizations
other than those belonging to the National Guard, except to such portion of
the Kentucky active militia as is called out by the Governor;
(o) Maintain as a part of his or her office a Bureau of War Records in which all
records pertaining to wars and relics shall be kept, and be custodian of all
Page 9 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
such records, relics, colors, standards, and battle flags now the property of the
state, or in its possession, or which the state may hereafter acquire;
(p) Organize units of the National Guard at places designated by the Governor
and have the members mustered into service under regulations prescribed by
the Governor;
(q) Issue all regulations, orders, and directives for the proper functioning and
utilization of the Department of Military Affairs and its divisions;
(r) Hire, discharge, and pay any personnel that the adjutant general deems
necessary to fulfill defense contracts without regard to KRS Chapter 18A; and
(s) Make contracts, acquire real and personal property by gift or[,] purchase, [or
by condemnation in the manner prescribed in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky, ]and do all things necessary to perform its duties under this section
and KRS 36.080.
(2) The adjutant general, or his or her designee, may enter into any federal contracts,
federal grants, and federal agreements with the United States of America, by and
through the Department of Defense, Department of the Army, Department of the
Air Force, National Guard Bureau, Federal Aviation Administration, United States
Department of Homeland Security, [and ]Federal Emergency Management Agency,
and any other division, department, or agency of the federal government, as may be
deemed necessary to carry out the general intent and purposes of the Department of
Military Affairs.
Section 7. KRS 36.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The facilities division shall provide adequate armories, buildings, and grounds for
the Kentucky Army and Air National Guard for its purposes of drill, instruction,
and administration and for the safekeeping of public property of the state and the
United States issued to or for the use of the Kentucky National Guard.
(2) The facilities division may, either alone or in cooperation with the United States
Page 10 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
government, counties, cities, private corporations, voluntary unincorporated
associations or individuals, construct, or acquire by purchase, contract, lease, gift,
or donation[donations, or by condemnation in the manner prescribed in the
Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky], armories, buildings, or grounds suitable for
drill, instruction, and administration and the safekeeping of public property, and
make additions and improvements in or to those[such] armories and facilities. The
division may, either alone or with the [like ]cooperation of others, provide heat,
light, water, telephone service, and other costs of operation and maintenance,
including insurance.
(3) The amounts to be spent for the construction, acquisition, maintenance, and rental
of armories shall be wholly within the discretion of the adjutant general.
Section 8. KRS 39A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In the event of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any of the
situations or events enumerated in KRS 39A.010, 39A.020, or 39A.030, the
Governor may declare[,] in writing[,] that a state of emergency exists. The
Governor shall have and may exercise the following emergency powers during the
period in which the state of emergency exists:
(a) To enforce all laws[,] and administrative regulations relating to disaster and
emergency response and to assume direct operational control of all disaster
and emergency response forces and activities in the Commonwealth;
(b) To require state agencies and to request local governments, local agencies,
and special districts to respond to the emergency or disaster in the manner
directed;
(c) [To seize, take, or condemn property, for the duration of the emergency, and
only for public use as defined in KRS 416.675, excluding firearms and
ammunition, components of firearms and ammunition, or a combination
thereof, for the protection of the public or at the request of the President, the
Page 11 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Armed Forces, or the Federal Emergency Management Agency of the United
States, including:
1. All means of transportation and communication;
2. All stocks of fuel of whatever nature;
3. Food, clothing, equipment, materials, medicines, and all supplies; and
4. Facilities, including buildings and plants, but excluding houses of worship,
except to the extent that such houses have become unsafe to a degree that
would justify condemnation in the absence of a state of emergency.
Compensation for property seized, taken, or condemned under this paragraph
shall be determined using the process in KRS 416.540 to 416.670 to
determine value;
(d) To sell, lend, give, or distribute any of the property under paragraph (c) of this
subsection among the inhabitants of the Commonwealth and to account to the
State Treasurer for any funds received for the property;
(e) To make compensation for the property seized, taken, or condemned under
paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(f) ]To exclude all nonessential, unauthorized, disruptive, or otherwise
uncooperative personnel from the scene of the emergency, and to command
those persons or groups assembled at the scene to disperse. A person who
refuses to leave an area in which a written order of evacuation has been issued
in accordance with a written declaration of emergency or a disaster may be
forcibly removed to a place of safety or shelter, or may, if this is resisted, be
arrested by a peace officer. Forcible removal or arrest shall not be exercised as
options until all reasonable efforts for voluntary compliance have been
exhausted;
(d)[(g)] To declare curfews and establish their limits;
(e)[(h)] To prohibit or limit the sale or consumption of goods, in the event of a
Page 12 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
shortage of goods, excluding firearms and ammunition, components of
firearms and ammunition, or a combination of those[thereof], or commodities
for the duration of the emergency;
(f)[(i)] To grant emergency authority to pharmacists pursuant to KRS
315.500[,] for the duration of the emergency;
(g)[(j)] To request any assistance from agencies of the United States as
necessary and appropriate to meet the needs of the people of the
Commonwealth;
(h)[(k)] Upon the recommendation of the Secretary of State, to declare by
executive order a different time or place for holding elections in an election
area for which a state of emergency has been declared for part or all of the
election area. The election shall be held within thirty-five (35) days from the
date of the suspended or delayed election. The executive order shall remain in
effect until the date of the suspended or delayed election regardless of the
time limitations in KRS 39A.090 and shall not be changed except by action of
the General Assembly. The State Board of Elections shall establish
procedures for election officials to follow. Any procedures established under
this paragraph shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of State and the
Governor by respective executive orders; and
(i)[(l)] Except as prohibited by this section or other law, to take action
necessary to execute those powers enumerated in paragraphs (a) to (h)[(k)] of
this subsection.
(2) Within thirty (30) days of a declared emergency[,] and every thirty (30) days
thereafter, the Governor shall report to the General Assembly[,] if in session, or to
the Legislative Research Commission if the General Assembly is not in session, on
a form provided by the Commission detailing:
(a) All expenditures relating to contracts issued during the emergency under KRS
Page 13 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
45A.085 or 45A.095, or under any provision for which a state agency does not
solicit bids or proposals for a contract; and
(b) All revenues received from the federal government in response to the declared
emergency, any expenditures or expenditure plan for the federal funds by
federal program, the state agency or program that was allocated the federal
funds, and any state fund expenditures required to match the federal funds.
(3) In the event of the occurrence or threatened or impending occurrence of any of the
situations or events contemplated by KRS 39A.010, 39A.020, or 39A.030, which in
the judgment of a local chief executive officer is of such severity or complexity as
to require the exercise of extraordinary emergency measures, the county
judge/executive of a county other than an urban-county government, or mayor of a
city or urban-county government, or chief executive of other local governments or
their designees as provided by ordinance of the affected county, city, or urban-
county may declare in writing that a state of emergency exists, and thereafter,
subject to any orders of the Governor, shall have and may exercise for the period as
the state of emergency exists or continues, the following emergency powers:
(a) To enforce all laws and administrative regulations relating to disaster and
emergency response and to direct all local disaster and emergency response
forces and operations in the affected county, city, urban-county, or charter
county;
(b) To exclude all nonessential, unauthorized, disruptive, or uncooperative
personnel from the scene of the emergency, and to command persons or
groups of persons at the scene to disperse. A person who refuses to leave an
area in which a written order of evacuation has been issued in accordance
with a written declaration of emergency or a disaster may be forcibly removed
to a place of safety or shelter, or may, if this is resisted, be arrested by a peace
officer. Forcible removal or arrest shall not be exercised as options until all
Page 14 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
reasonable efforts for voluntary compliance have been exhausted;
(c) To declare curfews and establish their limits;
(d) To order immediate purchase or rental of, contract for, or otherwise procure,
without regard to procurement codes or budget requirements, the goods and
services essential for protection of public health and safety or to maintain or
to restore essential public services; and
(e) To request emergency assistance from any local government or special district
and, through the Governor, to request emergency assistance from any state
agency and to initiate requests for federal assistance as are necessary for
protection of public health and safety or for continuation of essential public
services.
(4) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to allow any governmental entity to
impose additional restrictions on:
(a) The lawful possession, transfer, sale, transport, carrying, storage, display, or
use of firearms and ammunition or components of firearms and ammunition;
(b) The right of the people to exercise free speech, freedom of the press, to
petition their government for redress of injuries, or to peaceably assemble; or
(c) The right of the people to worship, worship in person, or to act or refuse to act
in a manner motivated by a sincerely held religious belief.
(5) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to allow any governmental entity to
impose restrictions on the right of the people to:
(a) Peaceably assemble; or
(b) Worship, worship in person, or to act or refuse to act in a manner motivated
by a sincerely held religious belief.
(6) (a) A governmental entity shall not prohibit or restrict a religious organization
from operating or engaging in religious services during a declared emergency
to the same or any greater extent than other organizations or businesses that
Page 15 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
provide essential services necessary and vital to the health and welfare of the
public are prohibited or restricted.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not prohibit the Governor from requiring
religious organizations to comply with neutral health, safety, or occupancy
requirements that are applicable to all organizations and businesses that
provide essential services. However, a[no] health, safety, or occupancy
requirement shall not[may] impose a substantial burden on a religious
organization or its services unless applying the burden to the religion or
religious service in the particular instance is essential to further a compelling
governmental interest and is the least restrictive means of furthering that
compelling governmental interest.
(c) A governmental entity shall not take any discriminatory action against a
religious organization.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Discriminatory action" includes any action taken by a governmental entity
wholly or partially on the basis that an[such] organization is religious,
operates or seeks to operate during a state of emergency, or engages in the
exercise of religion as protected under the First Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States to:
1. Adversely alter in any way the tax treatment of, cause any tax, penalty,
or payment to be assessed against, or deny, delay, or otherwise make
unavailable an exemption from taxation;
2. Disallow, deny, or otherwise make unavailable a deduction for state tax
purposes of any charitable contribution made to or by a religious
organization;
3. Impose, levy, or assess a monetary fine, fee, civil or criminal penalty,
damages award, or injunction; or
Page 16 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
4. Withhold, reduce, exclude, terminate, adversely alter the terms or
conditions of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny any:
a. State grant, contract, subcontract, cooperative agreement,
guarantee, loan, scholarship, or other similar benefit from or to a
religious organization;
b. Entitlement or benefit under a state benefit program from or to a
religious organization; or
c. License, certification, accreditation, recognition, or other similar
benefit, position, or status from or to any religious organization;
(b) "Governmental entity" means:
1. The Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions;
2. Any agency of the state described in KRS 12.020;
3. Any person acting under color of state law; and
4. Any private person suing under or attempting to enforce a law, rule, or
administrative regulation adopted by the state or any of its political
subdivisions;
(c) "Religious organization" means:
1. A house of worship, including churches, synagogues, shrines, mosques,
and temples;
2. A religious group, corporation, association, educational institution,
ministry, order, society, or similar entity, regardless of whether it is
integrated or affiliated with a church or other house of worship; or
3. Any officer, owner, employee, manager, religious leader, clergy, or
minister of an entity or organization described in this paragraph; and
(d) "Religious services" means a meeting, gathering, or assembly of two (2) or
more persons organized by a religious organization for the purpose of
worship, teaching, training, providing educational services, conducting
Page 17 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
religious rituals, or other activities that are deemed necessary by the religious
organization for the exercise of religion.
(8) A religious organization may assert a violation of subsection (4)(c), (5)(b), or (6) of
this section as a claim against a governmental entity in any judicial or
administrative proceeding or as a defense in any judicial or administrative
proceeding without regard to whether the proceeding is brought by or in the name
of the governmental entity, any private person, or any other party. Sovereign,
governmental, and qualified immunity are waived to the extent of liability created
under this section. An action asserting a violation of this section may be
commenced, and relief may be granted, without regard to whether the religious
organization commencing the action has sought or exhausted administrative
remedies.
(9) Remedies available to a religious organization under this section against a
governmental entity include:
(a) Declaratory relief;
(b) Injunctive relief to prevent or remedy a violation of this section or the effects
of that[such] violation;
(c) Compensatory damages for pecuniary and nonpecuniary losses;
(d) Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs; and
(e) Any other appropriate relief.
(10) Remedies available to a religious organization under this section against a person
not acting under color of state law shall be limited to declaratory and injunctive
relief.
(11) This section:
(a) Shall be construed in favor of a broad protection of free exercise of religion;
(b) Shall be in addition to the protections provided under state and federal laws
and constitutions;
Page 18 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) [. Nothing in this section ]Shall not be construed to:
1. Preempt or repeal any state law or local ordinance that is equally or
more protective of free exercise of religion; or
2. Narrow the meaning or application of any state law or local ordinance
protecting free exercise of religion; and
(d)[(c)] Applies to, and in cases of conflict, supersedes:
1. Each statute of the Commonwealth that infringes upon the free exercise
of religion protected by this section[,] unless a conflicting statute is
expressly made exempt from the application of this section; and
2. Any ordinance, rule, administrative regulation, order, opinion, decision,
practice, or other exercise of a governmental entity's authority that
infringes upon the free exercise of religion protected by this section.
(12) A religious organization shall bring an action to assert a claim under this section no
later than two (2) years from the date the person knew or should have known that a
discriminatory action or other violation of this section was taken against that
religious organization.
Section 9. KRS 39A.295 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Nothing in KRS 39A.100, 39A.110, 39A.120, 39A.130, or 39A.140, or any other
provision of ]This chapter[,] shall not authorize [a taking of property or ]the taking
of any action which is in violation of KRS 237.102 or 237.104.
(2) If a person is relocated to temporary housing before, during, or after a disaster or
emergency, he or she shall still possess the rights guaranteed by KRS 237.102 and
237.104.
Section 10. KRS 45A.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall serve as the central procurement and
contracting agency of the Commonwealth and shall:[.]
(a) [The cabinet shall ]Require all agencies to furnish an estimate of specific
Page 19 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
needs for supplies, materials, and equipment to be purchased by competitive
bidding for the purpose of permitting scheduling of purchasing in large
volume. The cabinet shall establish and enforce schedules for purchasing
supplies, materials, and equipment. [In addition, ]Prior to the beginning of
each fiscal year, all agencies shall submit to the Finance and Administration
Cabinet an estimate of all needs for supplies, materials, and equipment during
that year which will [have to ]be required through competitive bidding;[.]
(b) [The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall ]Have power, with the
approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, to
transfer between departments, to salvage, and to exchange, [and to condemn
]supplies, equipment, and real property; and[.]
(c) [The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall attempt in every practicable
way to ]Ensure that state agencies are fulfilling their business needs through
the application of the best value criteria.
(2) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall recommend regulations, rules, and
procedures and shall have supervision over all purchases by the various spending
agencies, except as otherwise provided by law, and, subject to the approval of the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to govern
purchasing by or for all these agencies. The cabinet shall publish a manual of
procedures which shall be incorporated by reference as an administrative regulation
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A. This manual shall be distributed to agencies and
shall be revised upon issuance of amendments to these procedures. A[No] purchase
or contract shall not be binding on the state or any state agency [thereof ]unless
approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or made under general
administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet.
(3) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase or otherwise acquire, or,
Page 20 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
with the approval of the secretary, may delegate and control the purchase and
acquisition of the combined requirements of all spending agencies of the state,
including[,] but not limited to[,] interests in real property, contractual services,
rentals of all types, supplies, materials, equipment, and services.
(4) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of
any interest in real property of the state which is not needed, or has become
unsuitable for public use, or would be more suitable to the public's interest if used
in another manner, as determined by the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet. The determination of the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall be set forth in an order and shall be reached only after
review of a written request by the agency desiring to dispose of the property. This
request shall describe the property and state the reasons why the agency believes
the property should be disposed. All instruments required by law to be recorded
which convey any interest in any real property so disposed of shall be executed and
signed by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and approved by
the Governor. Unless the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
deems it in the best interest of the state to proceed otherwise, all interests in real
property shall be sold either by invitation of sealed bids or by public auction. The
selling price of any interest in real property shall not be less than its[the] appraised
value [thereof ]as determined by the cabinet[,] or the Transportation Cabinet for the
requirements of that cabinet.
(5) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of all
personal property of the state that is not needed, [or ]has become unsuitable for
public use, or would be more suitable to the public's interest if used in another
manner, or, with the approval of the secretary, may delegate the sale, trade, or other
disposal of the personal property. In the event the authority is delegated, the method
for disposal shall be determined by the agency head, in accordance with
Page 21 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
administrative regulations promulgated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, and shall be set forth in a document
describing the property and stating the method of disposal and the reasons why the
agency believes the property should be disposed of. In the event the authority is not
delegated, requests to the Finance and Administration Cabinet to sell, trade, or
otherwise dispose of the property shall describe the property and state the reasons
why the agency believes the property should be disposed of. The method for
disposal shall be determined by the Division of Surplus Properties[,] and approved
by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or his or her designee.
(6) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall exercise general supervision and
control over all warehouses, storerooms, and stores and of all inventories of
supplies, services, and construction belonging to the Commonwealth. The cabinet
shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to require agencies to take and maintain inventories of plant property, buildings,
structures, other fixed assets, and equipment. The cabinet shall conduct periodic
physical audits of inventories.
(7) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall establish and maintain programs for
the development and use of purchasing specifications and for the inspection,
testing, and acceptance of supplies, services, and construction.
(8) [Nothing in ]This section shall not prevent the Finance and Administration Cabinet
from negotiating with vendors who maintain a General Services Administration
price agreement with the United States of America or any of its agencies[agency
thereof]. A[No] contract executed under this section[provision] shall not authorize a
price higher than is contained in the contract between the General Services
Administration and the vendor affected.
(9) Except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180, and subject to the
provisions of this code, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase or
Page 22 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
otherwise acquire all real property determined to be needed for state use, upon
approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as to the
determination of need and as to the action of purchase or other acquisition. The
amount paid for this real property shall not exceed the appraised value as
determined by the cabinet or the Transportation Cabinet [(]for the[such]
requirements of that cabinet[), or the value set by eminent domain procedure].
Subject to the provisions of this code, real property or any interest in real
property[therein] may be purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired from any officer
or employee of any agency of the state upon a finding by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, based upon a written application by the head of the agency
requesting the purchase, and approved by the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet and the Governor, that the employee has not either himself
or herself, or through any other person, influenced or attempted to influence either
the agency requesting the acquisition of the property or the Finance and
Administration Cabinet in connection with the[such] acquisition. Whenever such an
acquisition is consummated, the request and finding shall be recorded and kept by
the Secretary of State along with the other documents recorded pursuant to [the
provisions of ]KRS Chapter 56.
(10) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain records of all purchases and
sales made under its authority and shall make periodic summary reports of all
transactions to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the
Governor, and the General Assembly. The Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall also report trends in costs and prices, including savings realized through
improved practices, to the above authorities. The Finance and Administration
Cabinet shall also compile an annual report of state purchases by all spending
agencies in the state's statewide accounting and reporting system. The report format
shall include, but not be limited to, dollar amount, volume, type of purchase, and
Page 23 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
vendor.
(11) For capital construction projects, subject to the provisions of this code and KRS
45A.180, the procurement may be on whichever of the following alternative project
delivery methods, in the judgment of the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet after first considering the traditional design-bid-build
project delivery method, offers the best value to the taxpayer:
(a) A design-build basis; or
(b) A construction management-at-risk basis.
Proposals shall be reviewed by the engineering staff to assure quality and value, and
compliance with procurement procedures. All specifications shall be written to
promote competition. [Nothing in ]This section shall not prohibit the procurement
of phased bidding or construction manager-agency services.
(12) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have control and supervision over all
purchases of energy-consuming equipment, supplies, and related equipment
purchased or acquired by any agency of the state as provided in this code, and shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
designate the manner in which an energy-consuming item will be purchased so as to
promote energy conservation and acquisition of energy efficient products. Major
energy components shall be amortized on a seven (7) to ten (10) years' recovery
basis and shall take into consideration the projected cost of fuel. The Finance and
Administration Cabinet, in consultation with the Cabinet for Economic
Development, shall conduct a thorough economic feasibility analysis on any major
energy-using component of at least three million (3,000,000) BTU's per hour heat
input and shall issue a certificate of economic feasibility prior to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet's purchasing or retrofitting any such component that utilizes
any fuel other than coal. The economic feasibility analysis shall consist of life-cycle
cost comparisons of a component that would utilize coal and components[one(s)]
Page 24 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
that would utilize any fuel other than coal. For the analysis, the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall provide detailed estimates of equipment purchase
price, installation cost, annual operation and maintenance costs, and usage patterns
of energy-using components.
Section 11. KRS 56.463 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet shall have the power and duty to:
(1) [To ]Determine the comparative needs and demands of the various state agencies
for acquiring real estate and for building projects;
(2) [To ]Purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to be needed for
state use and upon the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet as to the determination of need and as to the action of purchase or other
acquisition, except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180. All [such
]acquisitions of real property or interests in real property under this
subsection[therein] shall be made in accordance with KRS 45A.045;
(3) [To ]Sell or otherwise dispose of all property, including any interest in real
property, of the state that is not needed or has become unsuitable for public use or
would be more suitable consistent with the public interest for some other use as
determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. All [such
]sales or other dispositions under this subsection[disposition] shall be made in
accordance with KRS 45A.045;
(4) (a) [To ]Control the use of any real property owned or otherwise held by the
Commonwealth, or any state agency, and to determine for what periods of
time and for what purposes any state agency may use the real property[same],
including the agency for whose use it was initially acquired or improved, and
to determine what appropriate uses shall be made of the[such] real property
during periods that the cabinet finds the property[same] is not required for the
purposes of any particular state agency. The cabinet shall allocate to the
Page 25 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission all space within
the New State Capitol Annex in the basement and on the first, second, third,
and fourth floors, excluding:
1. Mechanical areas, public entrances, vestibules, and restrooms; and
2. The following additional space, as allocated on January 1, 2023:
a. Areas in the basement occupied by the Kentucky State Police and
Facilities Security;
b. Areas in the basement operated as the snack bar and cafeteria, as
well as storage areas related to the operation of the snack bar and
cafeteria;
c. The area in the basement operated as a nurse's station;
d. The area in the basement used as an automated teller machine
(ATM);
e. The office space in the basement occupied by the Secretary of
State;
f. Utility spaces in the basement west wing and east wing
northernmost hallways occupied by janitorial, maintenance, and
mechanical staff;
g. The loading dock in the rear of the annex basement, along with the
office space immediately adjacent to the loading dock on the back
wall of the annex, provided that the General Assembly and the
Legislative Research Commission shall be given access to and use
of the loading dock and the receiving areas adjacent to the loading
dock; and
h. Office and studio space on the first floor currently occupied and
used for broadcasting purposes by Kentucky Educational
Television.
Page 26 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
All space assigned to the legislative branch and plans, uses, furnishings, and
equipment for the space[therefor] are subject to the specific approval of the
Legislative Research Commission;
(b) All additional space in the New State Capitol Annex[,] not specifically
allocated for use by the General Assembly and the Legislative Research
Commission in paragraph (a) of this subsection[,] shall be allocated for the
use of the legislative branch, with occupancy by the legislative branch to be
determined by the Legislative Research Commission[,] upon a vote of a
majority of the entire membership of the Legislative Research Commission;
(c) In order for the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission
to efficiently utilize the space provided by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the cabinet shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with
the Legislative Research Commission on or about February 1, 2024, and as
often as every two (2) years thereafter at the request of the Legislative
Research Commission, to establish tenancy terms, including but not limited to
building maintenance, repairs, renovations, and upgrades; facility security;
janitorial services; and applicable rental and utilities rates. The Legislative
Research Commission shall at any time, and upon at least sixty (60) days'
notice, be authorized to discontinue the cabinet's provision of janitorial
services for the New State Capitol Annex and to enter into a separate contract
for the provision of those services, with the applicable rental and utilities rates
to be proportionately reduced to reflect that separate contract, provided that
the Legislative Research Commission may also at any time, and upon at least
sixty (60) days' notice, elect to have the cabinet continue or reinstate the
provision of those janitorial services at the cabinet's expense; and
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, real property shall include the parking
areas adjacent to the New State Capitol and the New State Capitol Annex, and
Page 27 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
the cabinet shall allocate to the General Assembly and the Legislative
Research Commission all parking spaces within the Capitol campus parking
garage, all parking spaces in the east, south, and west parking lots of the New
State Capitol Annex, and all parking spaces in the west parking lot of the New
State Capitol, except for those spaces in the west parking lot of the New State
Capitol allocated, as of January 1, 2023, to the Supreme Court of Kentucky,
the Lieutenant Governor, the Attorney General, and the Secretary of State.
Any further allocation of any parking spaces allocated pursuant to this
paragraph shall be within the sole discretion of the Legislative Research
Commission or its designee;[ and]
(5)[(e)] [To ]Determine the housing and furnishings needs of the various state
agencies located in Frankfort and to establish and put into effect a permanent
program for housing them. Subject to subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this
section[paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection], the cabinet is also authorized and
directed to allocate office space and furnishings in existing public buildings located
in Frankfort, exclusive of the third and fourth floors of the New State Capitol and
the space in the New State Capitol Annex allocated to the legislative branch,
according to the needs of the various agencies. When necessary, the cabinet is
authorized to provide additional office space and furnishings in Frankfort under any
building program the cabinet deems most advisable and economical for the state.
The permanent housing program shall include provisions for housing the General
Assembly and its related agencies, including the Legislative Research Commission,
and its subcommittees, the executive offices, the Supreme Court and the clerk of the
Supreme Court, the Department of Law and the law library, in the New State
Capitol, provided the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission
shall have complete control and exclusive use of the third and fourth floors of the
New State Capitol and shall have exclusive use of the space in the New State
Page 28 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Capitol Annex allocated to them under subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this
section[paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection]. [If there be ]Any additional space
in the Capitol[, it] shall be assigned to agencies whose activities are most closely
related to the agencies directed to be located permanently in the Capitol;
(6)[(5)] [To acquire, by condemnation in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain
Act of Kentucky, any real estate necessary for use by the state or by any state
agency, when the cabinet is unable to agree with the owner thereof on a price for
such real estate;
(6) To ]Lease any real property[,] or any interest in [such ]real property[,] owned by the
state or any state agency [thereof, ]in accordance with KRS 45A.045;
(7) [To ]Provide for and adopt plans and specifications as may be necessary, to provide
adequate public notice for and receive bids for any expenditures proposed to be
made, to award contracts for the purpose authorized, to supervise construction and
make changes and revisions in plans and specifications or in construction as may
become necessary, and generally to do any thing [and all other things as may
become necessary ]or expedient in order to effectively fulfill and carry out the
purposes of this chapter, including the right to employ clerks, engineers,
statisticians, architects, or other persons required to be employed in order to fulfill
the functions of the Commonwealth relating to state property and buildings
[provided ]in KRS 56.450 to 56.550; and
(8) [To ]Adopt rules and promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A as may be necessary to govern the acquisition, control, and
disposition of the real property to which this section is applicable.
Section 12. KRS 58.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140], unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Governmental agency" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky as such acting
by or through any of its departments, instrumentalities, or agencies, any county
Page 29 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
or city, or its agencies or instrumentalities, including a regional wastewater
commission established under KRS 65.8901 to 65.8923, or any other political
subdivision of the Commonwealth; and
(2)[(1)] "Public project":
(a) Means any lands, buildings, or structures, works or facilities:
1.[(a)] Suitable for and intended for use as public property for public
purposes or suitable for and intended for use in the promotion of the
public health, public welfare, or the conservation of natural resources,
including medical office buildings contiguous to hospital facilities, and
shall also include the planning of any such lands, buildings, structures,
works, or facilities; or
2.[(b)] Suitable for and intended for use for the purpose of creating or
increasing the public recreational, cultural, and related business facilities
of a community, including [such structures as ]concert halls, museums,
stadiums, theaters, and other public facilities, together with related and
appurtenant parking garages, offices, and office buildings for rental, in
whole or in part, to private tenants, dwelling units and apartment
buildings for rental in whole or in part to private tenants, commercial
and retail businesses, stores or other establishments, and any [structure
or structures or] combination of those[the foregoing], or other structures
having as their primary purpose the creation, improvement,
revitalization, renewal, or modernization of a central business or
shopping community, and shall also include existing lands, buildings,
structures, works, and facilities, as well as improvements or additions to
those[any such] lands, buildings, structures, works, or facilities; and[.]
(b) Includes[(2) "Public project" as defined herein shall include] projects
intended for use as public property for public purposes by another
Page 30 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
governmental agency, including the United States government, other than the
governmental agency acquiring the land or constructing the building,
structure, or facility.
[(3) "Governmental agency" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky as such acting by
or through any department, instrumentality or agency thereof, or any county, city,
agency, or instrumentality, including a regional wastewater commission established
under KRS 65.8901 to 65.8923, or other political subdivision of the
Commonwealth.]
Section 13. KRS 58.020 is amended to read as follows:
A governmental agency acting separately or jointly with one (1) or more
governmental[of any such] agency, may acquire, construct, maintain, add to, and
improve any public project as defined in KRS 58.010, which public project may be
located within or without or partly within and partly without the territorial limits of
the[such] governmental agency or agencies, and for the purpose of defraying the cost
thereof may borrow money and issue negotiable revenue bonds. Before any department
or agency of the state government shall borrow money and issue bonds under KRS
58.010 to 58.130[58.140], the head of the department or agency shall file with the
Secretary of State a written order[,] approved by the Governor, the Attorney General, and
the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, setting forth the proposed public
project, the amount of the bonds to be issued, and the maximum rate of interest the bonds
are to bear. Any governmental agency other than agencies of the state government may
borrow money and issue revenue bonds under KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140] pursuant to
an order, resolution, or ordinance of its legislative or administrative body, which order,
resolution, or ordinance shall set forth the proposed public project, the amount of the
revenue bonds to be issued, and the maximum rate of interest. In every instance the order,
resolution, or ordinance shall provide that the public project is being undertaken under
[the provisions of ]KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140].
Page 31 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Section 14. KRS 58.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The bonds may be issued to bear interest at the rate or rates or method of
determining rates, payable at least annually, and shall be executed in a[such]
manner, and be payable at [such ]times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date
of issuance[thereof] and at a[such] place or places as the governmental agency
determines.
(2) The bonds may provide that they or any of them may be called for redemption prior
to maturity, on any date not earlier than one (1) year from the date of issuance of
the bonds, under conditions fixed by the governmental agency before issuing the
bonds.
(3) Any governmental agency is authorized to rent, [or ]lease , or establish a contract
regarding a[such] public project or any portion of the project[thereof] to or
[contract concerning same ]with any persons, partnerships, associations, or
corporations either public or private, profit or nonprofit. Notwithstanding [any of
the other provisions of ]KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140] or any other laws, any [such
]renting, leasing, or contracting under this subsection may be accomplished
without the necessity of awarding the[such] lease or contract by advertisement or
competitive bidding if[, provided] the governmental agency [so ]leasing or
contracting regarding the[such] project or any portion of the project[thereof or
contracting concerning same] first makes a legislative determination that it is in the
best interest of the[such] governmental agency to enter into the[such] lease or
contract without the necessity for [such ]advertisement or competitive bidding; and
the[such] lease may provide that the lessee [therein ]is permitted or obligated to
sublease the project or any portion of the project[thereof] for the purpose of
accomplishing the creation, improvement, revitalization, renewal, or modernization
of a central business or shopping community.
(4) A governmental agency is empowered to accept donations or gifts to the public
Page 32 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
project from any source and to accept appropriations and grants to the public
project from the federal government or its agencies and appropriations from the
state or any county, city, or other political subdivision and, at the option of the
governmental agency, to pledge the[such] donations, gifts, or appropriations to the
payment of revenue bonds issued to finance the cost of a public project.
Section 15. KRS 58.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Bonds issued pursuant to KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140] shall be negotiable and
shall not be subject to taxation.
(2) If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons
ceases to be an officer before delivery of the bonds, the officer's signature or
countersignature shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the officer had
remained in office until delivery.
(3) The bonds shall be sold in a manner and upon the terms as the governmental agency
determines and as provided in KRS 424.360. Any contract for the acquisition of a
public project may provide that payment shall be made in bonds.
(4) The bonds shall be payable solely from the revenue derived from the public project
and shall not constitute an indebtedness of the state, county, city, or political
subdivision within the meaning of the Constitution.
(5) It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that the bond has been issued
under [the provisions of ]KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140] and that the bond does not
constitute an indebtedness of the governmental agency within the meaning of the
Constitution.
Section 16. KRS 58.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If there is any default in the payment of principal or interest of any bond, any court
having jurisdiction of the action may appoint a receiver to administer the public
project on behalf of the governmental agency, with power to charge and collect
rents, royalties, fees, rates, and charges and to receive any other available revenue
Page 33 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
sufficient to provide for the payment of any bonds or obligations outstanding
against the public project, and for the payment of operating expenses, and to apply
the income and revenue in conformity with KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140] and the
order, resolution, or ordinance referred to in KRS 58.020.
(2) Notwithstanding [any of the other provisions of ]KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140],
inclusive, it may be provided in the proceedings authorizing bonds issued for the
purpose of financing a project under subsection (2)(a)2. of KRS 58.010[(1)(b)], as
amended, that the governmental agency, in connection with the issuance of its
bonds, execute a mortgage deed of trust in favor of a trustee, on the project acquired
or constructed through the application of the proceeds of the bonds, providing that
in the event of default by the agency in the payment of interest or principal of its
bonds or in the event of default of any other covenant contained in the[such]
mortgage deed of trust the trustee, on behalf of the bondholders, may institute and
carry through foreclosure proceedings, with the property secured by the mortgage
deed of trust put up for sale on foreclosure proceedings, the proceeds of the[such]
sale to be used for the benefit of the bondholders. In connection with the[such] plan
of financing, [such ]provisions may be inserted in the bonds themselves and in the
mortgage deed of trust as may be necessary to protect the bondholders and in order
to make the[such] bonds salable with the lowest net interest cost to the agency. If
the agency declares its intent by ordinance or resolution to follow the provisions of
this section, and in doing so determines it cannot comply with any provision of
KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140], as that[such] provision is inconsistent with the
provisions of this section, the agency is not required to comply with the inconsistent
provision of KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140].
Section 17. KRS 58.100 is amended to read as follows:
The governmental agency may issue new bonds to provide funds for the payment of any
outstanding bonds, in accordance with the procedure prescribed by KRS 58.010 to
Page 34 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
58.130[58.140]. The new bonds shall be secured to the same extent and shall have the
same source of payment as the bonds refunded. Furthermore, the maturity schedule of the
new bonds shall not extend beyond the remaining life of the original bonds unless the
original bonds were issued by a county, urban-county, city, or an agency or
instrumentality of a county, urban-county, or city.
Section 18. KRS 58.120 is amended to read as follows:
Any governmental agency acquiring any public project pursuant to [the provisions of
]KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140] may, at the time of issuing the bonds for the[such]
acquisition, provide for additional bonds for extensions and permanent improvements to
be placed in escrow and to be negotiated [from time to time ]as proceeds for that purpose
may be necessary. Bonds placed in escrow shall, when negotiated, have equal standing
with bonds of the same issue.
Section 19. KRS 58.130 is amended to read as follows:
Any governmental agency may use, for the purpose of acquiring, constructing,
maintaining, extending, or improving a public project, or for the payment of interest or
principal on any revenue bonds issued by the agency pursuant to KRS 58.010 to
58.130[58.140], any funds or tax revenues available for general purposes of the agency
and not required by law to be devoted to some other purpose.
Section 20. KRS 58.605 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the reporting and approval requirements in KRS 45A.352, 45A.353, and
58.610, any local public agency may issue energy conservation revenue bonds to
pay for the cost of energy conservation measures under guaranteed energy savings
contracts for the purpose of reducing the cost of energy to buildings owned or
operated by the local public agency by making energy-saving improvements to
these buildings.
(2) A local public agency, or an agency acting on its behalf, may issue energy
conservation revenue bonds to finance the energy conservation measures under
Page 35 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
guaranteed energy savings contracts, with the following limitations:
(a) Any energy conservation measure, financed through bonds, shall comply with
[the provisions set forth in ]KRS 45A.345, 45A.352, and 45A.353;
(b) The term of the bonds shall run coterminous with the term of guaranteed
energy savings contract;
(c) A local public agency shall not enter into a guaranteed energy savings
contract where the total cost of the energy conservation measures exceeds the
cost of the energy savings plus the operational costs plus the capital cost
avoidance that is estimated for the term of the guaranteed energy savings
contract commencing from the date of the energy conservation measure's
installation; and
(d) The use of capital cost avoidance shall be subject to the following restrictions:
1. The amount expended shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the project
cost; and
2. Capital cost avoidance shall be restricted to payment for permanent
equipment replacement as follows:
a. Storm windows or doors, multiglazed windows or doors,
additional glazing, and reduction in glass area;
b. Replacement of heating, ventilating, or air conditioning major
components or systems;
c. New lighting fixtures where required to achieve Illuminating
Engineering Society of North America (IES) standards, provided
the existing light fixtures shall have been determined to be
obsolete and incapable of achieving IES standards; and
d. Life safety system replacements or upgrades which shall have
been determined to be necessary to conform with existing state
and local codes and standards.
Page 36 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(3) Energy conservation revenue bonds shall be issued in accordance with [the
provisions of ]KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140] and shall be sold at a competitive sale
preceded by adequate public notice and shall bear interest at an interest rate or rates
determined by the local public agency at the time of the sale.
Section 21. KRS 61.878 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following public records are excluded from the application of KRS 61.870 to
61.884 and shall be subject to inspection only upon order of a court of competent
jurisdiction, except that a[no] court shall not authorize the inspection by any party
of any materials pertaining to civil litigation beyond that which is provided by the
Rules of Civil Procedure governing pretrial discovery:
(a) Public records containing information of a personal nature where [the ]public
disclosure [thereof ]would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy;
(b) Records confidentially disclosed to an agency and compiled and maintained
for scientific research, unless[. This exemption shall not, however, apply to
records] the disclosure or publication [of which ]is directed by another statute;
(c) 1. Records confidentially disclosed to an agency or required by an agency
to be disclosed to it, generally recognized as confidential or proprietary,
which if openly disclosed would permit an unfair commercial advantage
to competitors of the entity that disclosed the records; or
2. Records confidentially disclosed to an agency or required by an agency
to be disclosed to it, generally recognized as confidential or proprietary,
which are compiled and maintained:
a. In conjunction with an application for or the administration of a
loan or grant;
b. In conjunction with an application for or the administration of
assessments, incentives, inducements, and tax credits as described
Page 37 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
in KRS Chapter 154;
c. In conjunction with the regulation of commercial enterprise,
including mineral exploration records, unpatented, secret
commercially valuable plans, appliances, formulae, or processes,
which are used for the making, preparing, compounding, treating,
or processing of articles or materials which are trade commodities
obtained from a person; or
d. For the grant or review of a license to do business.
3. The exemptions [provided for ]in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
paragraph shall not apply to records the disclosure or publication of
which is directed by another statute;
(d) Public records pertaining to a prospective location of a business or industry
where no previous public disclosure has been made of the business' or
industry's interest in locating in, relocating within, or expanding within the
Commonwealth. This exemption shall not include those records pertaining to
application to agencies for permits or licenses necessary to do business or to
expand business operations within the state, except as provided in paragraph
(c) of this subsection;
(e) Public records [which are ]developed by an agency in conjunction with the
regulation or supervision of financial institutions, including but not limited to
banks, savings and loan associations, and credit unions, which disclose the
agency's internal examining or audit criteria and related analytical methods;
(f) The contents of real estate appraisals, engineering or feasibility estimates, and
evaluations made by or for a public agency relative to acquisition of property,
until [such time as ]all of the property has been acquired[. The law of eminent
domain shall not be affected by this provision];
(g) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a
Page 38 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
licensing examination, examination for employment, or academic
examination before the exam is given or if it is to be given again;
(h) Records of law enforcement agencies or agencies involved in administrative
adjudication that were compiled in the process of detecting and investigating
statutory or regulatory violations if the disclosure of the information could
pose an articulable risk of harm to the agency or its investigation by revealing
the identity of informants or witnesses not otherwise known or by premature
release of information to be used in a prospective law enforcement action or
administrative adjudication. Unless exempted by other provisions of KRS
61.870 to 61.884, public records exempted under this paragraph[provision]
shall be open after enforcement action is completed or a decision is made to
take no action; however, records or information compiled and maintained by
county attorneys or Commonwealth's attorneys pertaining to criminal
investigations or criminal litigation shall be exempted from [the provisions of
]KRS 61.870 to 61.884 and shall remain exempted after enforcement action,
including litigation, is completed or a decision is made to take no action. The
exemptions in[provided by] this subsection shall not be used by the custodian
of the records to delay or impede the exercise of rights granted by KRS
61.870 to 61.884;
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, correspondence with private individuals, other than
correspondence [which is ]intended to give notice of final action of a public
agency;
(j) Preliminary recommendations[,] and preliminary memoranda in which
opinions are expressed or policies formulated or recommended;
(k) All public records or information the disclosure of which is prohibited by
federal law or regulation or state law;
(l) Public records or information the disclosure of which is prohibited or
Page 39 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
restricted or otherwise made confidential by enactment of the General
Assembly, including any information acquired by the Department of Revenue
in tax administration that is prohibited from divulgence or disclosure under
KRS 131.190;
(m) 1. Public records the disclosure of which would have a reasonable
likelihood of threatening the public safety by exposing a vulnerability in
preventing, protecting against, mitigating, or responding to a terrorist act
and limited to:
a. Criticality lists resulting from consequence assessments;
b. Vulnerability assessments;
c. Antiterrorism protective measures and plans;
d. Counterterrorism measures and plans;
e. Security and response needs assessments;
f. Infrastructure records that expose a vulnerability referred to in this
subparagraph through the disclosure of the location, configuration,
or security of critical systems, including public utility critical
systems. These critical systems shall include but not be limited to
information technology, communication, electrical, fire
suppression, ventilation, water, wastewater, sewage, and gas
systems;
g. The following records when their disclosure will expose a
vulnerability referred to in this subparagraph: detailed drawings,
schematics, maps, or specifications of structural elements, floor
plans, and operating, utility, or security systems of any building or
facility owned, occupied, leased, or maintained by a public
agency; and
h. Records when their disclosure will expose a vulnerability referred
Page 40 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
to in this subparagraph and that describe the exact physical
location of hazardous chemical, radiological, or biological
materials.
2. As used in this paragraph, "terrorist act" means a criminal act intended
to:
a. Intimidate or coerce a public agency or all or part of the civilian
population;
b. Disrupt a system identified in subparagraph 1.f. of this paragraph;
or
c. Cause massive destruction to a building or facility owned,
occupied, leased, or maintained by a public agency.
3. On the same day that a public agency denies a request to inspect a public
record for a reason identified in this paragraph, that public agency shall
forward a copy of the written denial of the request, referred to in KRS
61.880(1), to the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland
Security and the Attorney General.
4. [Nothing in ]This paragraph shall not affect the obligations of a public
agency with respect to disclosure and availability of public records
under state environmental, health, and safety programs.
5. The exemption established in this paragraph shall not apply when a
member of the Kentucky General Assembly seeks to inspect a public
record identified in this paragraph under the Open Records Law;
(n) Public or private records, including books, papers, maps, photographs, cards,
tapes, discs, diskettes, recordings, software, or other documentation regardless
of physical form or characteristics, having historic, literary, artistic, or
commemorative value accepted by the archivist of a public university,
museum, or government depository from a donor or depositor other than a
Page 41 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
public agency. This exemption shall apply to the extent that nondisclosure is
requested in writing by the donor or depositor of the[such] records, but shall
not apply to records the disclosure or publication of which is mandated by
another statute or by federal law;
(o) Records of a procurement process under KRS Chapter 45A or 56. This
exemption shall not apply after:
1. A contract is awarded; or
2. The procurement process is canceled without award of a contract and
there is a determination that the contract will not be resolicited;
(p) Client and case files maintained by the Department of Public Advocacy or any
person or entity contracting with the Department of Public Advocacy for the
provision of legal representation under KRS Chapter 31;
(q) Except as provided in KRS 61.168, photographs or videos that depict the
death, killing, rape, or sexual assault of a person. However, such photographs
or videos shall be made available by the public agency to the requesting party
for viewing on the premises of the public agency, or a mutually agreed upon
location, at the request of:[;]
1. a. Any victim depicted in the photographs or videos, his or her
immediate family, or legal representative;
b. Any involved insurance company or its representative; or
c. The legal representative of any involved party;
2. Any state agency or political subdivision investigating official
misconduct; or
3. A legal representative for a person under investigation for, charged with,
pled guilty to, or found guilty of a crime related to the underlying
incident. The person under investigation for, charged with, pled guilty
to, or found guilty of a crime related to the underlying incident or their
Page 42 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
immediate family shall not be permitted to have access to the
photographs or videos;
(r) Records confidentially maintained by a law enforcement agency in
accordance with a wellness program, including an early intervention system,
as described in KRS 15.409; and
(s) Communications of a purely personal nature unrelated to any governmental
function.
(2) An[No] exemption in this section shall not be construed to prohibit disclosure of
statistical information not descriptive of any readily identifiable person.
(3) An[No] exemption in this section shall not be construed to deny, abridge, or impede
the right of a public agency employee, including a university employee[employees],
an applicant for employment, or an eligible on a register to inspect and to copy any
record including preliminary and other supporting documentation that relates to him
or her. The records shall include but not be limited to work plans, job performance,
demotions, evaluations, promotions, compensation, classification, reallocation,
transfers, lay-offs, disciplinary actions, examination scores, and preliminary and
other supporting documentation. A public agency employee, including a university
employee[employees], applicant, or eligible shall not have the right to inspect or to
copy any examination or any documents relating to ongoing criminal or
administrative investigations by an agency.
(4) If any public record contains material [which is ]not excepted under this section, the
public agency shall separate the excepted and make the nonexcepted material
available for examination.
(5) [The provisions of ]This section shall not[in no] way prohibit or limit the exchange
of public records or the sharing of information between public agencies when the
exchange is serving a legitimate governmental need or is necessary in the
performance of a legitimate government function.
Page 43 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(6) When material is made available pursuant to a request under subsection (1)(q) of
this section, the public agency shall not be required to make a copy of the recording
except as provided in KRS 61.169, and the requesting parties shall not be limited in
the number of times they may view the material.
Section 22. KRS 65.112 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [The provisions of ]Any other law, rule, or regulation notwithstanding, if any city,
county, public body corporate or politic, or special district or subdistrict furnishes
or proposes to furnish sewage treatment utility services to customers of another
sewage treatment utility by means of all or any part of the installations owned or
paid for by that other sewage treatment utility, then the city, county, public body,
district, or subdistrict taking over or proposing to take over the customers shall pay
just compensation for these installations prior to the time the customers are taken
over.[ If an agreement for compensation is not reached, then just compensation for
the installations shall be payable by the city, county, public body, district, or
subdistrict after condemnation as provided for in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky.]
(2) [There is hereby granted to any city, county, public body corporate or politic, or
special district or subdistrict the power of eminent domain with respect to sewage
treatment plants, facilities, and installations owned by sewage treatment utilities.
This power of eminent domain shall be exercisable in the manner prescribed by the
Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.
(3) ]Any city, county, public body corporate or politic, or special district or subdistrict
shall be entitled to surcharge customers so as to recover the amount of
compensation paid for installations acquired under this section by agreement[ or
condemnation].
Section 23. KRS 65.206 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Pursuant to KRS 65.205 to 65.209, the governing body of a local government
Page 44 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
may establish a program to advance the conservation and efficient use of
energy and water resources within its jurisdiction, which program is hereby
declared to be a valid exercise of the powers of local government and is in the
best interest of the people of the Commonwealth, by allowing for energy
projects to be financed by assessments imposed upon the real property being
improved through the energy project.
(b) [Nothing in ]KRS 65.205 to 65.209 shall not be interpreted to [:
(a) Expand the powers of eminent domain for a local government, state agency,
or private entity or to allow a local government, state agency, or private entity
to use the powers of eminent domain under this program; or
(b) ]disregard or allow contravention of any net metering ordinance or policy, any
generator interconnection ordinance or policy, or any rate ordinance duly
adopted by the governing body.
(2) (a) To establish a program, the governing body of a local government shall adopt
a resolution or ordinance providing the terms and conditions of the program,
including but not limited to:
1. A statement that the local government intends to utilize assessments on
relevant real property to support private sector energy projects;
2. The designation of an EPAD[,] and a description of its[the] boundaries[
thereof]; and
3. A procedure for the owners of record of real property located within an
EPAD to petition the local government for participation in the program.
(b) Once a program is established, the governing body of a local government may
amend the terms and conditions of the program by resolution or ordinance;
except that no amendment shall be adopted to retroactively change the
conditions under which an existing assessment was imposed, unless the owner
of record of the affected real property consents to the amendment in writing.
Page 45 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) A local government may:
1. Hire program staff[,] or contract with a third-party entity to administer a
program;
2. Impose fees on participating property owners to offset the costs of
administering the program, including assessment and collection
functions of various county offices; except that these fees shall not
exceed the cost of services performed; and
3. Engage financing for the purpose of administering the program from
financial institutions with a physical presence in Kentucky whose
deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
(d) Any combination of local governments may agree to jointly implement or
administer a program.
(3) (a) The geographic area designated by the governing body of a local government
as the EPAD:
1. May include the entire local government or any portion of the local
government[thereof]; and
2. Shall be wholly within the boundaries of the local government.
(b) A local government may designate more than one (1) separate EPAD within
its boundaries.
(4) An authorized official of a local government that has established a program may
approve a request from the owner of record of real property located within an
EPAD to impose an assessment upon the property, which shall be used to repay the
owner's financing of an energy project on that property and the costs of any
upgrades to the electrical or gas distribution system connected to that property
necessary to accommodate the energy improvement. The upgrade costs shall be
paid to the owner of the electrical distribution system. The financing may be
provided by a third party or, if authorized by the local government, by any local
Page 46 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
government.
(5) Each energy project approved for participation in the program shall include a
review of the property's baseline energy or water usage conditions and the energy or
water savings projected to be achieved as a result of the energy project.
(6) A program may authorize a participating property owner to:
(a) Directly purchase; or
(b) Acquire by contract, through a lease, power purchase agreement, or other
service contract;
the equipment and materials necessary for the installation or modification of an
energy improvement.
(7) In addition to the authority provided in the Kentucky Revised Statutes for local
governments to levy special assessments with the same lien status as a property tax,
the governing body of a local government that establishes a program pursuant to
this section may exercise powers granted under KRS 65.205 to 65.209.
Section 24. KRS 65.355 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any local government, the county or independent school district within the county,
and the Commonwealth of Kentucky may enter into an interlocal cooperation
agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 for the purpose of establishing a land
bank authority pursuant to KRS 65.350 to 65.375.
(2) The authority shall be a public body corporate and politic with the power to sue and
be sued, issue deeds in its name, and any other powers necessary and convenient to
carry out these powers or that may be granted to the authority by the parties.
(3) The authority shall be established to acquire the tax delinquent properties of the
parties[, properties that have become blighted or deteriorated as defined by KRS
99.705] and properties that have local government liens filed against them[,] to
facilitate the public purpose of returning property that is in a non-revenue
generating, non-tax producing status to effective utilization, including but not
Page 47 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
limited to providing housing, new industry, and jobs for the citizens of the county.
The authority shall have the powers provided in KRS 65.370 and 65.375 and in the
interlocal cooperation agreement.
Section 25. KRS 65.430 is amended to read as follows:
To carry out the purposes of KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460], local legislative bodies may
acquire by purchase, gift, lease, bequest, or otherwise title to or any interests or rights in
real property that will provide a means for the preservation or provision of permanent
open space land.
Section 26. KRS 65.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Local legislative bodies shall have all the powers necessary to carry out the
purposes and provisions of KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460], including the following
powers in addition to others granted by KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460]:
(a) To borrow funds and make expenditures necessary to carry out the purposes
of KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460];
(b) To advance or accept advances of public funds;
(c) To apply for, accept, and utilize grants and any other assistance from the
federal government and any other public or private sources; to give such
security as may be required and to enter and carry out contracts or agreements
in connection with the assistance; and to include in any contract for assistance
from the federal government any[such] conditions imposed pursuant to
federal laws as the local legislative body may deem reasonable and
appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of KRS 65.410
to 65.450[65.460];
(d) To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary to the
exercise of its powers under KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460];
(e) In connection with the real property acquired for the purposes of KRS 65.410
to 65.450[65.460], to provide or to arrange or contract for the provision,
Page 48 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
construction, maintenance, operation, or repair by any person or agency,
public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities,
or other facilities or structures that may be necessary to the provision,
preservation, maintenance, and management of the property as open space
land;
(f) To insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or
operations of the public body against any risks or hazards, including the
power to pay premiums on the insurance;
(g) To demolish or dispose of any structures or facilities which may be
detrimental to or inconsistent with the use of real property as open space land;
and
(h) To exercise any or all of its functions and powers under KRS 65.410 to
65.450[65.460] jointly or cooperatively with one or more public bodies of this
state, and to enter into agreements for joint or cooperative action.
(2) For the purposes of KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460] the local legislative bodies may:
(a) Appropriate funds;
(b) Issue and sell their revenue bonds and general obligation bonds in the manner
and within the limitations prescribed by the applicable laws of the
Commonwealth; and
(c) Exercise their powers under KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460] through a board
or commission, or through such office or officers as the local legislative
bodies by resolution determine.
Section 27. KRS 65.450 is amended to read as follows:
Where an interest in real property less than the fee is held by the local legislative body for
the purposes of KRS 65.410 to 65.450[65.460], assessments made on the property for
taxation shall reflect any change in the market value of the property which may result
from the interest held by the local legislative body. The value of the interest held by the
Page 49 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
local legislative body shall be exempt from property taxation to the same extent as other
property owned by the local legislative body.
Section 28. KRS 65.520 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any governmental unit by act of its legislative body, or any two (2) or more
governmental units acting jointly by acts of their legislative bodies, and with the
approval of the Transportation Cabinet, Office of the Secretary, may establish a
developmental riverport authority to be composed of six (6) members.
(2) The authority shall be a body politic and corporate with the usual corporate
attributes, and in its corporate name may sue and be sued, contract and be
contracted with, and do all things reasonable or necessary to effectively carry out
the powers and duties prescribed by KRS 65.510 to 65.650. The authority may
exercise all powers granted to governmental agencies by KRS 58.010 to
58.130[58.140]. The authority may exercise all powers, consistent with its powers
and duties stated in this chapter, granted by KRS 273.171 to corporations governed
by KRS 273.161 to 273.390.
(3) The responsibility for riverports shall be established within the Transportation
Cabinet to provide oversight on development activities involving riverport
authorities. The cabinet shall be responsible for managing a study that will develop
a long-range capital improvements plan for Kentucky's riverports that shall
include[,] but not be limited to:
(a) Guidelines for ground transportation access to riverports;
(b) A model for determining the economic impact of riverports; and
(c) A blueprint for creating long-term funding mechanisms for riverports.
Section 29. KRS 65.530 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The purposes of the authority shall be to establish, maintain, operate, and expand
necessary and proper riverport and river navigation facilities, and to acquire and
develop property, or rights to property[therein] within the economic environs, the
Page 50 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
home county, or any adjacent county[ adjacent thereto], of the riverport or
proposed riverport to attract directly or indirectly river-oriented industry. It shall
have the duty and any[such] powers [as may be ]necessary or desirable to promote
and develop navigation, river transportation, riverports, and riverport facilities, and
to attract industrial or commercial operations to the property held as industrial
parks.
(2) The authority may establish and fix reasonable rates, charges, and fees for the use
of the riverport facilities which shall be published in a manner available to the
general public in the county in which the riverport is located. In fixing rates,
charges, or fees the authority may take into consideration, among other factors, the
total capital investment of the authority, the revenue needed properly to maintain
riverport[such] facilities, the revenue needed properly to expand the riverport and
its facilities, the portion of the facilities utilized by the licensee or contracting party
and its customers, and the volume and type of business conducted. Any party
aggrieved by the rates, charges, or fees may appeal from the action of the authority
to the Circuit Court of the county within which the authority operates, within ninety
(90) days from the date that the authority finally publishes the rates, charges, or fees
and gives notice [of same ]to the contracting party or licensee. The Circuit Court
may hear evidence and determine whether or not the rates, charges, or fees are, or
are not, reasonable in amount. Appeal from the judgment of the Circuit Court may
be prosecuted as any other civil appeal.
(3) The authority shall also have power[, from time to time,] to fix rates, charges, or
fees by contract, or by publishing general rates, charges, or fees for commercial
vendors, concessionaires, or other persons for the use or occupancy of riverport
facilities under the terms and conditions it deems to be in the best interest of
maintaining, operating, or expanding necessary riverport facilities, and the public
use of those facilities[thereof].
Page 51 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(4) The authority may acquire by contract, lease, purchase, option, gift,[
condemnation,] or otherwise any real or personal property, or rights in the
property[therein], necessary or suitable for establishing, developing, operating, or
expanding riverports, riverport facilities, water navigation facilities, including
spoilage areas for the disposal of materials dredged from river bottoms in an effort
to improve the navigability of rivers, reserve storage areas and reserves of bulk
materials utilized by the authority or any person acting as the authority's agent or
licensee, and industrial parks or sites within the economic environs of the riverport
or proposed riverport. The authority may erect, equip, operate, and maintain on the
property buildings and equipment necessary and proper for riverport and water
navigation facilities. The authority may dispose of any real or personal property, or
rights in the property[therein], which in the opinion of the authority is not needed
for use as riverport or water navigation facilities, or use as industrial parks or sites.
The authority may lease, sell, convey, or assign its interest in land owned, optioned,
or otherwise held by it to any person for the purpose of constructing or[and/or]
operating any industrial or commercial facility or for the purpose of acting as the
authority's agent or licensee in effectively carrying out any of its powers and duties.
(5) [With the consent of the legislative body of the governmental unit in which the
property to be condemned is located, the authority may by resolution, reciting that
the property cannot be acquired by purchase or agreement and is needed for
riverport, water navigation, or industrial purposes in accordance with the powers set
forth in subsection (4) of this section, direct the condemnation of any property. The
procedure for condemnation shall conform to the procedure set out in the Eminent
Domain Act of Kentucky.
(6) ]The authority may apply for, receive authorization for, establish, and operate a
foreign trade zone, as permitted by 19 U.S.C. sec. 81, provided approval is obtained
from the Cabinet for Economic Development.
Page 52 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(6)[(7)] The authority shall comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.
Section 30. KRS 66.517 is amended to read as follows:
The board may exercise all the powers granted to governmental agencies by KRS 58.010
to 58.130[58.140]. The board may exercise all the powers granted to a county building
commission by KRS 67.450 to 67.555. Furthermore, the board may use the procedures
and powers of each of those sets of sections of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to obtain
facilities and improvements for the matters of statewide concern described in KRS
66.520.
Section 31. KRS 66.527 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may incur indebtedness, buy, lease, rent, sell, operate, manage, accept
gifts and grants, and do anything else necessary or proper to obtain for the county in
accordance with the board's plan the public improvements described in the
plan[therein]. To secure its obligations the board may pledge its assets subject to
any prior pledges or charges against them. The board may incur indebtedness the
security for the payment of which is a special fund rather than the unencumbered
assets of the board. The board may pledge its expected receipts from one or more
sources to secure payment of its various debts and obligations. The board may make
[such ]covenants and agreements with its creditors as may be necessary or proper to
reduce the cost to the board of the indebtedness. Those covenants or agreements
may include arrangements for the operation of public improvements by trustees for
the benefit of creditors in the event of a default by the board in the timely payment
of indebtedness.
(2) In addition to any method of refunding established by covenants in the board's
obligations, the board may for any indebtedness refund it in advance of its maturity
by borrowing against the same security as pledged for the original indebtedness and
substituting as security for the original indebtedness general obligations of the
United States or its agencies if:
Page 53 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(a) The principal and interest of the obligations of the United States [(]or its
agencies[)] are payable in time and sufficient in amount to defray seasonably
and fully the board's outstanding obligation on the original indebtedness;[,]
and
(b) The net annual interest cost of the indebtedness to the board will be reduced.
(3) Obligations of the board may be made negotiable. Except as otherwise provided in
this section[herein], the board's obligations shall be in the form established by KRS
58.010 to 58.130[58.140].
Section 32. KRS 67.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fiscal court may:
(a) Appropriate county funds according to [the provisions of ]KRS 68.210 to
68.360 for lawful purposes;
(b) Sell and convey any real estate or personal property belonging to the county,
and buy land for the use of the county, when necessary, for the lawful
purposes of the county as provided for in this section and KRS 67.083. The
fiscal court may appoint one (1) or more commissioners to sell or buy real
estate under this subsection, subject to the approval of the fiscal court, and
convey it to the purchaser[,] under the direction of the court[,] or have it
conveyed to the court[,] by deed properly executed and recorded.
1. When real property is purchased, the county shall pay no more than the
highest appraised value[,] as determined by a Kentucky certified real
property appraiser as defined in KRS 324A.010[, or the price
determined through exercising the power of eminent domain, if that
power is used]. A valuation of the real property shall not be required if
the purchase price is forty thousand dollars ($40,000) or less;
2. When real property is conveyed or sold, the county shall convey or sell
it in accordance with KRS 67.0802; and
Page 54 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
3. When personal property is conveyed or sold, the county shall convey or
sell it in accordance with KRS 67.0802;
(c) Regulate and control the fiscal affairs of the county;
(d) Cause correct accounts and records to be kept of all receipts and
disbursements of the public funds of the county, employ a competent person
to keep [such ]accounts and records, pay that[such ]person a reasonable
compensation for his or her[such ]services, and have the accounts of the
county and all county officers audited, when necessary and in accordance with
[the provisions of ]KRS 43.070 and 64.810;
(e) Exercise all the corporate powers of the county unless otherwise provided by
law;
(f) Establish all appointive offices, set the duties of those offices, and approve all
appointments to those offices; and
(g) Investigate all activities of the county government.
(2) The fiscal court shall:
(a) Appropriate county funds[,] according to [the provisions of ]KRS 68.210 to
68.360[,] for purposes required by law;
(b) As needed, cause the construction, operation, and maintenance of all county
buildings and other structures, grounds, roads, and other property;
(c) Adopt an administrative code for the county; and
(d) Provide for the incarceration of prisoners according to [the provisions of
]KRS Chapter 441.
(3) The fiscal court shall not exercise executive authority except as specifically
assigned by statute.
Section 33. KRS 67C.101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governmental and corporate functions vested in any city of the first class shall,
upon approval by the voters of the county at a regular or special election, be
Page 55 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
consolidated with the governmental and corporate functions of the county
containing the city. This single government replaces and supersedes the
governments of the pre-existing city of the first class and its county.
(2) (a) A consolidated local government shall have all powers and privileges that
cities of the first class and their counties are, or may hereafter be, authorized
to exercise under the Constitution and the general laws of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky, including but not limited to those powers granted to cities of the
first class and their counties under their respective home rule powers.
(b) A consolidated local government shall continue to exercise these powers and
privileges notwithstanding repeal or amendment of any of the laws upon
which the powers and privileges are based unless expressly repealed or
amended for consolidated local governments.
(c) In addition, a consolidated local government shall have other powers and
privileges as the government may be authorized to exercise under the
Constitution and general laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(d) A consolidated local government is neither a city government nor a county
government as those forms of government exist on July 15, 2002, but it is a
separate classification of government which possess the greater powers
conferred upon, and is subject to the lesser restrictions applicable to, county
government and cities of the first class under the Constitution and general
laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(e) A consolidated local government shall be accorded the same sovereign
immunity granted counties, their agencies, officers, and employees.
(3) A consolidated local government shall have power and authority to:
(a) Levy and collect taxes upon all property taxable for state purposes within the
territorial limits of the consolidated local government not exempt by law from
taxation;
Page 56 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(b) License, tax, and regulate privileges, occupations, trades, and professions
authorized by law, to be uniform throughout the jurisdiction;
(c) Make appropriations for the support of the consolidated local government and
provide for the payment of all debts and expenses of the consolidated local
government and the debts and expenses of the county and city of which it is
the successor;
(d) Issue or cause to be issued bonds and other debt instruments that counties
containing a city of the first class are authorized to issue or enter into all other
financial transactions [as may be ]permitted by law;
(e) Purchase, lease, construct, maintain, or otherwise acquire, hold, use, and
operate any property, real or personal, for any public purpose, and sell, lease,
or otherwise dispose of any property, real or personal, belonging to a
consolidated local government;
(f) [Exercise the power of eminent domain for any public purpose subject to the
limitations and exceptions prescribed by the Constitution and the general laws
of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(g) ]Accept federal or state funds and other sources of revenue that are applicable
to counties and cities of the first class;
(g)[(h)] Establish, erect, maintain, and operate facilities for the confinement,
detention, and rehabilitation of persons convicted of the violation of the
ordinances and laws of a consolidated local government or the
Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(h)[(i)] Pass and enforce by fines and penalties, if necessary, all ordinances, not
inconsistent with law, as are expedient in maintaining the peace, good
government, health, and welfare of the inhabitants of the county and prevent,
abate, and remove nuisances;
(i)[(j)] Collect and dispose of garbage, junk, and other refuse, and regulate the
Page 57 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
collection and disposal of garbage, junk, and other refuse by others;
(j)[(k)] Provide for the redevelopment, renewal, or rehabilitation of blighted,
deteriorated, or dilapidated areas;
(k)[(l)] Enforce zoning regulations;
(l)[(m)] Enter into contracts and agreements with other governmental entities
and with private persons, firms, and corporations;
(m)[(n)] Adopt procedures for collective bargaining with its employees and for
the certification of exclusive bargaining agents for groups of employees in
accordance with the Constitution and general laws of the Commonwealth of
Kentucky and its ordinances; and
(n)[(o)] Exercise all other powers and authorities granted to counties and cities
of the first class by the general laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(4) The powers of the consolidated local government shall be construed broadly in
favor of the consolidated local government. The specific mention of, or failure to
mention, [of ]particular powers in this section shall not be construed as limiting in
any way the general or specific powers of a consolidated local government.
(5) A consolidated local government shall have power and jurisdiction throughout the
total area embraced by the official jurisdictional boundaries of the county.
(6) A consolidated local government shall be known as............../.....................County
Metro Government, which shall be the combination of the names of the largest city
in existence on the date of the adoption of the consolidated local government and
the county.
Section 34. KRS 74.410 is amended to read as follows:
Water districts may, in addition to all other methods provided by law, acquire and
develop water systems, systems for the distribution of natural, artificial, or mixed gas and
sewage disposal systems through the issuance of revenue bonds under [the terms and
provisions of ]KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140].
Page 58 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Section 35. KRS 76.080 is amended to read as follows:
The district created under [the provisions of ]KRS 76.010 to 76.210 is empowered:
(1) To have jurisdiction, control, possession, and supervision of the existing sewer and
drainage system of the city forming a district pursuant to KRS 76.010; to maintain,
operate, reconstruct, and improve the same as a comprehensive sewer and drainage
system; to make additions, betterments, and extensions to the system[thereto]
within the district area; and to have all the rights, privileges, and jurisdiction
necessary or proper for carrying such powers into execution. An[No] enumeration
of powers in KRS 76.010 to 76.210 shall not operate to restrict the meaning of this
general grant of power or to exclude other powers comprehended within this
general grant;[.]
(2) To prepare or cause to be prepared and to be thereafter revised and adopted, plans,
designs, and estimates of costs[,] of a system of trunk, intercepting, connecting,
lateral, and outlet sewers, storm water drains, pumping and ventilating stations,
disposal and treatment plants and works, and all other appliances and structures
which in the judgment of the board will provide an effective and advantageous
means for relieving the district area from inadequate sanitary and storm water
drainage and from inadequate sanitary disposal and treatment of [the ]sewage[
thereof], or any[such] sections or parts of a[such] system of the district area as the
board deems[may from time to time deem] proper or convenient to construct,
consistent with the plans and purposes of KRS 76.010 to 76.210, and may take all
steps the board deems proper and necessary to effect the purposes of KRS 76.010 to
76.210;[.]
(3) (a) To construct any additions, betterments, and extensions to the facilities of the
district, within or without the district area, and to construct any construction
subdistrict facilities or additions, betterments, and extensions[ thereto,] within
or without the district area, by contract or under, through, or by means of its
Page 59 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
own officers, agents, and employees.
(b) [No ]Construction or extensions shall not be started:
1. Within the city forming a district pursuant to KRS 76.010 until, firstly,
the city's director of works, and secondly, its board of aldermen have
approved the plans;[. No Construction or extensions shall be started ]
2. In any city with a population greater than three thousand (3,000) but less
than one hundred thousand (100,000) based upon the most recent federal
decennial census until the governing authorities of the[such] city or
cities have approved the plans; or[. No construction or extensions shall
be started]
3. In any other part of the county until the plans have been approved,
firstly, by the county engineer and, secondly, by the fiscal court;[.]
(4) To establish, construct, operate, and maintain, as a part of the sewer and drainage
system of the district, sewage treatment and disposal plants and systems and all the
appurtenances and appliances thereunto belonging. The sewage treatment and
disposal plants may be located in the city, or beyond the limits of the city in the
county in which the city is located, as the board deems expedient;[.]
(5) To acquire and hold the personal property the board deems necessary and proper for
carrying out the corporate purposes of the district and to dispose of personal
property when the district has no further need for the property;[therefor.]
(6) To acquire by purchase, gift, or lease[, or by condemnation,] real property or any
interest, right, easement, or privilege in real property[therein,] as the board
determines necessary, proper, and convenient for the corporate purposes of the
district, and to use the property[same] so long as its corporate existence continues[,]
and [same ]is necessary or useful for the corporate purposes of the district.
[Condemnation proceedings may be instituted in the name of the district pursuant to
a resolution of the board declaring the necessity for the taking, and the method of
Page 60 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
condemnation shall be the same as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky. ]When the board by resolution declares that any real property or interest
in real property which it has acquired[, or any interest therein,] is no longer
necessary or useful for the corporate purposes of the district, the real property
or[and] interest in the property[therein] may be disposed of;[.]
(7) To make bylaws and agreements for the management and regulation of its affairs
and for the regulation of the use of property under its control and for the
establishment and collection of sewer rates, rentals, and charges, which sewer rates,
rentals and charges, applicable within the limits of a city forming a district pursuant
to KRS 76.010, shall be subject to the approval, supervision and control of the
legislative body of the city as [hereinafter ]provided in KRS 76.010 to 76.210;[.]
(8) To make contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the
premises;[.]
(9) To borrow money and to issue negotiable bonds and to provide for the rights of
their[the] holders;[ thereof.]
(10) To fix and collect sewer rates, rentals, and other charges, for services rendered by
the facilities of the district, which sewer rates, rentals, and other charges, applicable
within the limits of a city forming a district pursuant to KRS 76.010, shall be
subject to the approval, supervision, and control of the legislative body of the[such]
city as[ hereinafter] provided in KRS 76.010 to 76.210;[.]
(11) To enter on any lands, waters, and premises for the purpose of making surveys,[
and] soundings, and examinations;[.]
(12) To approve or revise the plans and designs of all trunk, intercepting, connecting,
lateral and outlet sewers, storm water drains, pumping and ventilating stations,
disposal and treatment plants and works proposed to be constructed, altered or
reconstructed by any other person or corporation, private or public, in the whole
county, [in order ]to ensure[insure] that the[such] proposed construction, alteration,
Page 61 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
or reconstruction shall conform to and be a part of a comprehensive sewer and
drainage system for the [said ]county. [No ]Sewers, drains, pumping and ventilating
stations, or disposal and treatment plants or works shall not be constructed, altered,
or reconstructed without approval by the board of the district and[. Any such work]
shall be subject to inspection and supervision of the district; and[.]
(13) To enter into agreements with another entity or entities to acquire by purchase or
lease[,] any real or personal property, or any interest, right, easement, or privilege
in property[therein], outside of the district's jurisdictional boundaries, in connection
with the acquisition, construction, operation, repair, or maintenance of any sewage,
wastewater, or storm water facilities, notwithstanding any other provision of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes restricting, qualifying, or limiting their authority to do
so, except as set forth in KRS Chapter 278.
Section 36. KRS 76.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The district shall have the power to acquire by purchase or[,] gift[ or eminent
domain proceedings,] the fee or other[such] right, title, interest, or easement[,] in
[such ]lands [as may be ]deemed by the district necessary for any of the purposes
mentioned in KRS 76.010 to 76.295, whether within or without the district area or
within or without a construction subdistrict and any personal property necessary for
the purpose of the district. [Such ]Lands, interests[ or interest therein], or personal
property may be [so ]acquired under this section whether or not [the same are
]owned or held for public use by corporations or[,] associations, [or other persons
having the power of eminent domain, ]or otherwise held or used for public
purposes.[ Nothing in ]
(2) This chapter shall not be construed to confer upon or recognize in the district any
power to acquire by agreement, purchase, or gift[, or by eminent domain
proceedings,] any fee, right, title, interest, or easement in property under the
jurisdiction of the Department of Highways or included within the boundaries of
Page 62 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
any sanitation district organized under KRS Chapter 220, except necessary rights of
way for trunk sewers through such sanitation districts.
(3) Immediately[Forthwith] upon the acquisition of any [such ]fee, right, title, interest,
[or ]easement, or personal property, the property[same] shall become dedicated to
the uses and purposes of the district.
[(2) The method of condemnation of such property shall be pursuant to the Eminent
Domain Act of Kentucky.
(3) When a district has filed a proceeding to condemn land or any interest therein or
personal property, pursuant to the provisions of the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky, and the board of such district shall determine that the necessity for
procuring possession of the property is urgent, it may pass a resolution, at the time
that said condemnation is authorized or at any time thereafter for a declaration of
taking, declaring that said lands are to be taken for the use of a metropolitan sewer
district. Said declaration of taking shall contain, or have annexed thereto, the
following:
(a) A statement of the authority under which and, the public use for which, said
lands are taken;
(b) A description of the lands taken sufficient for identification thereof;
(c) A statement of the estate or interest in said lands taken for said public use;
(d) A plat showing the lands taken.
(4) At any time after the report of the commissioners has been made, the district may
file said declaration of taking and make a deposit with the clerk of the court of the
sum of money stated in the award of the commissioners appointed. Title to said
lands in fee simple or such lesser estate as is specified in said declaration or to said
personal property shall then vest in such metropolitan sewer district, and the right to
just compensation for said land or interest therein or personal property shall vest in
the persons entitled thereto. Said compensation shall be ascertained and awarded in
Page 63 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
said proceeding as otherwise provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. ]
Section 37. KRS 80.500 is amended to read as follows:
An authority shall constitute a public body corporate and politic, exercising public and
essential governmental functions[,] and having all the powers necessary or convenient to
carry out and effectuate the purposes [and provisions ]of KRS 80.320 to 80.610,
including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:
(1) To sue and be sued; to have a seal and to alter the seal[same] at pleasure; to have
perpetual succession; to make and execute contracts and other instruments
necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the authority; and to make,
[and from time to time ]amend, and repeal bylaws, rules, and regulations[,] not
inconsistent with KRS 80.320 to 80.610[,] to carry into effect the powers and
purposes of the authority;[. ]
(2) Within its area of operation, to prepare, carry out, acquire, lease, and operate
housing; to provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or
repair of any housing project or any part of a housing project;[thereof. ]
(3) To arrange or contract for the furnishing by any person or agency, public or private,
of services, privileges, works, or facilities for, or in connection with, a housing
development or its[the] occupants[ thereof]; and, [(]notwithstanding anything to the
contrary [contained ]in KRS 80.320 to 80.610 or in any other provision of law,[)] to
include in any contract let in connection with a development, stipulations requiring
that the contractor and any subcontractors comply with requirements as to
minimum wages and maximum hours of labor, and comply with any conditions
which the federal government may have attached to its financial aid of the[ project.]
project;
(4) To lease or rent any dwellings, houses, accommodations, lands, buildings,
structures, or facilities embraced in any housing project, and [(]subject to the
limitations [contained ]in KRS 80.320 to 80.610,[)] to establish and revise the rents
Page 64 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
or charges for the housing projects[therefor]; to own, hold, and improve real or
personal property; to purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant,
bequest, devise, or otherwise any real or personal property or any interest in
property[therein]; [to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain or
condemnation any real property; ]to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge,
or dispose of any real or personal property or any interest in property[therein]; to
insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of
the authority against any risks or hazards;[. ]
(5) To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for
immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may
legally invest funds subject to their control; to purchase its bonds at a price not
more than the principal amount [thereof ]and accrued interest, all bonds so
purchased to be canceled; and[. ]
(6) To exercise all or any part or combination of powers [herein ]granted in KRS
80.320 to 80.610.
Section 38. KRS 82.082 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A city may exercise any power and perform any function within its boundaries[,
including the power of eminent domain in accordance with the provisions of the
Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky,] that is in furtherance of a public purpose of the
city and not in conflict with a constitutional provision or statute.
(2) A power or function is in conflict with a statute if it is expressly prohibited by a
statute or there is a comprehensive scheme of legislation on the same general
subject embodied in the Kentucky Revised Statutes.
Section 39. KRS 82.105 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 82.105 to 82.175[82.180], unless the context otherwise requires[the
following words and terms have the following respective meanings unless it shall clearly
appear from the context that another meaning is intended]:
Page 65 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(1) "Bonds" or "bond proceeds," if unaccompanied by other designation, refer to
either revenue bonds or general obligation bonds, or both of them, and their
proceeds, as the context may indicate;
(2)[(1)] "City" means a city of any class;
(3) "Contract of inducement" means any contract, agreement, or offer and
acceptance, whereby a city agrees to provide an inducement to a governmental
agency, under authority of KRS 82.105 to 82.175, either to establish or locate:
(a) In the city or its environs a governmental project which might, but for that
inducement, be established elsewhere or not at all; or
(b) Upon one (1) or more particular sites deemed by the city, acting through its
governing body, to be best situated in the interests of future city planning
and development, or otherwise in the best interests of the public health,
safety, welfare, or convenience of the citizens and inhabitants of the city
and its environs, a governmental project otherwise chosen or under
consideration for establishment or location upon one (1) or more other sites
in or near the same city;
(4)[(2)] "Governing body" means the legislative body of a city;
(5)[(3)] "Governmental agency" means the Commonwealth, the United States, or any
division, department, agency, or instrumentality of either of them, including
agencies and instrumentalities in corporate form, whether created by legislative
enactment or organized as nonprofit corporations under general corporation laws
for the purpose of serving as agencies or instrumentalities of either of them;
(6)[(4)] "Governmental project" means any building, structure, installation, activity,
undertaking, or program proposed by a governmental agency in furtherance of any
lawful governmental or proprietary function of a governmental agency;
[(5) "Contract of inducement" means any contract, agreement, or offer and acceptance,
whereby a city agrees to provide an inducement to a governmental agency, under
Page 66 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
authority of KRS 82.105 to 82.180, either (i) to establish or locate in the city or its
environs a governmental project which might, but for such inducement, be
established elsewhere, or not at all; or (ii) to establish or locate upon one or more
particular sites deemed by the city, acting through its governing body, to be best
situated in the interests of future city planning and development, or otherwise in the
best interests of the public health, safety, welfare or convenience of the citizens and
inhabitants of the city and its environs, a governmental project otherwise chosen or
under consideration for establishment or location upon one or more other sites in or
near the same city;]
(7)[(6)] "Inducement" or "municipal inducement" means appropriation of public funds
derived from any source and not required by law to be applied, reserved, or
appropriated to some other purpose, issuance of bonds and application of bond and
application of bond proceeds, and provision of any lands, improvements or
appurtenances authorized in KRS 82.105 to 82.175[82.180] to be acquired,
constructed, installed, or undertaken by a city as an inducement for a purpose
authorized to be accomplished or promoted under [the provisions of ]a contract of
inducement; and
(8)[(7)] "Revenue bonds" and "general obligation bonds" mean, respectively, the
bonds which a city is authorized in KRS 82.105 to 82.175[82.180] to issue under
those[such] designations[;
(8) "Bonds" or "bond proceeds," if unaccompanied by other designation, refer to either
revenue bonds or general obligation bonds, or both of them, and the proceeds
thereof, as the context may indicate].
Section 40. KRS 82.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A city may acquire by purchase, [exercise of the power of eminent domain, ]option,
or lease, and may accept by way of grant, gift, devise, or otherwise, a fee simple
unencumbered title to, or any lesser interest in, lands which are suitable for and
Page 67 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
acceptable to a governmental agency as a site or sites for one or more governmental
projects.
(2) In addition to an[such] acquisition of lands under subsection (1) of this section, a
city may improve the[such] lands in any manner which in the discretion of the
governing body may be necessary or desirable to place the lands[same] in condition
suitable and acceptable for use and occupancy, including, but not by way of
limitation, demolition of existing buildings or structures, removal of debris,
grading, provision of proper drainage, closure of public ways, establishment and
improvement of new public ways, relocation and improvement of existing public
ways, relocation of publicly or privately owned utility installations, erection of
buildings, structures, and other improvements, and extension of the services and
facilities of any city-owned utility system to any such site or sites.
Section 41. KRS 82.120 is amended to read as follows:
A city may exercise all or any of the powers conferred upon it in KRS 82.105 to
82.175[82.180] as incidents to the exercise of its urban renewal and[and/or] urban
redevelopment functions authorized and contemplated in and by KRS Chapter 99, or
otherwise. In the event a city has elected or may hereafter elect to perform and carry out
its permissible urban renewal [and/]or urban redevelopment functions through, or without
the intervention of, an independent corporate agency or instrumentality, the[such] city
may lawfully raise funds from any source or sources authorized or permitted by law, and
by those means [thereof ]acquire [such ]lands in its own name and pay for the
lands[therefor] the resale or lease value established as provided in KRS Chapter 99, and
thereby redeem and perform obligations and commitments to the United States or others
within the meaning, intent, and purpose of federal or Kentucky statutes relating to [such
]urban renewal and urban redevelopment programs.
Section 42. KRS 82.125 is amended to read as follows:
Municipal inducements are hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination of the
Page 68 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
General Assembly to be lawful public purposes and public uses for which cities may
exercise all powers authorized by [the provisions of ]KRS 82.105 to 82.175[82.180], or
otherwise provided by law.
Section 43. KRS 82.140 is amended to read as follows:
The revenue bonds and interest on them[thereon] shall be payable solely from a special
fund or account of the city, and from [such ]revenues as may be pledged to be set aside
therein from permissible sources, as authorized and provided in KRS 82.140 to 82.165,
and shall not constitute indebtedness of the city. It shall be stated plainly on the face of
each bond that it has been issued under [the provisions of ]KRS 82.105 to
82.175[82.180], and that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the city within the
meaning of the Constitution.
Section 44. KRS 82.165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All moneys received pursuant to [the provisions of ]KRS 82.140 to 82.165, whether
as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds
to be held and applied solely as provided in KRS 82.140 to 82.165. The
proceedings or the trust indenture shall provide that any officer with whom, or any
bank or trust company with which, those[such] moneys shall be deposited shall act
as trustee of the[such] moneys and shall hold and apply them[the same] for the
purposes of KRS 82.140 to 82.165, subject to [such ]regulations as KRS 82.105 to
82.175[82.180] and [such ]proceedings or trust indenture may provide.
(2) Any holder of bonds issued under [the provisions of ]KRS 82.140 to 82.165 or any
of the coupons appertaining to the bonds[thereto], and the trustee under any trust
indenture, except to the extent the rights in KRS 82.140 to 82.165 given may be
restricted by the[such] trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit,
action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights
under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted under KRS 82.140 to 82.165 or
under the[such] trust indenture or the proceedings authorizing the issuance of
Page 69 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
the[such] bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties
required by KRS 82.140 to 82.165 or by the[such] trust indenture or proceedings to
be performed by the city or by any of its officers[officer] or employees[ thereof].
Section 45. KRS 82.170 is amended to read as follows:
The exercise of the powers granted by KRS 82.105 to 82.175[82.180] will be in all
respects for the benefit of the people of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions,
for the increase of their commerce and prosperity, and for the promotion of employment
and the alleviation of unemployment; and as the acquisition of a governmental project or
projects by a city will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions,
and will aid in the performance of other governmental functions by the Commonwealth
and by the United States, the bonds issued under [the provisions of ]KRS 82.105 to
82.175[82.180], whether general obligation or revenue bonds, their transfer and the
income therefrom, [(]including any profit made on their[the] sale [thereof) ]shall [at all
times ]be free from taxation within the Commonwealth.
Section 46. KRS 82.175 is amended to read as follows:
Bonds issued by a city under [the provisions of ]KRS 82.105 to 82.175[82.180] are
hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies, agencies and
instrumentalities of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance
companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors,
administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are
now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of a similar
nature, may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or
belonging to them. These[Such] bonds are hereby made securities which may properly
and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any
agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the
deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be
authorized by law.
Page 70 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Section 47. KRS 82.405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a legislative body of a city determines that a public way located within the city
should be closed in whole or in part, and that all property owners in or abutting the
public way or a portion of the public way[thereof] agree to its[the] closing[ of the
public way], the legislative body may proceed to close the public way or a portion
of the public way[ thereof] as provided in subsection (2) of this section. If that
determination is not made, a public way or a portion of the public way[thereof]
may be closed only as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(2) The legislative body of a city may close a public way[,] in whole or in part[,] as
provided in this subsection[,] if it makes the following findings of fact:
(a) Identification of all property owners in or abutting the public way or the
portion of it[thereof] to be closed;
(b) Written notice of the proposed closing was given to all property owners in or
abutting the public way or the portion of it[thereof] being closed; and
(c) All property owners in or abutting the public way or the portion of it[thereof]
being closed have given their written notarized consent to the closing, and
copies of the consent shall be attached thereto.
If the legislative body makes the findings of fact in subsections (2)(a), (b), and (c)
of this section, it may enact an ordinance reciting the findings of fact and declaring
the public way or a portion of it[thereof] closed without any further action. The
ordinance shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which
the city is located.
(3) Unless the findings of fact required in subsection (2) of this section are made, upon
the adoption of an ordinance by the city legislative body closing the whole or any
portion of a public way, the city shall institute an action in the Circuit Court to have
it closed. All the owners of property in or abutting that public way, or the portion
proposed to be closed, shall be made defendants.
Page 71 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(4) If all defendants fail to object to the closing within twenty (20) days after the date
of service, the court shall render a decree accordingly, but if any defendant objects
within that time, the court shall award damages, if any,[ in the same manner as
prescribed by the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky] and shall direct that the public
way be closed upon payment into court of the amount awarded. The court shall give
these proceedings precedence over other cases.
Section 48. KRS 91.285 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any city of the first class which finds and declares that there exists abandoned
urban property as defined in KRS 132.012(1) within the city[ or which finds that
there exists blighted or deteriorated property pursuant to KRS 99.700 to 99.730]
may levy a separate rate of taxation on abandoned urban property pursuant to KRS
132.012(2).
(2) (a) Prior to levying a tax upon abandoned urban property, the legislative body of
a city of the first class shall delegate to [the vacant properties review
commission, if established pursuant to KRS 99.700 to 99.730 or ]another
department or agency of city government[,] the responsibility of determining
which properties within the city are abandoned urban properties.
(b) A list of abandoned urban properties shall be furnished to the county property
valuation administrator prior to the date fixed for the annual assessment of
real property within the county. If a property classified as abandoned urban
property is repaired, rehabilitated, or otherwise returned to productive use, the
owner shall notify the city which shall, if it finds the property is no longer
abandoned urban property, notify the property valuation administrator to
strike the property from the list of abandoned urban properties.
Section 49. KRS 92.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any urban-county government or city of the home rule class which finds and
declares that there exists abandoned urban property as defined in KRS 132.012
Page 72 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
within the urban-county government or city[, or which finds that there exists
blighted or deteriorated property pursuant to KRS 99.700 to 99.730,] may levy a
separate rate of taxation on abandoned urban property pursuant to KRS 132.012.
(2) (a) Prior to levying a tax upon abandoned urban property, the legislative body of
the urban-county government or the city of the home rule class shall delegate
to[ the vacant properties review commission, if established pursuant to KRS
99.710, or] another department or agency of the urban-county or city
government[,] the responsibility of determining which properties within the
urban-county government or city are abandoned urban properties.
(b) A list of abandoned urban properties shall be furnished to the county property
valuation administrator prior to the date fixed for the annual assessment of
real property within the county. If a property classified as abandoned urban
property is repaired, rehabilitated, or otherwise returned to productive use, the
owner shall notify the urban-county government or city which shall, if it finds
the property is no longer abandoned urban property, notify the property
valuation administrator to strike the property from the list of abandoned urban
properties.
Section 50. KRS 96.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] municipality[,] in which there is located an existing electric, water, or gas
public utility plant or facility shall not construct or cause to be constructed any
similar utility plant or any similar public utility facility duplicating the[such]
existing plant or facility or to obtain or acquire any similar public utility plant or
facility other than by the purchase of the existing plant or facility[ or by the
acquisition of such existing plant or facility by the exercise of the power of eminent
domain].
(2) As used in this section, "municipality" means any county, city, and municipal
corporation in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and any board, commission or
Page 73 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
agency thereof.
(3) All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this section[herewith to the extent of
such conflict ]are repealed to the extent of the conflict.
Section 51. KRS 96.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any city that owns or operates a water supply or sanitary sewer system may extend
the system into, and furnish and sell water and provide sanitary sewers to any
person within, any territory contiguous to the city, and may install within that
territory necessary apparatus.[; provided,] However, [that ]the extension of a water
supply or sanitary sewer system shall not enter into any territory served by an
existing water supply or sanitary sewer district unless the[such] district requests the
extension of water or sewer services from a city.[ For these purposes the city or
sanitation authority established by an interlocal agreement may condemn or
otherwise acquire franchises, rights, and rights-of-way, as private corporations may
do.]
(2) When extending the system to any person, water district, or water association, the
city may consider the installation of fire hydrants on the extended lines. The city
may extend water lines which are incapable of servicing fire hydrants only if the
city determines that servicing hydrants is not feasible. The determination shall
include consideration of the incremental costs of adequately sized pipe and
associated pumps and towers, and the benefits of real estate development, water
sales, the availability of fire protection insurance, and the reduction in fire insurance
premiums which may result from the installation of hydrants at specified intervals.
When extending lines to a water district or water association, the determination may
be made in consultation with the district or association, taking into consideration
its[their] fiscal capacity.
Section 52. KRS 96.175 is amended to read as follows:
Any board operating under [the provisions of ]KRS 96.171 to 96.188 shall have the legal
Page 74 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
power and capacity to perform any act not repugnant to law and shall have the express
power and capacity to do any and all acts or things necessary or convenient for the
carrying out of the purposes of KRS 96.171 to 96.188, including, but not by way of
limitation, the following express powers:
(1) Acquire property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, necessary or incident
to the proper conduct of its business;[.]
(2) Operate, maintain, improve, and extend the electric and water plant, and provide
electric and water service to any user or consumer within and without the
boundaries of any municipality, and charge and collect reasonable rates therefor;[.]
(3) Fix and determine classifications, rates, and charges for services[; provided,
however, the rates and charges so fixed and determined at all times shall be]
sufficient to produce revenues sufficient to pay all operating expenses, interest, and
bond requirements, sinking fund requirements, adequate depreciation reserves,
taxes, or payments in lieu of taxes, and reserves for contemplated extensions and
improvements;[.]
(4) Construct, lease, operate, and control any and all works, lines, buildings, and other
facilities across, along, or under any street or public highway, and over any lands
which are now or may be the property of the Commonwealth or of any county or
municipality within this Commonwealth. The board shall, however, at its own
expense, restore a[any such] street or highway to its former condition and state as
nearly as may be possible and shall not use the same in a manner as to impair its
usefulness or to interfere with or obstruct its[the] maintenance[ thereof]. Before
exercising these powers, the board shall obtain a permit or consent or approval in
writing from the governing authority of the municipality, [or ]the fiscal court, or the
Department of Highways, having appropriate jurisdiction over the[any and all of
such] respective streets or public highways;[.]
(5) Accept gifts, grants of property, real or personal, including money, from any
Page 75 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
person, municipality, or federal agency, and to accept voluntary and uncompensated
services.[; provided,] However, [that ]when engineering services are required by the
board, an[no] engineer or firm with which he or she is associated who is engaged in
whole or in part in the business of buying or selling any electric or water
equipment, machinery, fixtures, materials, supplies, or the sale or purchase of bonds
shall not be eligible for employment or for any service [whatsoever ]under [the
provisions of ]KRS 96.171 to 96.188;[.]
(6) Contract debts and borrow money for the improvement and extension of any
electric and water plant or for the refinancing of any existing bonded indebtedness
on the property or any portion of the property[thereof], issue bonds therefor,
provide for the rights of holders of the bonds and to secure the bonds as [hereinafter
]provided in this section, and pledge all or any of the net revenue derived from the
electric and water plant to the payment of [such ]debts or repayment of money
borrowed;[.]
(7) The title to any property, real or personal, which the board may acquire shall vest in
the municipality for the use and benefit of the electric and water system. The board
shall have the power to sell or otherwise dispose of any personal property used or
useful in the operation of the electric and water system which may be or become
obsolete or otherwise determined by the board not to be necessary in the operation
of the electric and water system. Any bill of sale or other instrument of conveyance
shall be executed by the chairman of the board and attested by the secretary of the
board;[.]
(8) Make contracts and execute instruments containing [such ]covenants, terms and
conditions that[as] in the discretion of the board may be proper, necessary, or
advisable for the purpose of obtaining loans from any source, or grants, loans, or
other financial assistance from any governmental agency; make all other contracts
and execute all other instruments as in the discretion of the board may be advisable
Page 76 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
in or for the furtherance of the operation, maintenance, improvement, or extension
of any electric and water plant and the furnishing of service; and carry out and
perform the covenants, terms, and conditions of all such contracts or instruments, as
well as all contracts and instruments in existence and effect at the time of the
transfer of the property to the board as [herein ]provided in this section;[.]
(9) Enter on any lands, waters, and premises for the purpose of making surveys,
soundings, and examinations in connection with the operation, maintenance,
improvement, or extension of any electric and water plant and the furnishing of
service,[.]
(10) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly
given in KRS 96.171 to 96.188, except sell, convey, or mortgage the real property.
(11) Make any contracts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers
[herein ]granted in this section, including, but not limited to, contracts for either the
purchase or sale or both the purchase and sale of electric energy or power; and, in
connection with any such contract with a governmental agency, the board may
stipulate and agree to [such ]covenants, terms, and conditions as it deems
appropriate, including, but without limitation, covenants, terms, and conditions with
respect to the resale rate, financial and accounting methods, and the manner of
disposing of the revenues or any part of revenues[thereof] derived from the
operation of the plant as [herein ]provided in this section;[.]
(12) Acquire by purchase [or the exercise of eminent domain all ]lands, easements,
rights of way, either upon or under or above the ground, reasonably necessary or
desirable in connection with the operation, maintenance or extension of an electric
and water plant.
(13) [The board shall have the power to ]Accept [the provisions of ]and conduct its
operations under the [provisions of the ]Kentucky Workers' Compensation Act;
and[.]
Page 77 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(14) [The board shall have the power to ]Establish, create, provide, and maintain a
pension plan for its employees, and to pay out of operating revenues, as an
operating expense, a[such] portion of the cost of the creation and maintenance of
the[such] pension plan as may be properly payable by the board.
Section 53. KRS 96.182 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the provisions of outstanding bonds and contracts, the board shall apply
all funds derived from operations to:
(a) [(1) to ]The payment of operating expenses;[, ]
(b) [(2) to ]The payment of bond interest and retirement;[, ]
(c) [(3) to ]Sinking fund requirements;[, ]
(d) [(4) to ]The maintenance of a fund to meet depreciation and the improvements
and extension of the plant in an amount equal to six percent (6%) of the
undepreciated book value of its property;[, ]
(e) [(5) to ]The maintenance of a cash working fund equal to one (1) month's
revenue;[, ]
(f) [(6) to ]The payment of other obligations incurred in the operation and
maintenance of the plant and the furnishing of service;[, ]and
(g) [(7) such ]Taxes, if any, as the board may elect to pay under [the provisions of
]KRS 96.179.[, and ]
(2) Any surplus revenues at the end of any twelve (12) months ending June 30 shall be
transferred to the sinking fund[,] and used by the board only for the redemption or
purchase of outstanding bonds, in which case those[such] bonds shall be canceled,
or for the creation and maintenance of a cash working fund, or the creation and
maintenance of a fund for improvement and extension of the system, or for the
reduction of rates, or the board, after the original cost of the property has[shall
have] been fully paid and satisfied may, in its sole discretion, use, apply, and pledge
all or a part of the[such] surplus revenues for the acquisition, construction,
Page 78 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
maintenance, improvement, addition to, and operation of any ["]public project["] as
[the same is ]defined in[ subsection (1) of] KRS 58.010, or for the purpose of
purchasing, paying, retiring, guaranteeing the payment of, or underwriting revenue
bonds issued by the city or any of its agencies[agency thereof] to finance the
acquisition, construction, maintenance, improvement, addition to, and operation of
any [such "]public project,["] which ["public project" ]shall be located within the
territory served by the board.[; ]
(3) The board is hereby vested with all of the powers, duties, and responsibilities
delegated and granted to a ["]governmental agency["] under KRS 58.020 to
58.130[58.140], both inclusive.[; provided,] However, [that ]the acquisition or
construction of any ["]public project[" as above defined,] shall be first approved by
the common council before the [such "]public project["] is undertaken.
Section 54. KRS 96.537 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislative body of any city operating a municipal system for the acquisition
and distribution of natural gas may[,] by ordinance[,] authorize the issuance of
revenue bonds to pay all or any part of the costs of any project for the improvement
or extension of the system, or for obtaining new sources of supply.
(2) The revenue bonds may be sold and issued in the manner provided for the sale and
issuance of revenue bonds under[ the provisions of] KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140],
58.150, 58.155, and 58.180, including by negotiated sale, or, upon a determination
of a legislative body, acting upon the advice of the city attorney or city solicitor,
that the proposed bonds will be industrial development bonds within the meaning of
federal statutes, the revenue bonds, whether or not exempt from federal income
taxation, may be sold in any manner provided for the sale of industrial building
revenue bonds under [the terms of ]KRS 103.200 to 103.285, inclusive; provided,
however, that:
(a) The contract with the private corporation which is deemed to give rise to the
Page 79 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
federal classification of industrial development bonds need not take the form
of a lease agreement;[, and ]
(b) A[No] request in writing from any contracting private corporation shall not be
required for any negotiated sale;[,] and[ provided, further, that ]
(c) In the event of a negotiated sale, a report of negotiations shall be made to a
consultant [who shall be ]employed by the city to make a recommendation to
the legislative body on the adequacy of the[such] negotiations and of the
terms of sale in the light of market conditions.
(3) [The provisions of ]KRS 424.360 shall not apply to any negotiated sale under this
section.
Section 55. KRS 96.5375 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of subsection (3)[(4)] of this section and KRS 96.045 and
96.538, any city that owns and operates a municipal system for the acquisition,
distribution, or transmission of natural gas may extend the system into and furnish
and sell natural gas to any person or entity within the boundaries of the city or
within any territory outside of the city's boundaries. In exercising the authority
provided by this subsection, the city may install the necessary apparatus to provide
natural gas distribution or transmission service and may also [condemn or otherwise
]acquire rights-of-way as private utilities may do. [The provisions of ]This
subsection shall apply to all cities of this Commonwealth transporting or
distributing natural gas as well as any of its boards, commissions, or
agencies[board, commission, or agency thereof].
(2) [A city, other than a city of the first class or a consolidated local government, may
acquire the entire plant of an existing natural gas distribution system only under the
same process and subject to the same limitations established by KRS 96.580,
96.590, and 96.600.
(3) No ]Property owned or operated by an existing natural gas distribution system
Page 80 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
located within the Commonwealth shall not[may] be condemned by a city from
another state.
(3)[(4)] A natural gas utility, which[,] for purposes of this subsection[,] means a
public, private, or municipally owned gas utility distributing or transporting natural
gas to customers within this Commonwealth, shall not:
(a) Extend its system for the purposes of furnishing or selling natural gas to any
person or entity that is currently being served by another natural gas utility; or
(b) Extend its system to furnish or sell natural gas to any person or entity when
there is another natural gas utility in closer proximity to the person or entity to
be served, unless the natural gas utility in closer proximity has declined to
provide service.
(4)[(5)] [The provisions of ]Subsection (3)[(4)] of this section shall only apply to
extension of service issues between a municipally owned natural gas utility
servicing customers located outside its municipal boundaries and a private or
investor-owned natural gas utility. The term "municipally owned" shall include
systems distributing or transporting natural gas that are owned by a city from
another state.
Section 56. KRS 96.541 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 96.542 to 96.546, the term "acquire" means constructing or
acquiring[shall mean and include construct, acquire] by purchase, [by ]lease, devise, gift,
or [the exercise of the right of eminent domain in the manner now or hereafter provided
by law for the exercise thereof and acquisition by ]any other mode.
Section 57. KRS 96.542 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]Any city may acquire, maintain, and operate an artificial gas system, together with
extensions and necessary appurtenances thereto within or without the limits of the city.[
(2) If any such artificial gas system is acquired from a company having a franchise,
such system may be acquired under the provisions of the Eminent Domain Act of
Page 81 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Kentucky, except as otherwise provided in KRS 96.543 to 96.546 and 96.600. ]
Section 58. KRS 96.550 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 96.550 to 96.900, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Acquire" means constructing or acquiring[shall mean and include construct,
acquire] by purchase, [by ]lease, devise, gift, or [the exercise of the right of eminent
domain in the manner now or hereafter provided by law for the exercise thereof and
acquisition by ]any other mode;[.]
(2) "Board" means[shall mean] a board of public utilities established pursuant to KRS
96.740;[.]
(3) "Bonds" means[shall mean] either general obligation bonds or revenue bonds;[.]
(4) "Constitution" means[shall mean] the Constitution of Kentucky;[.]
(5) "Electric plant" means[shall mean and include] any plant, works, systems, facilities,
and properties, [(]including poles, wires, stations, transformers, and any and all
equipment and machinery[)], together with all parts thereof and appurtenances
thereto, used or useful in the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of
energy;[.]
(6) "Energy" means[shall mean and include] any and all electric energy no matter
where or how generated, produced, transmitted, or conveyed;[.]
(7) "Electric service" means[shall mean] the furnishing of electric power and energy
for any purpose for which electric power and energy can be used;[.]
(8) "General obligation bonds" means[shall mean] direct or general obligations of any
municipality, issued within the limits and subject to[ the provisions of] Sections 157
and 158 of the Constitution;[.]
(9) "Governing body" means[shall mean] the board, council, commission, fiscal court,
or other general governing body of the municipality;[.]
(10) "Governmental agency" includes the United States, the President, the federal works
agency, the federal lending agency, Tennessee Valley Authority, or any other
Page 82 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
similar agency, instrumentality, or corporation of the United States, or of Kentucky
or any political subdivision thereof, created by or pursuant to any Act of Congress
or by state legislation;[.]
(11) "Improve" means to[shall mean and include] construct, reconstruct, improve,
extend, enlarge, alter, better, and repair;[.]
(12) "Improvement" means[shall mean] any improvement, extension, betterment, or
addition to any electric plant;[.]
(13) "Law" means[shall mean] any statute of this state;[.]
(14) "Mayor" means:[shall mean]
(a) The mayor of:
1. Any class city unless there is[be] a city manager, in which case[then] it
means the[shall mean] city manager;[,] or
2. A consolidated local government; or
(b) The county judge/executive of any county;[. "Mayor" shall also mean the
mayor of a consolidated local government.]
(15) "Municipality" means[shall mean] any county, city, consolidated local government,
or municipal corporation of any and every class in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky;[.]
(16) "Revenue bonds" means[shall mean] obligations payable solely from the revenues
derived from the operation of an electric plant, and those[such] bonds shall not
constitute an indebtedness of any municipality within the meaning [of the
provisions ]or limitations of the Constitution; and[.]
(17) "Net revenues" means[shall mean] revenues remaining after payments of:
(a) All payments provided for herein to be made to the state, county, school or
other taxing district;
(b) The payments of salaries[,] and premiums on bonds of officers and employees
of the board; and
Page 83 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) All other ordinary and necessary operating expenses of the board in the
operation of the electric plant, including reserves for depreciation.
Section 59. KRS 96.640 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before any municipality shall have authority to:
(a) Construct or cause to be constructed an electric plant;[, ]
(b) Acquire an electric plant by purchase; or[, ]
(c) [institute condemnation proceedings for acquiring by eminent domain an
electric plant, or
(d) ]Issue revenue bonds for the construction, purchase, or acquisition of an electric
plant;[, ]
the question shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the municipality as
[hereinafter in this section ]provided in this section.
(2) (a) Before any municipality shall be authorized or empowered to purchase or
establish and thereafter operate an electric plant, or to issue bonds therefor,
the legislative body of the[such] municipality shall pass an ordinance
declaring it desirable that the municipality shall purchase or construct and
operate a municipal electric plant, and if it is proposed to construct an[such]
electric plant, the board shall cause an engineer or engineers duly qualified
and licensed under the laws of this Commonwealth [(a) ]to:
1. Prepare the necessary and proper plans and specifications for the
construction of the electric plant;[, (b) ]
2. Select the location therefor;[, (c) ]
3. Determine the size, type, and method of construction;[ thereof, (d) ]
4. Make the necessary estimates of the cost of construction and of the
acquisition of the land and rights of way;[,] and[ (e) a]
5. Survey [of ]all lands, structures, rights of way, franchises, and
easements, the acquisition of which is deemed necessary by the[said
Page 84 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
]engineers and the board for the construction and operation of the[such]
municipal electric plant, all of which shall be approved by the board[;
and, Provided further, That ]
(b) The question of whether or not revenue bonds shall be issued to provide for
the payment of the cost of the electric plant[thereof] shall be submitted to the
qualified voters of the[such] municipality at the next regular November
election to be held in that[said] municipality if the ordinance is certified to the
county clerk not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the next
regular election. The mayor shall certify the[such] ordinance to the county
clerk, who shall have prepared to be placed before the voters in the general
November election, the question: "Are you in favor of the city constructing
and operating a municipal electric plant in accordance with the plans and
specifications adopted by the Electric Plant Board of _________ (here insert
name of municipality) and the issuance of revenue bonds in the maximum
amount of $_______ (here insert maximum total face amount of bonds
estimated by the board to be necessary to pay the cost of such plant, based
upon the estimate hereinabove provided)." The voters shall respond to the
question by voting "Yes" or "No".
(3) The mayor of the[such] municipality shall advertise the[such] election and its[the]
object [thereof ]by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, and also by printed
handbills posted in not less than four (4) conspicuous places in each voting precinct
in the municipality and at the courthouse door. All legal voters of such municipality
shall be privileged to vote at the[such] election. The city shall have no authority to
construct a municipal electric plant[,] or to issue revenue bonds unless a majority of
all the qualified voters voting in the[said] election on this question vote in favor of
construction[thereof].
(4) Any contract of a municipality for the purchase of an electric plant shall be
Page 85 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
conditioned upon the approval of the qualified voters of the municipality at an
election held at the time and in the manner provided in subsections (2)(b) and (3) of
this section, except that the clerk shall have prepared to be placed before the voters
the following question: "Are you in favor of the City of ________ purchasing from
_________ (insert the name of owner or owners) an electric plant at the price of
$_________ (herein insert the amount of the agreed purchase price) and the
issuance of revenue bonds in the amount of $_______ (herein insert total face
amount of bonds required to pay the agreed purchase price)." The voters shall
respond to the question by voting "Yes" or "No".
(5) [Before any municipality shall be authorized or empowered to institute
condemnation or eminent domain proceedings to acquire an electric plant, the
legislative body of such city shall pass an ordinance declaring it desirable that the
municipality shall acquire by condemnation an electric plant, and shall describe in
the ordinance the property which it deems necessary to be acquired, and there shall
be submitted, in the manner provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, to
the qualified voters of the municipality at the next regular November election, the
following question: "Are you in favor of the City of _________ (here insert name
of city) acquiring an electric plant by the exercise of the power of eminent domain
and the issuance of revenue bonds in an amount sufficient to pay the entire damages
and costs of such acquisition." The voters shall respond to the question by voting
"Yes" or "No".
(6) No ]A municipality or board shall not have authority to purchase, construct, or
acquire[, or to institute condemnation proceedings for acquiring] an electric plant,
or to issue revenue bonds or other obligations or evidences of indebtedness for the
payment of the costs of the electric plant[thereof] unless a majority of all the
qualified voters voting in the[said] election on the question vote in favor of
construction[thereof]. Elections held pursuant to [the provisions of ]KRS 96.550 to
Page 86 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
96.900 shall be governed by the laws of this state relative to elections to the extent
that such laws are not inconsistent with this section[herewith].
Section 60. KRS 96A.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Regular meetings of the board shall be held at least once in each calendar month, at
a[such] time and place [as may be ]fixed by the board as a matter of record. Special
meetings of the board may be called by the chairman or any two (2) members of the
board upon oral or written notice to all members at least forty-eight (48) hours in
advance. Each notice of a special meeting shall state the time, place, and purpose or
purposes of the meeting[thereof]. Notice may be waived by any member, orally or
in writing, before, at, or after a[such] special meeting; and the presence of any
member at any [such] special meeting shall constitute a waiver of any defect of
notice, unless the[such] member shall cause it to appear of record that his or her
attendance is only for the purpose of objecting to any deficiency in the notice or the
time or manner of giving the notice[same].
(2) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business, but a smaller number may adjourn [from time to time, ]and
may compel the attendance of absent members in a[such] manner and under [such
]penalties as the authority may provide for in[previously have provided for,
according to] its bylaws. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum shall be
necessary for the adoption of any motion, measure, or resolution. Passage of any
motion, measure, or resolution may be by voice vote, provided:
(a) At the request of any member the yea and nay votes shall be recorded upon
call of the roll;[,] and
(b) A voting[Such] record shall be made in all proceedings involving any
adjustment of rates and charges for use of the services and facilities of the
mass transportation system of the authority,[ authorization of proceedings to
acquire property through exercise of the power of eminent domain,] the
Page 87 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
issuance of revenue bonds or mortgage bonds of the authority, a request that
general obligation bonds be issued by any public body for the benefit of the
authority, or approval and authorization of any lease agreement wherein the
authority is the lessor and a public body or public bodies, [(]or any
combination of those,[thereof)] may be the lessee or lessees, as provided in
this chapter.
Section 61. KRS 96A.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A transit authority may establish mass transportation within its transit area and
adjoining areas[,] but may not inaugurate service in direct competition with any
existing certificated carrier.
(2) In addition to the power conferred upon an authority by this chapter, an authority
may acquire real or personal property, easements, franchises, bus certificates, or
other rights by any lawful means necessary to its operation of any existing mass
transit system within its transit area and adjoining areas, provided that having
acquired an existing transit system it shall not thereafter inaugurate service in direct
competition with any other existing certificated carrier.
(3) [An authority may, if unable to contract or agree with the owner or owners thereof,
acquire real and personal property, franchises, bus certificates, easements and other
rights when necessary in and to the accomplishments of the public purposes of the
authority, through exercise of the power of eminent domain; provided, however,
that in acquiring any private bus company pursuant to this section, the authority
may not do so piecemeal but shall acquire the entire system including that which
may be outside the area then included within the authority. An authority shall not
condemn any real and personal property, franchises, bus certificates, easements and
other rights of a private bus company the majority of whose passengers move
between termini without the transit area. Any exercise of such power shall be
initiated by resolution of the board of the authority identifying the properties or
Page 88 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
rights to be acquired, reciting the board's determination that acquisition by such
means is necessary, and authorizing initiation of proceedings as required by law;
and such resolution of the board of the authority shall not be conclusive of such
determination but shall be subject to the approval of the fiscal court or courts of the
county or counties in which the property sought to be condemned is located.
(4) Proceedings in the exercise of the power of eminent domain herein vested in an
authority shall, except where inconsistent with this chapter, be such as are
prescribed for the Department of Highways by the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky, and as the same may be amended and supplemented from time to time.
All such proceedings shall be governed by the provisions of the Rules of Civil
Procedure except where the provisions of this chapter or of the Eminent Domain
Act of Kentucky specifically or by necessary implication provide otherwise. If a
privately owned mass transportation system, or other property sought to be acquired
by an authority, shall have been acquired or improved in whole or in part at the
expense of the authority, the cost and value of such acquisitions and improvements
shall be excluded in any proceedings to establish the fair value thereof.
(5) ]During any period when negotiations for the purchase of a mass transit system are
in progress,[ and/or during any period when proceedings for acquisition of a mass
transportation system through exercise of the power of eminent domain may be
pending,] an authority may make reasonable subsidy payments to the owner or
owners of the[such] mass transit system if[,] in the judgment of the board of the
authority[, such] subsidy payments are necessary in order to give reasonable
assurance that there will be no substantial reduction of transportation service to the
public. [Such ]Subsidy payments may be made by an authority from any resources
available to it, or from appropriations made or agreed to be made to it by any public
body having an interest in the preservation of mass transit service to the public; and
if bonds are ultimately issued for the purchase or other acquisition of the[such]
Page 89 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
mass transit system, the aggregate amount of the[such] subsidy payments may be
included as a part of the cost of acquisition and made payable from the proceeds of
the[such] bonds. An[In no event, however, shall any] action on the part of a board
of an authority in this connection shall not create an indebtedness of the authority
beyond its available resources or the[such ]appropriations or [the ]proceeds of
[such] bonds, if and when bonds are issued.
Section 62. KRS 97.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of public parks and recreation of any city of the first class shall
exercise all of the powers and perform all of the functions and duties of any former
board of park commissioners of the city, except as otherwise provided by law or by
KRS 97.250 to 97.255[97.257]. The agents and employees of the department of
public parks and recreation, except as provided herein, shall be employed and
governed in accordance with the merit system, as provided by any law or
amendments thereof, and any rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto,
authorizing, creating and governing any city board or commission empowered to
administer and enforce civil service laws, rules and regulations in and for the city.
(2) The department of public parks and recreation of any city of the first class shall be
under the supervision and direction of a director to be designated director of parks
and recreation, and shall have exclusive direction, supervision and control of all
park property, as herein defined, except as otherwise provided by law or by KRS
97.250 to 97.255[97.257] or by ordinance of the legislative body of said city; and
shall provide for and supervise all public amusements and recreation in parks,
playgrounds, and community centers. The director of the department may adopt
rules and regulations for the reasonable and proper use, management and control of
public park, playground and community center property, and may organize the
department for administrative purposes into the divisions necessary for the proper
conduct of the business of said department, and appoint heads or chiefs of the
Page 90 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
divisions, who, under the supervision and control of the director, shall have the
direction of such divisions.
Section 63. KRS 97.253 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The employees of any former board of park commissioners in any city of the first
class, except the special park police, shall be employed by and continued in the
service of the department of public parks and recreation. The employees, except as
[herein ]provided in this section, are subject to any law or amendments thereof, or
any rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto, governing any city board or
commission empowered to administer and enforce civil service laws, rules, and
regulations in and for the city, it being the intent and purpose of KRS 97.250 to
97.255[97.257] to make those[such] laws, rules, and regulations applicable to the
offices, positions, and places of employment in the department of public parks and
recreation.
(2) The following offices, positions, and places of employment in the department of
public parks and recreation, to wit: director of parks and recreation, private
secretary to the director, golf professionals, golf greensmen, checkers, countermen,
locker attendants, caretakers, janitors, janitresses, laundresses, cleaners, tractor and
truck drivers, teamsters and stablemen, and laborers, are hereby specifically
excepted from the [provisions of the ]civil service law, rules, and regulations. The
foregoing excepted offices, positions, and places of employment, except the office
of director, may hereafter be placed in the classified service, under the law, by the
legislative body of the city by ordinance.
Section 64. KRS 97.680 is amended to read as follows:
The commission may acquire, by gift, purchase, or lease[ or condemnation,] any real or
personal property situated wholly within the city or county, or any interest, franchise,
easement, right, or privilege in the city or county, of any buildings, tools, machinery,
materials, or supplies that may be required for the purpose of furnishing, maintaining or
Page 91 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
operating the memorial.[ The proceedings for condemnation shall be conducted in the
name of the commission in the method prescribed by the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky.] All property acquired by the commission shall be held, used, and controlled
by it for the purposes named in KRS 97.630 to 97.780.
Section 65. KRS 98.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission may:
(a) Make [such ]preliminary investigations and do [such ]preliminary work as
should[,] in its judgment[,] precede the actual construction of the building or
improvement;[. ]
(b) Determine upon a proper site for the building or improvement. If the city
owns a public building, that site, as it exists or as enlarged by the acquisition
of adjacent property recommended by the commission, shall be used unless
the commission determines that it is unsuitable for the purpose and
recommends to the mayor the acquisition of another site. The mayor shall
submit the recommendation to the legislative body for approval. The new site
shall be adopted only upon the approval of the change by legislative
resolution approved by the mayor. In the event the existing building on the old
site is to be abandoned, the old site may be sold and the proceeds applied to
the purchase of the new site;[. ]
(c) Provide accommodations for patients or inmates of the existing public
building while the new building is in course of erection and furnishing. The
legislative body may, out of its levy for the department having supervision of
public[such] buildings, assume the whole or part of the expense of providing
[such ]temporary accommodations;[. ]
(d) Establish and enforce reasonable rules and regulations for its own government
and for the supervision, protection, management, and conduct of its work and
the payment therefor as it deems expedient;[. ]
Page 92 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(e) Purchase, hire, or otherwise obtain the use of any[such] lands, buildings,
machinery, supplies, materials and working agencies as it needs for its
purposes;[. ]
(f) Acquire by gift, purchase, or lease[ or condemnation], any property situated
within the city or county where the city is located, or any interest or privilege
in the property, required for the building or improvement.[ The method of
condemnation shall be the same as in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. ]
(2) The enumeration of special powers in this section does not restrict the general
powers of the commission to carry out the purposes of KRS 98.040 to 98.170.
Section 66. KRS 99.010 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The following terms, whenever used or referred to in KRS 99.010 to 99.310 shall,
unless a different intent clearly appears from the context, be construed as follows:
(1)[(a)] "Area" means a portion of a city which a planning commission has found or
shall find to be substandard or insanitary, so that its[the] clearance, replanning,
rehabilitation, or reconstruction [thereof ]is necessary or advisable to effectuate the
public purposes declared in KRS 99.020. An area may include any buildings or
improvements not in themselves substandard or insanitary, and any real property,
whether improved or unimproved, the inclusion of which is deemed necessary for
the effective clearance, replanning, reconstruction, or rehabilitation of the area of
which those[such] buildings, improvements, or real property form a part;
(2)[(b)] "City" means and is deemed to relate to any city of the first class, a city with a
population of fifteen thousand (15,000) or more based upon the most recent federal
decennial census, or urban-county government in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(3)[(c)] "Development" means a specific work, repair, or improvement to put into
effect a development plan. The term includes the real property, buildings, and
improvements owned, constructed, managed, or operated by a redevelopment
corporation;
Page 93 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(4)[(d)] "Development area" means that portion of an area to which a development
plan is applicable;
(5)[(e)] "Development cost" means the amount determined by the supervising agency
to be the actual cost of the development, or of the part of the amount[thereof] for
which the[such] determination is made, and includes, among other costs, the
reasonable costs of planning the development, including preliminary studies and
surveys, neighborhood planning, and architectural and engineering services, the
reasonable value of the services performed by or for the incorporators of a
redevelopment corporation in connection with the development plan prior to the
time when the redevelopment corporation was incorporated or became a
redevelopment corporation, fees for acquisition costs, the costs of financing the
development, including carrying charges during construction, working capital in an
amount not exceeding five percent (5%) of development cost, the actual cost of real
property or any part of a property[thereof] where acquired partly or wholly in
exchange for securities, then, an amount which shall be approved by the supervising
agency as being equal to the reasonable value of the real property acquired[
therefor], the actual cost of demolition of existing structures, the actual cost of
utilities, landscaping, and roadways, the actual cost of construction, equipment, and
furnishing of buildings and improvements, including architectural, engineering and
builder's fees, the actual cost of reconstruction, rehabilitation, remodeling, or initial
repair of existing buildings and improvements, reasonable management[,] and
operation costs until the development is ready for use, and the actual cost of
improving that portion of the development area which is to remain as open space,
together with any[such ]additions to development cost that[as shall] equal the
actual cost of additions to or changes in the development in accordance with the
original development plan or after approved changes in or amendments to the
plan[thereto];
Page 94 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(6)[(f)] "Development plan" means a plan for the redevelopment of all or any part of
an area, and includes any amendments [thereto ]approved in accordance with [the
requirements of ]KRS 99.070;
(7)[(g)] "Local legislative body" means the board of aldermen or other board or body
vested by the charter of the city or other law with jurisdiction to adopt or enact
ordinances or local laws;
(8)[(h)] "Mortgage" means a mortgage, trust indenture, deed of trust, building and
loan contract, or other instrument creating a lien on real property, and the
indebtedness secured by each of them;
(9)[(i)] "Neighborhood unit" means a primarily residential district having the
facilities necessary for well-rounded family living, such as schools, parks,
playgrounds, parking areas, and local shopping districts;
(10)[(j)] "Planning commission" means the official bureau, board, planning and zoning
or other commission, or agency of the city or city and county authorized to prepare,
adopt, and amend or modify plans for the development and improvement of the city
generally;
(11)[(k)] "Supervising agency" means the director of finance or any [such] other person
or city agency [as may be ]authorized by the local legislative body under KRS
99.090;
(12)[(l)] "Real property" includes lands, buildings, improvements, land under water,
waterfront property, and any and all easements, franchises, and hereditaments,
corporeal or incorporeal, and every estate, interest, privilege, easement, franchise,
and right in[therein,] or appurtenant to real property[thereto], legal or equitable,
including rights-of-way, terms for years and liens, charges, or encumbrances by
mortgage, judgment, or otherwise;
(13)[(m)] "Redevelopment" means the clearance, replanning, reconstruction, or
rehabilitation of a substandard or insanitary area, and the provision of [such
Page 95 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
]industrial, commercial, residential, or public structures and spaces that[as] may be
appropriate, including recreational and other facilities incidental or appurtenant
thereto;
(14)[(n)] "Redevelopment corporation" means a corporation organized pursuant to the
corporation laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky whose articles of
incorporation shall comply with [the requirements of ]KRS 99.100 to 99.130; and
(15)[(o)] "State" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky.[
(2) "Owner" as used in KRS 99.220 to 99.240, includes a person having an estate,
interest, or easement in the real property to be acquired or a lien, charge, or
encumbrance thereon.]
Section 67. KRS 99.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A redevelopment corporation may, whether before or after the certificates of
approval of its development plan required by KRS 99.040 to 99.060 have been
issued, acquire real property or secure options in its own name or in the name of
nominees to acquire real property, by gift, grant, lease, purchase or otherwise.
(2) [Such city may, upon request by a redevelopment corporation, and after a certificate
of approval of condemnation with respect to the real property in question has been
issued pursuant to KRS 99.220, acquire, or obligate itself to acquire, for such
redevelopment corporation, any real property included in such certificate of
approval of condemnation, by condemnation. Real property acquired by such city
for a redevelopment corporation shall be conveyed by such city to the
redevelopment corporation upon payment to the city of all sums expended or
required to be expended by the city in the acquisition of such real property.
(3) ]In connection with the activities and projects of redevelopment corporations, the
city may apply for, receive, and accept grants-in-aid, gifts, credits, and all other aid
and in all forms, whether similar to or dissimilar from those particularly
enumerated, from the federal government, which embraces the United States of
Page 96 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
America, its agencies and instrumentalities, or from the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, its agencies and instrumentalities or from both, under any[such] lawful
contracts, terms, and conditions, as may be agreed upon.
(3)[(4)] In order to further the accomplishment of the purposes of KRS 99.010 to
99.310, and in addition to the powers heretofore or which may hereafter be granted
to it, the city may, as an alternate method of acquiring by gift[,] or purchase,[ or
condemnation,] and selling and transferring real property to a redevelopment
corporation, by ordinance or ordinances, proceed as follows:
(a) [From time to time ]Designate an area within the[such] city as under
consideration for development under [the provisions of ]KRS 99.010 to
99.310 and provide for consultation with and aid from any and all city
departments, commissions, officers, employees, agencies, and
instrumentalities, relating to the initiation of the project;[.]
(b) Apply for and receive gifts, grants, credits, and obtain loans for the
accomplishment of each development or developments generally, and obligate
the[such] city to supervise the application of those[such ]funds for that[such
]purpose or purposes, and also accept gifts, grants, conveyances, and
leaseholds within the[such] area or areas, and to provide funds, where
necessary, to obtain gifts, grants, credits, or loans from the federal
government, its agencies and instrumentalities, or from the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, its agencies and instrumentalities, or from both or any other agency
under any[such] lawful contracts, terms and conditions as may be agreed
upon;[.]
(c) Appropriate funds acquired under paragraph (b) of this subsection or by
taxation for the acquisition of all or any part or parts of the property in each
[such ]area for development under KRS 99.010 to 99.310 by purchase[ and by
condemnation], and for the clearance of all or any part or parts of the property
Page 97 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
owned by or thus acquired by the[such] city;[. Such condemnation shall be
under the provisions of KRS 99.010 to 99.310, but the city may waive request
for condemnation or deposit or obligation to furnish the funds, as set out in
KRS 99.230.]
(d) 1. Advertise for the submission of development plans for a[such]
designated area by a redevelopment corporation under [the provisions of
]KRS 99.010 to 99.310, the application for which shall[therefor to] be
accompanied by a bid for the[such] lands and estates in the designated
area that[therein as] the city owns or may obligate itself to purchase, or
otherwise acquire and lease, sublease, sell, or convey to the
redevelopment corporation, provided a plan is submitted and is finally
accepted and approved under [the provisions of ]KRS 99.010 to 99.310.
2. If more than one (1) plan and bid is submitted for any one (1) project
[thus ]advertised under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, then the
plan and bid that together would prove most beneficial to the city in
accomplishing the purposes of KRS 99.010 to 99.310 shall be submitted
for approval under the terms of KRS 99.010 to 99.310, but the city may
reject any and all applications, bids, and plans. The[Said] city shall be
the sole judge as to which plan is the most beneficial. The[Such]
advertisement shall clearly describe the area under consideration for
development, the part or parts of the area[thereof] owned by the city or
which it will acquire, [and ]the estates in each parcel that is being
offered for sale, and the terms and conditions, and shall be published
pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.
(e) The terms of the bid for [such ]land or lands or leaseholds may be for all cash,
or part cash and part on time, or all on time, with or without interest, and with
or without lien retained. Any term of payment shall not be for a period
Page 98 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
exceeding five (5) years from the date of completion of the project.
(f) As a further inducement, the terms of the bid may provide for a discount not
exceeding ten percent (10%) a year on the[such] bid for each year, not
exceeding five (5) years, if[in event] the development during each of those
years[such year] is in accordance with the development plan.
Section 68. KRS 99.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When title to real property has vested in a redevelopment corporation or city by
gift, grant, devise, purchase, or otherwise, [or in the city by condemnation
proceedings or otherwise, ]the redevelopment corporation or city, as the case may
be, may agree with the previous owners of the[such] property, or any tenants
continuing to occupy or use it, or any other persons who may occupy or use or seek
to occupy or use the[such] property, that the[such] former owner, tenant, or other
person may occupy or use the[such] property upon the payment of a fixed sum of
money for a definite term or upon the payment periodically of an agreed sum of
money. The[Such] occupation or use shall not be construed as a tenancy from
month to month, nor require the giving of notice by the redevelopment corporation
or the city, as the case may be, for the termination of the[such] occupation or use or
the right to the[such] occupation or use, but immediately upon the expiration of the
term for which payment has been made the redevelopment corporation or city, as
the case may be, shall be entitled to possession of the real property and may
maintain summary proceedings by forcible detainer or otherwise, and shall be
entitled to any[such] other remedy [as may be ]provided by law for obtaining
immediate possession of the real property[thereof]. A former owner, tenant or other
person occupying or using the[such] property shall not be required to give notice to
the redevelopment corporation or city, as the case may be, at the expiration of the
term for which he or she has made payment for the[such] occupation or use, as a
condition to his or her cessation of occupation or use and termination of liability
Page 99 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
for the occupation or use[therefor].
(2) In the event that a city has acquired real property for a redevelopment corporation,
the city shall, in transferring title to the redevelopment corporation, deduct from the
consideration or other moneys which the redevelopment corporation has become
obligated to pay to the city for that[such] purpose, and credit the redevelopment
corporation with, the amounts received by the city as payment for temporary
occupation and use of the real property by a former owner, tenant, or other person,
as in this section provided, less the cost and expense incurred by the city for the
maintenance and operation of the[such] real property.
Section 69. KRS 99.350 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the council of any community by resolution finds and declares:
(a) That there exist in the community slum areas or blighted areas;
(b) That there is need in the community for the exercise of powers, functions, and
duties conferred by KRS 99.330 to 99.510; and
(c) That the exercise of those[such] powers, functions, and duties by an agency
created and established pursuant to this section would be more efficient and
more in the public interest than the exercise of those[such] powers, functions,
and duties by the community or the housing commission of the community
pursuant to KRS 99.490, an agency, to be known as the urban renewal and
community development agency of the city or county, as the case may be,
shall thereupon exist for that[such] community with the powers, duties, and
functions provided for in KRS 99.330 to 99.510.
(2) An urban renewal and community development agency created pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section may be dissolved at any time by the council which
created it by a three-fifths (3/5) vote of the legislative body.
(3) Upon adoption of a resolution creating an agency, the mayor shall be promptly
notified and [he ]shall appoint, with the approval of a majority of the council, five
Page 100 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(5) resident electors of the community as members of the agency.
(4) Three (3) of the members who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for
terms of one (1), two (2) and three (3) years respectively, and the remaining two (2)
of the[such] members shall be designated to serve for terms of four (4) years each,
from the date of their appointment. Any appointments [heretofore ]made for a term
of five (5) years are hereby confirmed and declared to be appointments for a term of
four (4) years from the date of each[such] appointment. Thereafter, members shall
be appointed as aforesaid for a term of office of four (4) years, except that all
vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. A member
shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified.
(5) The agency shall elect a chairperson[chairman] from among its members. The term
of office as chairperson[chairman] of the agency, unless otherwise prescribed by
the council, shall be for the calendar year, or for that portion of the year[thereof]
remaining after the chairperson[each such chairman] is designated or elected.
(6) The powers of each agency shall be vested in its[the] members [thereof ]then in
office. Members of an agency or their staff shall receive their actual and necessary
expenses, including traveling expenses.[, provided,] However, [that such ]other
compensation[,] if prescribed[,] shall be paid exclusively from community funds.
(7) For inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, a member of an agency
may be removed by the council, but the member may be removed only after he or
she has[shall have] been given a copy of the charges at least ten (10) days prior to a
public hearing for removal[thereon] and has had an opportunity to be heard in
person or by counsel.
(8) An[No] officer or employee of the community or of the agency, who in the course
of his or her duties is required to participate in the formulation of plans or policies
for the redevelopment of a development area, or to approve those[such] plans or
policies, shall not acquire any interest in any property included within a
Page 101 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
development area within the community. If any [such ]officer or employee owns or
has financial interest, direct or indirect, in any property included within [such ]a
development area, he or she shall immediately disclose[,] in writing[,] the[such]
interest to the agency and to the council, which[ and such disclosure] shall be
entered in the minutes of the agency and of the council. Failure to so disclose
an[such] interest shall constitute misconduct in office. A[No] payment shall not be
made to any member or officer of an agency for any property or interest [therein
]acquired by the agency from the[such] member or officer unless the [amount of
such payment is fixed by court order in eminent domain proceedings, or unless such
]payment is unanimously approved by the council.
(9) When an agency is created for any community, the council may [at that time, and
from time to time thereafter, ]appropriate [such ]amounts of money to the agency as
it deems necessary for the administrative purposes of the agency. The
administrative purposes of the agency may include staff and consultants for
research, studies and surveys, designation of development areas, preparation of
development plans, estimates of the cost of acquisition, clearance and conditioning
of land for redevelopment, estimates of the fair use value of the land, and any other
administrative expenses considered necessary by the council.
(10) Each [such ]agency shall file with the council a detailed report of all its
transactions, including a statement of all revenues and expenditures, at [such
]intervals as the council may prescribe.
Section 70. KRS 99.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each agency created for the purpose of KRS 99.330 to 99.510 shall constitute a
public body[,] corporate and politic[,] exercising public and essential governmental
functions, and shall have the following powers in addition to the others granted:
(a) To sue and be sued; to have a seal; to make and execute contracts and other
instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers;
Page 102 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(b) To make, [and from time to time ]amend, and repeal bylaws, rules, and
regulations not inconsistent with KRS 99.330 to 99.510 to carry into effect the
powers and purposes of those provisions[thereof];
(c) To select and appoint [such ]officers, agents, counsel and employees,
permanent and temporary, as it may require, and determine their
qualifications, duties, and compensation, subject, however, to the provision of
its budget;
(d) Within its area of operation, for purposes of redevelopment within the
development area, to purchase, lease, obtain option upon, acquire by gift,
grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any real or personal property, or any
interest in property[therein], together with any improvements on the
property[thereon]; [to acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain
any real property; ]to clear any and all buildings, structures, or other
improvements from any real property so acquired and to dispose of any
personal property resulting from the acquisition or sale[therefrom]; to sell,
lease, exchange, subdivide, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber [(]by mortgage,
deed of trust, or otherwise[)], or otherwise to dispose of any real or personal
property or any interest in property[therein] at its fair value for uses in
accordance with the development plan, irrespective of the cost of acquiring
and preparing real property for redevelopment; to insure or provide for the
insurance of any real or personal property or operation of the agency against
risks or hazards; and pursuant to [the provisions of ]KRS 99.450 to rent,
maintain, manage, operate, and repair the[such] real property;
(e) To borrow from and to accept loans and grants from the federal government
or any of its agencies[agency thereof], or from any sources, public or private,
for the purposes of KRS 99.330 to 99.510, and to pledge any[such] security
that[as] may be required; an agency, notwithstanding the provisions of any
Page 103 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
other law, may include in any contract for financial assistance with the federal
government any conditions which the federal government may attach to its
financial aid of a redevelopment project, not inconsistent with the purposes of
KRS 99.330 to 99.510;
(f) Within its area of operation, to develop as a building site or sites, any real
property owned or acquired by it, and in this connection to cause streets and
highways to be laid out and graded, and pavements or other road surfacing,
sidewalks and curbs, and public utilities of every kind to be constructed and
installed, or to close any streets according to the development plan;
(g) Within its area of operation, to prepare [from time to time ]plans for the
improvement or rehabilitation of slum and blighted areas; to make,
periodically, investigations and surveys pertaining to slum clearance and
urban redevelopment;
(h) To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any funds not
required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which
savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to purchase its
bonds at a price not more than the principal amount [thereof ]and accrued
interest, all bonds so purchased to be canceled;
(i) To obligate lessees or purchasers of land acquired in a redevelopment project
to:
1. [To ]Use the[such] land for the purpose designated in the development
plan;
2. [to ]Begin the building of specified improvements within a period of
time which the agency fixes as reasonable; and[ to ]
3. Comply with any[such] other conditions that[as] in the opinion of the
agency are necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS 99.330 to
99.510.[;] The agency, by provision in the contract, deed, or lease may
Page 104 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
make any of the purchaser's obligations covenants or conditions running
with the land, whose breach shall cause the fee to revert to the agency;
(j) To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers [herein ]granted in
this section; and
(k) To expend public funds for the rehabilitation of private property within the
agency's area of operation through loans or grants to the owners or occupants
of the[such] property.
(2) [Nothing contained in ]This section shall not authorize an[such] agency to
construct any of the buildings for residential, commercial, industrial, or other use
contemplated by the development plan.
Section 71. KRS 99.420 is amended to read as follows:
Whenever in the opinion of the agency, land or other property, right of way, or easement
over or through any property is needed by the agency in order to accomplish the purposes
of KRS 99.330 to 99.510, it may by resolution authorize the purchase[ or condemnation]
in the name of the agency, of the land or other property, or right of way or easement
necessary for the purpose[, and may proceed to condemn and acquire the property
pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky].
Section 72. KRS 99.565 is amended to read as follows:
The council of any community[,] whose agency has received certification of availability
of federal funds pursuant to section 101(c) of the National Housing Act of 1949, as
amended, may authorize the agency to:
(1) Acquire[,] by[ eminent domain,] purchase, gift, grant, devise, or otherwise, any real
property in the development area or urban renewal area without regard to [the
conditions, restrictions, or provisions set forth in ]KRS 99.370[,] or any other
section of this chapter[;] if it finds by resolution that it is desirable and feasible to
obtain federal financial assistance authorized by section 403 of the Housing Act of
1959 in acquiring the[such] real property;[,] and[ to ]
Page 105 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(2) Sell, grant, and convey [any such ]real property if by resolution the agency consents
to its[the] disposal[ thereof].
Section 73. KRS 99.650 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each agency created under the terms of KRS 99.610 to 99.680 shall constitute a
public body corporate and politic[,] exercising public and essential governmental
functions[,] and shall have all of the powers necessary and convenient to carry out
and effectuate the purposes and provisions of KRS 99.610 to 99.680 including but
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following powers in addition to
other powers granted herein and by other statutory authority:
(a) To sue and be sued; to have a seal; to make and execute contracts and other
instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers;
(b) To make, [and from time to time ]amend, and repeal bylaws, rules, and
regulations not inconsistent with KRS 99.610 to 99.680, to carry into effect
the powers and purposes of those sections[thereof], subject to approval,
amendment, or modification by the governing board;
(c) To select and appoint [such ]officers, agents, counsel, and employees,
permanent and temporary, as it may require, and determine their
qualifications, duties, and compensation, subject, however, to the provisions
of its budget;
(d) Within the jurisdiction of the city in which it is established, and for the
purpose of developing a project area or areas, to purchase, lease, obtain option
upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any real or personal
property or any interest in property[therein], together with any improvements
on the property[thereon]; to clear any and all buildings, structures, or other
improvements from any real property so acquired; to renovate or rehabilitate
any improvements to such real property so acquired and to dispose of any
personal property resulting from the acquisition or sale[therefrom]; to
Page 106 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
develop and construct residential housing for persons and families of lower
income; to sell, lease, exchange, subdivide, transfer, assign, pledge, encumber
by mortgage, deed of trust or otherwise, or otherwise to dispose of any real or
personal property or any interest in property[therein] at its fair value for uses
in accordance with the development plan, irrespective of the cost of acquiring
and preparing the[said] property; to insure or provide for the insurance of any
real or personal property or operation of the agency against risks or hazards;
and pursuant to [the provisions of ]KRS 99.610 to 99.680, to rent, maintain,
manage, operate, and repair any[such] real property and any improvements to
the property[thereto];
(e) Within the jurisdiction of the city in which it is established, and for the
purpose of developing a project area or areas: to make or participate in the
making of construction, land development, mortgage, and rehabilitation loans
and to purchase or participate in the purchase of construction, land
development, mortgage, and rehabilitation loans for residential housing
projects;[,] provided, however, that those[such] loans shall be made only
upon the determination by the agency that the[such] loans are not otherwise
available, wholly or in part, from a private lender upon reasonably equivalent
terms and conditions; to insure or reinsure construction, land development,
mortgage, and rehabilitation loans on residential housing projects; provided,
however, that any such insurance or reinsurance shall be made only upon the
determination by the agency that such insurance or reinsurance is not
otherwise available wholly or in part from private insurers upon reasonably
equivalent terms and conditions; to make grants from appropriated funds, and
any other funds from any source available to the agency, to builders,
developers, and owners of residential housing for the development,
construction, rehabilitation, or maintenance of residential housing and such
Page 107 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
facilities related thereto as the agency shall deem important for a proper living
environment, all on such terms and conditions as may be deemed appropriate
by the agency; to sell, at public or private sale, all or any part of any mortgage
or other instrument or document securing a construction land development, or
rehabilitation loan for residential housing projects of any type, appropriate to
the purpose of the agency; to consent, whenever it deems it necessary or
desirable in the fulfillment of its corporate purposes, to the modification of the
rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or
any other terms, of any mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment,
construction or land development loan, rehabilitation loan, contract, or
agreement of any kind relating to residential housing projects to which the
agency is a party;
(f) Within a project area, to cause streets and highways to be laid out and graded,
and pavements or other road surfacing, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, storm
sewers, and public utilities of every kind to be improved, constructed, and
installed and to close any streets according to the development plan;
(g) To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any funds not
required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which banks
or insurance companies may legally invest funds subject to their control; to
purchase its bonds at a price not more than the principal amount [thereof ]and
accrued interest, all bonds so purchased to be canceled;
(h) To obligate lessees or purchasers of land acquired in a project to:
1. [(1) to ]Use such land for the purpose designated in the development
plan;
2. [(2) to ]Begin the building of specified improvements or renovation of
existing improvement within a period of time which the agency fixes as
reasonable; and
Page 108 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
3. [(3) to ]Comply with any[such] other conditions that[as] in the opinion
of the agency are necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS 99.610 to
99.680.[;] The agency, by provision in the contract, deed, or lease may
make any of the purchaser's obligations, covenants, or conditions
running with the land, whose breach shall cause the fee to revert to the
agency;
(i) To contract as, and to accept the obligations of, an owner of benefited
property under [the terms of ]KRS 107.010 to 107.220, inclusive;
(j) To exercise all powers granted to governmental agencies under proposed
legislation which deals with the use of "tax increment" revenues and financing
of public purpose projects through the use of the revenues and
financing[thereof];
(k) To exercise all powers granted to governmental agencies by KRS 58.010 to
58.130[58.140], inclusive;
(l) To make periodic grants to reduce principal and interest payments on
mortgages or rentals payable by persons and families of low income;
(m) To rehabilitate, acquire, establish, and operate, lease, and sublease, residential
housing for persons and families of lower income and to enter into agreements
or other transactions with any federal, state, or local government agency for
the purpose of providing adequate living quarters for those[such] persons and
families and to contract to assume the rights, powers, duties, and obligations
of any local housing authority or similar agency of the federal, state, city, or
urban-county governments;
(n) To borrow from and to accept loans and grants from the federal, state, city, or
urban-county governments or any of their agencies[agency thereof], or from
any sources, public or private, for the purposes of KRS 99.610 to 99.680, and
to pledge any[such] security that[as] may be required.[,] An agency,
Page 109 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, may include in any contract
for financial assistance with the federal, state, city, or urban-county
government any conditions which the federal, state, city, or urban-county
government may attach to its financial aid not inconsistent with the purposes
of KRS 99.610 to 99.680; and
(o) To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers [herein ]granted in
this section.
(2) [Nothing contained in ]This section shall not authorize an[such] agency to
construct any of the buildings for residential, commercial, industrial, or other use
contemplated by the development plan, except as to the development and
construction of residential housing for persons and families of lower income and
except insofar as any industrial building may be authorized to be constructed by a
lessee, on behalf of the agency, under [the provisions of ]KRS 103.200 to 103.285,
inclusive.
Section 74. KRS 99.785 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 99.780 to 99.855, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Abandoned and blighted property" means a residential, commercial, or industrial
building that has been continuously vacant for at least one (1) year with repeated
housing, building, or nuisance code citations and at least three (3) of the following
conditions:
(a) The building has not been brought into compliance with the housing, building,
or nuisance code requirements of the local government in which it is located
within time constraints placed upon the owner by the appropriate code
enforcement agency or agencies;
(b) The building is unfit for human habitation, occupancy, or use;
(c) The condition and vacancy of the building materially increases the risk of fire
to the building and to adjacent properties;
Page 110 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(d) The building, by reason of neglect or lack of maintenance, has become a place
for the accumulation of substantial trash and debris or a haven for rodents or
other vermin that create potential health and safety hazards;
(e) The building is subject to unauthorized entry leading to potential health and
safety hazards, and either the owner has failed to take reasonable and
necessary measures to secure the building or the local government has secured
the building in order to prevent such hazards after the owner has failed to do
so;
(f) The building is an attractive nuisance to children or for illicit purposes,
including drug use and vagrancy; or
(g) The building, because of its dilapidated appearance or other conditions,
substantially negatively affects the economic well-being of residents or
businesses in close proximity to the building;
(2) "Actively marketed" means:
(a) A "for sale" sign has been placed on the property with accurate contact
information;
(b) The owner has engaged the services of a licensed real estate agent, placed
weekly or more frequent advertisements in print, or listed the property for sale
in electronic media via a website[Web site] specifically designed for
that[such] activity; and
(c) The owner has made a good-faith effort to sell the property at a price that
reflects the circumstances and market conditions;
(3) "Building" means a residential, commercial, or industrial building or structure and
the land appurtenant thereto;
(4) "Competent entity" means a person or entity, including a nonprofit corporation,
with experience in the rehabilitation of residential, commercial, or industrial
buildings and the ability to provide or obtain the necessary financing for the[such]
Page 111 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
rehabilitation;
(5) "Conservator" means a competent entity appointed by a court to take possession of
and undertake the rehabilitation of an abandoned and blighted building;
(6) "Conservator's fee" for rehabilitation or demolition of an abandoned and blighted
building means a fee equal to the greater of:
(a) A reasonable amount not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the actual costs
incurred by a conservator for rehabilitation or demolition of the building as
described in the plan for rehabilitation or demolition approved by the court; or
(b) Fifteen percent (15%) of the sale price of the property;
(7) "Costs of rehabilitation" means costs and expenses for construction, stabilization,
rehabilitation, maintenance, or demolition, including reasonable nonconstruction
costs associated with the project, including but not limited to architectural,
engineering, legal fees and costs, permits, financing fees, and a conservator's fee;
(8) "Historic structure" means a property which is listed on the National Register of
Historic Places, is a contributing property in a national register historic district, or is
designated an historic property by the Kentucky Heritage Council;
(9) "Immediate family" means a parent, spouse, child, brother, or sister;
(10) "Local government" means any city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, unified local government, or charter county[has
the same meaning as in KRS 99.705];
(11) "Nonprofit corporation" means a corporation recognized by the United States
Internal Revenue Service as being tax exempt under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c) that has,
as one (1) of its purposes, remediation of blight, economic development, historic
preservation, or the promotion or enhancement of affordable housing opportunities;
(12) "Owner":
(a) Means the holder or holders of title to, or of a legal or equitable interest in, a
residential, commercial, or industrial building for six (6) months or more; and
Page 112 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(b) Includes an heir, assignee, trustee, beneficiary, and lessee, provided the
ownership interest is a matter of public record;
(13) "Party in interest" means a person or entity that has a direct and immediate interest
in a residential, commercial, or industrial building, including:
(a) The owner;
(b) Any lienholder with a recorded interest in the property; and
(c) The city and county in which the building is located;
(14) "Rehabilitation" means improvements to a building in order to bring it into
compliance with all applicable housing, building, and nuisance code requirements;
and
(15) "Vacant" means abandoned, unoccupied, or empty continuously for at least one (1)
year, excluding unauthorized or illegal occupancies.
Section 75. KRS 103.2101 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the state local debt officer to review only those projects
authorized by KRS 103.200(1) (k), (l), (m), and (n), and only off-street parking
facilities, cable television, and mass communication facilities as authorized by KRS
103.200(1)(b), whether by cities, counties, urban-county governments, air boards,
or riverport authorities. The Kentucky Private Activity Bond Allocation Committee
shall review only those projects to be issued by the Kentucky Economic
Development Finance Authority and authorized by KRS 103.200(1) (k), (l), (m),
and (n). [Such ]Review shall include but need not be limited to the following:
(a) Whether the project creates long-term economic growth, creates or retains
jobs in a previously designated empowerment or enterprise zone, or aids in
the prevention or elimination of slums or blight;
(b) Whether there is substantiating documentation to demonstrate that the project
places an unjustified competitive disadvantage on existing business in the
area;
Page 113 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) Whether there is substantiating documentation to demonstrate that normal
commercial financing is unavailable for this project or, if available, at what
rates it must be secured and under what terms and conditions;
(d) If the project is in accord with the intent of KRS 103.200 to 103.285 and[,]
this section[, and KRS 103.2451]; and
(e) The project's economic soundness.
(2) If the committee or the state local debt officer finds that the project does not meet
all of the above listed criteria, it shall deny approval of the project until the
objections to the project[thereto] have been met.
(3) The committee and the state local debt officer may require the submission of
testimony, project data, or any other information deemed appropriate with regard to
any project submitted to it for approval.
(4) The committee and the state local debt officer, within fourteen (14) days of
receiving an application, shall notify in writing the agency or unit of government
proposing the issuance of bonds, the appropriate county judge/executive, mayor,
and school superintendent, and the developers of the project of the date on which
the project will be considered by the committee at a public hearing. Any person
may attend the hearing and may personally, or through counsel, address the
committee with regard to the project and make recommendations to the committee
about the project[thereon]. Notice shall be given to the agency or unit of
government proposing to issue the bonds and the developers of the project not less
than forty-five (45) days before the date the committee has set for the hearing on
the project. The agency or unit of government proposing the issuance of the bonds
shall publish notice of the hearing in the manner required by KRS Chapter 424. The
agency or unit of government proposing the issuance of the bonds shall require the
developer of the project, [(]if it is other than the agency or unit of government,[)] to
reimburse the agency or unit of government for the cost of the advertising required
Page 114 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
by this subsection[herein]. A hearing officer may conduct the hearing with a
proposed order to the committee or the state local debt officer.
(5) The committee and the state local debt officer shall have the right to approve or
disapprove any project submitted to it, and over which it has jurisdiction as
described in subsection (1) of this section, and no bonds or other evidence of
indebtedness for any [such ]project shall be issued until the project has been
approved by the committee.
(6) When the revenues of the respective local government or school district are
negatively impacted by the project, the committee and the state local debt officer
shall require submission of a written statement of assurance that the appropriate
county judge/executive, mayor, and school superintendent are in agreement with the
negotiated financial arrangement. This written statement of assurance shall be used
for advisory purposes.
(7) The maximum length of any bond authorization under this section shall not exceed
the anticipated useful life of the building or equipment purchased or forty (40)
years, whichever is shorter.
Section 76. KRS 103.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to promote the economic development of the Commonwealth, to relieve
conditions of unemployment, to encourage the increase of industry in this state, and
to aid in the retention of existing industry through improved energy efficiency in
manufacturing facilities, or through conversion of energy facilities to more readily
available fuels, any city or county may borrow money and issue negotiable bonds
for the purpose of defraying the cost of acquiring any industrial building or
pollution control facility, either by purchase or construction, but only after an
ordinance or resolution has been adopted by the legislative body of the city or the
fiscal court of the county, or by the Kentucky Economic Development Finance
Authority, if requested by the legislative body of the city or the fiscal court of the
Page 115 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
county, as the case may be, specifying the proposed undertaking, the maximum
amount of bonds to be outstanding at any one (1) time, and the maximum rate of
interest the bonds are to bear. This section shall not be deemed to require, however,
that the[such] ordinance or resolution be adopted prior to interim financing of the
project, if the[such] interim financing was undertaken by the proposed lessee
corporation upon the basis of discussions between the corporation and responsible
officials of the issuer which were later formally ratified by the appropriate
governing body of the issuer.
(2) The ordinance or resolution shall further provide that the industrial building or the
pollution control facility is to be acquired pursuant to [the provisions of ]KRS
103.200 to 103.285. Each [such ]bond-authorizing ordinance or resolution shall be
effective only after publication, in a newspaper authorized to publish official
advertisements for the issuer, of the title to the[said] ordinance or resolution,
together with a statement signed by the clerk of the issuer setting forth the
maximum amount of bonds to be outstanding at any one (1) time, the name of the
lessee corporation, and the fact that the bonds are to be retired from the proceeds of
either the lease payments as set forth in KRS 103.200 to 103.285, inclusive, or the
loan payments or sale payments in the event the industrial building financing
transaction is carried out pursuant to a loan agreement, sale agreement, or other tax
incentive agreement. A[No] publication of the complete ordinance or resolution
shall not be required, but the[said] ordinance or resolution shall be entered upon the
records of the issuer and shall be available for public inspection.
(3) Any industrial buildings financed by bonds pursuant to KRS 103.200 to 103.285
and leased in connection with the bond financing from a tax-exempt governmental
unit[,] or tax-exempt statutory authority[,] shall require the prior approval by the
Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority of the reduced ad valorem tax
for industrial buildings under KRS 132.020, the standards for which the Kentucky
Page 116 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Economic Development Finance Authority shall establish through its operating
procedures, or by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A. The authority shall consider[,] along with other indicators[,]
when establishing standards[,] the number of jobs to be created, the amount of
capital to be invested, and the wages and benefits to be paid.
(4) The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, any air board established
pursuant to KRS 183.132, and any riverport authority established as provided in
KRS 65.510 to 65.650, inclusive, shall have and possess all power and authority
granted to cities and counties by [the provisions of ]KRS 103.200 to 103.285[,
excluding condemnation powers under KRS 103.245,] for the financing of
industrial buildings. For those[such] purposes, the terms "city," "county," and
"issuer" as used in KRS 103.200 to 103.285, inclusive, shall also mean and refer to
the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, any air board established
pursuant to KRS 183.132, and any riverport authority established as provided in
KRS 65.510 to 65.650. The power and authority granted to the Kentucky Economic
Development Finance Authority, any air board, and any riverport authority shall be
and constitute an additional and alternative grant of power and authority to such
governmental agencies, and shall not be construed as being in derogation of any
other powers vested in each of such governmental agencies.
Section 77. KRS 103.245 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section[For purposes of the exercise of the power of eminent
domain], "building" or "industrial building" shall be deemed to include only the
following: coal conversion facilities, hospitals, primary medical centers, health
care clinics, convention centers, or any industrial building as defined in KRS
103.200, which is to be located in a blighted area as defined in KRS 99.010(1)(a),
or any of these things, to be rented or leased to a domestic or foreign corporation by
the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority, the city or the county by
Page 117 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
which it is acquired.
(2) An industrial building [within the meaning of subsection (1) of this section ]may be
acquired by a city or a county by purchase or[,] gift[, or condemnation]. Whenever
a city or a county determines[shall determine] that land or other property, right of
way, or easement over or through any property is needed [by such city or county, as
the case may be, ]to accomplish the purposes of KRS 103.210 to 103.285, inclusive,
it may by ordinance or resolution authorize the purchase[ or condemnation, in the
name of such city or county,] of that[said] land or other property, [or ]right of way,
or easement in the name of the city or county[necessary for such purposes, and
may proceed to condemn and acquire such property in the manner set forth in the
Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. All property, rights of way and easements
already held by its owner or lessee for industrial development shall be exempt from
condemnation under this section].
Section 78. KRS 104.550 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If no suit is filed against the secretary under KRS 104.540, or if suit is filed and
final judgment in the Circuit Court or on appeal is in favor of the secretary, the
secretary shall immediately[forthwith] declare the district organized into a flood
control district and give it a corporate name as provided in KRS 104.490, by which
in all proceedings it shall thereafter be known.
(2) The secretary shall certify his or her act to the county clerk of each county in which
any part of the district is located[,] and to the Secretary of State, each of whom shall
record the certificate as articles of incorporation. The secretary shall also certify his
or her act to the county judge/executive of each county in which any part of the
district is located.
(3) The district shall then be a political subdivision and shall have perpetual existence,
with power to sue and be sued, contract and be contracted with, incur liabilities and
obligations,[ exercise the right of eminent domain,] assess, tax, issue bonds, and do
Page 118 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
and perform all acts expressly authorized in KRS 104.450 to 104.680 and all acts
necessary and proper for the carrying out of the purpose for which the district was
created, and for executing the powers with which it is invested.
Section 79. KRS 107.370 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to its general powers specified in KRS 107.310 to 107.500, the board,
after approval of any proposed project by resolution of the fiscal court, shall have
power to finance and construct buildings and related facilities for the joint or
separate use of any one (1) or more of the governmental units within the territorial
limits of the county, or of federal agencies, and to convey or lease those[said]
buildings and facilities in whole or in part, or space therein, to [said ]governmental
units or federal agencies in accordance with [the provisions of ]KRS 107.310 to
107.500. The board may cause any [such ]building and related facilities to be
designed in anticipation of reasonably foreseeable future needs; and to the extent
the capacity of the building or facilities[thereof] may be surplus to needs existing
at the time of occupancy, any[such] surplus capacity may be leased to
nongovernmental persons or parties, subject to cancellation upon reasonable notice
when the[such] capacity or facilities shall be required for the purposes of
governmental units.
(2) The[Said] board shall have the government, management, regulation, control and
operation of any buildings financed, constructed, and leased pursuant to [the
provisions of ]KRS 107.310 to 107.500 and shall have the power to improve,
reconstruct, repair, and maintain the[said] buildings and all additions to them.[
thereto; provided,] However, [that ]the board may contract with the lessee of any
building for the maintenance and operation of the[such] building.
(3) The board shall also have power, acting in the name of the district, as follows:
(a)[(1)] To [condemn, ]appropriate, lease, rent, purchase, and hold any real
estate, regardless of whether [the same be then ]held for a governmental or
Page 119 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
public use, and materials or personal property needed or deemed useful in
connection with buildings constructed or to be constructed pursuant to KRS
107.310 to 107.500;
(b)[(2)] To enter upon any lots or lands for the purpose of surveying or
examining them[the same] for a proper public purpose under KRS 107.310 to
107.500;
(c)[(3)] To design, order, contract for, [and ]construct, reconstruct, and maintain
[such ]buildings and related facilities and to make all necessary or desirable
improvements to the grounds and premises under its control;
(d)[(4)] To determine, allocate, and adjust space in [said ]buildings to be used by
any governmental unit;
(e)[(5)] To construct, maintain, and operate auditoriums, public meeting places,
and parking facilities in conjunction with or as a part of the[said] buildings;
(f)[(6)] To operate any [such ]buildings, to receive and collect any moneys due
on account of their[such] operation or otherwise relating to the[such]
buildings and to expend [such ]moneys for proper purposes; and in connection
with operations[therewith] to let concessions for the operation of restaurants,
cafeterias, public telephones, news and cigar stands, and vending machines,
which[the above concessions for operations of said restaurants, cafeterias,
public telephones, news and cigar stands and vending machines] shall be let
on open and competitive bidding, and to employ any[such] managers,
superintendents, architects, engineers, attorneys, auditors, clerks,
forepersons[foremen], custodians, and other employees, as it may deem
necessary for the proper carrying on and operation of any [such ]buildings and
to fix compensation of all [such ]employees; provided, however, that no
contract of employment shall be made for a longer fixed period than four (4)
years, but may be extended or renewed [from time to time ]thereafter; and
Page 120 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(g)[(7)] To make and enter into all leases, contracts, and other agreements
necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of
its powers under KRS 107.310 to 107.500.
Section 80. KRS 107.450 is amended to read as follows:
The district is authorized to defray the cost of acquiring any real or personal property for
the purposes contemplated by KRS 107.310 to 107.500 through the issuance of revenue
bonds, and for that purpose the district shall have all the powers and duties that are
granted to or imposed upon governmental units by law, including specifically those
in[the terms and provisions of] KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140].
Section 81. KRS 108.010 is amended to read as follows:
To serve the public interest and provide a means of meeting problems of local
government in urban areas, there may be established and operated under [the provisions
of ]this chapter an urban services district. Such a district shall be a public body corporate
and political subdivision, with power to adopt and use a corporate seal, sue and be sued,
contract and be contracted with, and in other ways to function as a municipal corporation
or a natural person within the purview of this chapter. In addition to the general grants of
power of this chapter, an urban services[such a] district shall have the specific authority
provided for in KRS Chapters 58, 66, 79 and 107.[ The district shall have the power of
eminent domain and shall follow the procedures outlined in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky.]
Section 82. KRS 109.041 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other powers enumerated in Chapter 67 and other sections of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes, counties, acting by and through their fiscal courts, may
own and hold the permit for, plan, initiate, acquire, construct, and maintain solid
waste management facilities, enter into contracts or leases with private parties for
the design, construction, or operation of a publicly-owned solid waste management
facility, and adopt administrative regulations with respect thereto in accordance
Page 121 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
with this chapter. It is hereby determined and declared that in the implementation,
acquisition, financing, and maintenance of solid waste management facilities, and
in the enforcement of their use, counties will be performing state functions duly
delegated to them for the public welfare. In that[such] regard, the right of counties[
to condemn land necessary for the acquisition of solid waste management facilities
pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky and] to exercise the police power
in respect thereto is confirmed. Any county may contract with third parties for the
management by public or private means of solid waste within the county.
(2) A[No] solid waste management facility shall not be acquired and constructed until
its[the] construction [thereof ]has been approved in writing by the cabinet. Planning
for a solid waste management facility shall be conducted in accordance with the
policy [set forth ]in KRS 109.011(7) and KRS Chapter 224.
(3) A[No] county or waste management district shall not prohibit or otherwise restrict
materials recovery by:
(a) Any materials recovery operation in existence in the county or district on the
effective date of the mandatory program;
(b) Any person supplying material to materials recovery operations on the
effective date of the mandatory program;
(c) Any new materials recovery operation that reclaims the same type of
materials as materials recovery operations included in paragraph (a) of this
subsection;
(d) Any new suppliers to materials recovery operations included in paragraphs (a)
and (c) of this subsection;
(e) Any materials recovery operation for glass, plastic, or metal beverage
containers, unless a commitment has been made by a local government or
other political subdivision of the state, by ordinance or contract, to a solid
waste project consistent with [the provisions of ]this chapter, that is dependent
Page 122 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
upon the materials recovery of glass, plastic, or metal beverage containers to
meet its financial obligations for the[said] project, and the[such] commitment
has been made prior to the operation of any other [such ]materials recovery
facility in the county or district;
(f) Any other materials recovery operation within the county or district not
included in paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection, or the supply of
materials to such operation, unless it is established that the[such] operation
would jeopardize the ability of a local government or other political
subdivision of the state to meet financial obligations incurred in the
maintenance, operation, or amortization of capital acquisition costs for a solid
waste management facility; or
(g) In a county containing a consolidated local government, any municipality
located within the geographic area of the county or waste management district
created to serve that county.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the
contrary, a[no] county or waste management district shall not regulate special
wastes as defined in KRS 224.50-760, other than sludge from water and waste
water treatment facilities as it pertains to landfarming, or solid waste from
agricultural or mining operations.
(5) Any county undertaking the planning, implementation, construction, installation,
acquisition, and financing of a solid waste management facility pursuant to this
chapter shall have the authority [set forth ]in Chapter 58 of the Kentucky Revised
Statutes concerning the financing of a[such] solid waste management facility,
including the authority to promulgate, enforce, and collect reasonable rates, rentals,
and charges for the use of a[such] solid waste management facility.
(6) Bonds authorized to be issued by any county pursuant to [the authority of ]this
chapter for the financing of solid waste management facilities may be sold at either
Page 123 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
private or public sale as may in the sound discretion of the county be in the best
interests of the county.
(7) Any county undertaking solid waste management pursuant to [the provisions of
]this chapter may contract with any person for the provision of solid waste
management services. A county may contract with any city to provide solid waste
management services or may delegate the responsibility for solid waste
management within incorporated areas to a city when the city agrees to assume
that[such] responsibility. In connection with solid waste management, any county
may enter into contracts with any person for any term of years.
(8) Counties are authorized to charge a reasonable fee to transporters for the handling
of their waste at a solid waste management facility approved by the cabinet.
(9) Counties are authorized to sell or market materials and energy recovered from solid
waste and to enter into long-term contracts guaranteeing supply to insure markets
for the sale of recovered products.
(10) In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, counties shall be subject to standards
set by regulations adopted by the cabinet on waste management pursuant to KRS
Chapter 224.
(11) A[No] county or waste management district shall not prohibit long-term contracts
by ordinance or other means.
(12) Counties are expressly authorized in addition to the powers enumerated in KRS
Chapter 65 and this chapter to contract with one another in order to regionalize
solid waste management to the maximum extent practicable.
(13) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a fiscal court may[,] by ordinance[,]
create a solid waste district to exercise the powers of the county pursuant to this
chapter, except that a district created for this purpose shall not levy or collect ad
valorem property taxes.
(14) If a city within a county containing a consolidated local government is in
Page 124 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
conformity with the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C.
secs. 6901 et seq., and is in conformity with all state statutes and administrative
regulations applicable to the collection, management, and treatment of solid waste
and resource recovery therefrom, the consolidated local government or waste
management district serving the county containing the consolidated local
government shall not[,] directly or indirectly[,] hinder, delay, impair, prohibit, or
impede any city or its contractors and agents from accessing, utilizing, and
otherwise using any solid waste management facility for the disposal of solid waste.
The consolidated local government or waste management district shall not charge a
city within the county containing the consolidated local government, or the city's
contractors and agents, directly or indirectly, any fee that is based, directly or
indirectly, on the composition of the solid waste stream of that city if the solid
waste stream is in conformity with state and federal law for the use of the solid
waste management facility receiving the waste.
Section 83. KRS 141.019 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of taxpayers other than corporations:
(1) Adjusted gross income shall be calculated by subtracting from the gross income of
those taxpayers the deductions allowed individuals by Section 62 of the Internal
Revenue Code and adjusting as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude income from supplemental annuities provided by the Railroad
Retirement Act of 1937 as amended and which are subject to federal income
tax by Pub. L. No. 89-699;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and their
political subdivisions[ thereof];
(d) Exclude employee pension contributions picked up as provided for in KRS
Page 125 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
6.505, 16.545, 21.360, 61.523, 61.560, 65.155, 67A.320, 67A.510, 78.610,
and 161.540 upon a ruling by the Internal Revenue Service or the federal
courts that these contributions shall not be included as gross income until such
time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee;
(e) Exclude Social Security and railroad retirement benefits subject to federal
income tax;
(f) Exclude any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit
brought against a manufacturer or distributor of "Agent Orange" for damages
resulting from exposure to Agent Orange by a member or veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who
served in Vietnam;
(g) 1. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, but before
January 1, 2018, exclude up to forty-one thousand one hundred ten
dollars ($41,110) of total distributions from pension plans, annuity
contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans; and
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, exclude
up to thirty-one thousand one hundred ten dollars ($31,110) of
total distributions from pension plans, annuity contracts, profit-
sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings plans.
2. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Annuity contract" has the same meaning as [set forth ]in Section
1035 of the Internal Revenue Code;
b. "Distributions" includes but is not limited to any lump-sum
distribution from pension or profit-sharing plans qualifying for the
income tax averaging provisions of Section 402 of the Internal
Revenue Code; any distribution from an individual retirement
Page 126 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
account as defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
and any disability pension distribution; and
c. "Pension plans, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans" means any trust or other entity created or organized
under a written retirement plan and forming part of a stock bonus,
pension, or profit-sharing plan of a public or private employer for
the exclusive benefit of employees or their beneficiaries and
includes plans qualified or unqualified under Section 401 of the
Internal Revenue Code and individual retirement accounts as
defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(h) 1. a. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation subject to the franchise tax imposed
under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS
136.300; and
b. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation related to a qualified subchapter S
subsidiary subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS
136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300.
2. The shareholder's basis of stock held in an S corporation where the S
corporation or its qualified subchapter S subsidiary is subject to the
franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax
imposed under KRS 136.300 shall be the same as the basis for federal
income tax purposes;
(i) Exclude income received for services performed as a precinct worker for
election training or for working at election booths in state, county, and local
primaries or regular or special elections;
(j)[ Exclude any capital gains income attributable to property taken by eminent
Page 127 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
domain;
(k)] 1. Exclude all income from all sources for members of the Armed Forces
who are on active duty and who are killed in the line of duty, for the
year during which the death occurred and the year prior to the year
during which the death occurred.
2. For the purposes of this paragraph, "all income from all sources" shall
include all federal and state death benefits payable to the estate or any
beneficiaries;
(k)[(l)] Exclude all military pay received by members of the Armed Forces
while on active duty;
(l)[(m)] 1. Include the amount deducted for depreciation under 26 U.S.C. sec.
167 or 168; and
2. Exclude the amounts allowed by KRS 141.0101 for depreciation;
(m)[(n)] Include the amount deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 199A;
(n)[(o)] Ignore any change in the cost basis of the surviving spouse's share of
property owned by a Kentucky community property trust occurring for federal
income tax purposes as a result of the death of the predeceasing spouse;
(o)[(p)] Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276
and 278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions
attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated with those loans for
taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;
and
(p)[(q)] For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before
March 11, 2023, allow the same treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in
accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those
grants, and tax attributes associated with those grants; and
Page 128 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from adjusted gross income all the
deductions allowed individuals by Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, as
modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
(a) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 164 for taxes;
(b) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 165 for losses, except wagering
losses allowed under Section 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 213 for medical care expenses;
(d) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 217 for moving expenses;
(e) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 67 for any other miscellaneous
deduction;
(f) Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for amounts allowable
under KRS 140.090(1)(h) in calculating the value of the distributive shares of
the estate of a decedent, unless there is filed with the income return a
statement that the deduction has not been claimed under KRS 140.090(1)(h);
(g) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 151 for personal exemptions and
any other deductions in lieu thereof;
(h) Any deduction allowed for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the civil
rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal membership
and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages, or accommodations to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, or sex, except nothing shall be construed to deny a deduction
for amounts paid to any religious or denominational club, group, or
establishment or any organization operated solely for charitable or educational
purposes which restricts membership to persons of the same religion or
denomination in order to promote the religious principles for which it is
Page 129 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
established and maintained; and
(i) A taxpayer may elect to claim the standard deduction allowed by KRS
141.081 instead of itemized deductions allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 63
and as modified by this section.
Section 84. KRS 141.900 is amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section are the same as the definitions appearing in KRS 141.010
prior to its repeal and reenactment in Section 53 of 2018 Ky. Acts chs. 171 and 207. For
taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2018, as used in this chapter, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(3) "Internal Revenue Code" means the Internal Revenue Code in effect on December
31, 2015, exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to that date, other than
amendments that extend provisions in effect on December 31, 2015, that would
otherwise terminate, and as modified by KRS 141.0101;
(4) "Dependent" means those persons defined as dependents in the Internal Revenue
Code;
(5) "Fiduciary" means ["]fiduciary["] as defined in Section 7701(a)(6) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(6) "Fiscal year" means ["]fiscal year["] as defined in Section 7701(a)(24) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(7) "Individual" means a natural person;
(8) "Modified gross income" means the greater of:
(a) Adjusted gross income as defined in Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, including any subsequent amendments in effect on December 31 of
the taxable year, and adjusted as follows:
1. Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and
Page 130 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
political subdivisions thereof; and
2. Include lump-sum pension distributions taxed under the special
transition rules of Pub. L. No. 104-188, sec. 1401(c)(2); or
(b) Adjusted gross income as defined in subsection (10) of this section and
adjusted to include lump-sum pension distributions taxed under the special
transition rules of Pub. L. No. 104-188, sec. 1401(c)(2);
(9) "Gross income," in the case of taxpayers other than corporations, means ["]gross
income["] as defined in Section 61 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(10) "Adjusted gross income," in the case of taxpayers other than corporations, means
gross income as defined in subsection (9) of this section minus the deductions
allowed individuals by Section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code and as modified by
KRS 141.0101 and adjusted as follows, except that deductions shall be limited to
amounts allocable to income subject to taxation under the provisions of this chapter,
and except that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the same item to
be deducted more than once:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States and
Kentucky;
(b) Exclude income from supplemental annuities provided by the Railroad
Retirement Act of 1937 as amended and which are subject to federal income
tax by Public Law 89-699;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude employee pension contributions picked up as provided for in KRS
6.505, 16.545, 21.360, 61.523, 61.560, 65.155, 67A.320, 67A.510, 78.610,
and 161.540 upon a ruling by the Internal Revenue Service or the federal
courts that these contributions shall not be included as gross income until such
Page 131 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee;
(e) Exclude Social Security and railroad retirement benefits subject to federal
income tax;
(f) Include, for taxable years ending before January 1, 1991, all overpayments of
federal income tax refunded or credited for taxable years;
(g) Deduct, for taxable years ending before January 1, 1991, federal income tax
paid for taxable years ending before January 1, 1990;
(h) Exclude any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit
brought against a manufacturer or distributor of "Agent Orange" for damages
resulting from exposure to Agent Orange by a member or veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who
served in Vietnam;
(i) 1. For taxable years ending prior to December 31, 2005, exclude the
applicable amount of total distributions from pension plans, annuity
contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings
plans. The "applicable amount" shall be:
a. Twenty-five percent (25%), but not more than six thousand two
hundred fifty dollars ($6,250), for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 1994, and before January 1, 1996;
b. Fifty percent (50%), but not more than twelve thousand five
hundred dollars ($12,500), for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 1995, and before January 1, 1997;
c. Seventy-five percent (75%), but not more than eighteen thousand
seven hundred fifty dollars ($18,750), for taxable years beginning
after December 31, 1996, and before January 1, 1998; and
d. One hundred percent (100%), but not more than thirty-five
thousand dollars ($35,000), for taxable years beginning after
Page 132 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
December 31, 1997.
2. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, exclude up to
forty-one thousand one hundred ten dollars ($41,110) of total
distributions from pension plans, annuity contracts, profit-sharing plans,
retirement plans, or employee savings plans.
3. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Distributions" includes but is not limited to any lump-sum
distribution from pension or profit-sharing plans qualifying for the
income tax averaging provisions of Section 402 of the Internal
Revenue Code; any distribution from an individual retirement
account as defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
and any disability pension distribution;
b. "Annuity contract" has the same meaning as [set forth ]in Section
1035 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
c. "Pension plans, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans" means any trust or other entity created or organized
under a written retirement plan and forming part of a stock bonus,
pension, or profit-sharing plan of a public or private employer for
the exclusive benefit of employees or their beneficiaries and
includes plans qualified or unqualified under Section 401 of the
Internal Revenue Code and individual retirement accounts as
defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(j) 1. a. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation subject to the franchise tax imposed
under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS
136.300; and
b. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
Page 133 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
income from an S corporation related to a qualified subchapter S
subsidiary subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS
136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300.
2. The shareholder's basis of stock held in a S corporation where the S
corporation or its qualified subchapter S subsidiary is subject to the
franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax
imposed under KRS 136.300 shall be the same as the basis for federal
income tax purposes;
(k) Exclude, to the extent not already excluded from gross income, any amounts
paid for health insurance, or the value of any voucher or similar instrument
used to provide health insurance, which constitutes medical care coverage for
the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and dependents, or for any person
authorized to be provided excludable coverage by the taxpayer pursuant to the
federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-
148, or the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, Pub. L.
No. 111-152, during the taxable year. Any amounts paid by the taxpayer for
health insurance that are excluded pursuant to this paragraph shall not be
allowed as a deduction in computing the taxpayer's net income under
subsection (11) of this section;
(l) Exclude income received for services performed as a precinct worker for
election training or for working at election booths in state, county, and local
primary, regular, or special elections;
(m) Exclude any amount paid during the taxable year for insurance for long-term
care as defined in KRS 304.14-600;
(n) [Exclude any capital gains income attributable to property taken by eminent
domain;
(o) ]Exclude any amount received by a producer of tobacco or a tobacco quota
Page 134 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
owner from the multistate settlement with the tobacco industry, known as the
Master Settlement Agreement, signed on November 22, 1998;
(o)[(p)] Exclude any amount received from the secondary settlement fund,
referred to as "Phase II," established by tobacco companies to compensate
tobacco farmers and quota owners for anticipated financial losses caused by
the national tobacco settlement;
(p)[(q)] Exclude any amount received from funds of the Commodity Credit
Corporation for the Tobacco Loss Assistance Program as a result of a
reduction in the quantity of tobacco quota allotted;
(q)[(r)] Exclude any amount received as a result of a tobacco quota buydown
program that all quota owners and growers are eligible to participate in;
(r)[(s)] Exclude state Phase II payments received by a producer of tobacco or a
tobacco quota owner;
(s)[(t)] Exclude all income from all sources for active duty and reserve
members and officers of the Armed Forces of the United States or National
Guard who are killed in the line of duty, for the year during which the death
occurred and the year prior to the year during which the death occurred. For
the purposes of this paragraph, "all income from all sources" shall include all
federal and state death benefits payable to the estate or any beneficiaries; and
(t)[(u)] For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, exclude all
military pay received by active duty members of the Armed Forces of the
United States, members of reserve components of the Armed Forces of the
United States, and members of the National Guard, including compensation
for state active duty as described in KRS 38.205;
(11) "Net income," in the case of taxpayers other than corporations, means adjusted
gross income as defined in subsection (10) of this section, minus:
(a) The deduction allowed by KRS 141.0202 as it existed prior to January 1,
Page 135 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
2018;
(b) Any amount paid for vouchers or similar instruments that provide health
insurance coverage to employees or their families;
(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, the amount of
domestic production activities deduction calculated at six percent (6%) as
allowed in Section 199(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code for taxable years
beginning before 2010; and
(d) 1. All the deductions allowed individuals by Chapter 1 of the Internal
Revenue Code as modified by KRS 141.0101 except:
a. Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for state or
foreign taxes measured by gross or net income, including state and
local general sales taxes allowed in lieu of state and local income
taxes under the provisions of Section 164(b)(5) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
b. Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for amounts
allowable under KRS 140.090(1)(h) in calculating the value of the
distributive shares of the estate of a decedent, unless there is filed
with the income return a statement that such deduction has not
been claimed under KRS 140.090(1)(h);
c. The deduction for personal exemptions allowed under Section 151
of the Internal Revenue Code and any other deductions in lieu
thereof;
d. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, the
domestic production activities deduction allowed under Section
199 of the Internal Revenue Code;
e. Any deduction for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an
Page 136 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
agency established by the General Assembly and charged with
enforcing the civil rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford
full and equal membership and full and equal enjoyment of its
goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages, or
accommodations to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, or sex, except nothing shall be construed to deny a
deduction for amounts paid to any religious or denominational
club, group, or establishment or any organization operated solely
for charitable or educational purposes which restricts membership
to persons of the same religion or denomination in order to
promote the religious principles for which it is established and
maintained;
f. Any deduction directly or indirectly allocable to income which is
either exempt from taxation or otherwise not taxed under this
chapter;
g. The itemized deduction limitation established in 26 U.S.C. sec. 68
shall be determined using the applicable amount from 26 U.S.C.
sec. 68 as it existed on December 31, 2006; and
h. A taxpayer may elect to claim the standard deduction allowed by
KRS 141.081 instead of itemized deductions allowed pursuant to
26 U.S.C. sec. 63 and as modified by this section; and
2. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the same item to be
deducted more than once;
(12) "Gross income," in the case of corporations, means ["]gross income["] as defined in
Section 61 of the Internal Revenue Code and as modified by KRS 141.0101 and
adjusted as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Page 137 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude all dividend income received after December 31, 1969;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude fifty percent (50%) of gross income derived from any disposal of
coal covered by Section 631(c) of the Internal Revenue Code if the
corporation does not claim any deduction for percentage depletion, or for
expenditures attributable to the making and administering of the contract
under which such disposition occurs or to the preservation of the economic
interests retained under such contract;
(e) Include the amount calculated under KRS 141.205;
(f) Ignore the provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code in
computing gross income;
(g) Exclude income from "safe harbor leases" (Section 168(f)(8) of the Internal
Revenue Code);
(h) Exclude any amount received by a producer of tobacco or a tobacco quota
owner from the multistate settlement with the tobacco industry, known as the
Master Settlement Agreement, signed on November 22, 1998;
(i) Exclude any amount received from the secondary settlement fund, referred to
as "Phase II," established by tobacco companies to compensate tobacco
farmers and quota owners for anticipated financial losses caused by the
national tobacco settlement;
(j) Exclude any amount received from funds of the Commodity Credit
Corporation for the Tobacco Loss Assistance Program as a result of a
reduction in the quantity of tobacco quota allotted;
(k) Exclude any amount received as a result of a tobacco quota buydown program
that all quota owners and growers are eligible to participate in;
Page 138 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(l) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004, and before January 1,
2007, exclude the distributive share income or loss received from a
corporation defined in subsection (24)(b) of this section whose income has
been subject to the tax imposed by KRS 141.040. The exclusion provided in
this paragraph shall also apply to a taxable year that begins prior to January 1,
2005, if the tax imposed by KRS 141.040 is paid on the distributive share
income by a corporation defined in subparagraphs 2. to 8. of subsection
(24)(b) of this section with a return filed for a period of less than twelve (12)
months that begins on or after January 1, 2005, and ends on or before
December 31, 2005. This paragraph shall not be used to delay payment of the
tax imposed by KRS 141.040; and
(m) Exclude state Phase II payments received by a producer of tobacco or a
tobacco quota owner;
(13) "Net income," in the case of corporations, means ["]gross income["] as defined in
subsection (12) of this section minus:
(a) The deduction allowed by KRS 141.0202 as it existed prior to January 1,
2018;
(b) Any amount paid for vouchers or similar instruments that provide health
insurance coverage to employees or their families;
(c) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, the amount of
domestic production activities deduction calculated at six percent (6%) as
allowed in Section 199(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code for taxable years
beginning before 2010; and
(d) All the deductions from gross income allowed corporations by Chapter 1 of
the Internal Revenue Code and as modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
1. Any deduction for a state tax which is computed, in whole or in part, by
reference to gross or net income and which is paid or accrued to any
Page 139 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth
of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of the United States, or to any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof;
2. The deductions contained in Sections 243, 245, and 247 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
3. The provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be
ignored in computing net income;
4. Any deduction directly or indirectly allocable to income which is either
exempt from taxation or otherwise not taxed under the provisions of this
chapter, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit the
same item to be deducted more than once;
5. Exclude expenses related to "safe harbor leases" (Section 168(f)(8) of
the Internal Revenue Code);
6. Any deduction for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the
civil rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal
membership and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services,
facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations to any person
because of race, color, religion, national origin, or sex, except nothing
shall be construed to deny a deduction for amounts paid to any religious
or denominational club, group, or establishment or any organization
operated solely for charitable or educational purposes which restricts
membership to persons of the same religion or denomination in order to
promote the religious principles for which it is established and
maintained;
7. Any deduction prohibited by KRS 141.205;
Page 140 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
8. Any dividends-paid deduction of any captive real estate investment
trust; and
9. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, the domestic
production activities deduction allowed under Section 199 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(14) (a) "Taxable net income," in the case of corporations that are taxable in this state,
means ["]net income["] as defined in subsection (13) of this section;
(b) "Taxable net income," in the case of corporations that are taxable in this state
and taxable in another state, means ["]net income["] as defined in subsection
(13) of this section and as allocated and apportioned under KRS 141.901. A
corporation is taxable in another state if, in any state other than Kentucky, the
corporation is required to file a return for or pay a net income tax, franchise
tax measured by net income, franchise tax for the privilege of doing business,
or corporate stock tax;
(c) "Taxable net income," in the case of homeowners' associations as defined in
Section 528(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, means ["]taxable income["] as
defined in Section 528(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection (3) of this section, the Internal Revenue Code
sections referred to in this paragraph shall be those code sections in effect for
the applicable tax year; and
(d) "Taxable net income," in the case of a corporation that meets the requirements
established under Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code to be a real estate
investment trust, means ["]real estate investment trust taxable income["] as
defined in Section 857(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that a
captive real estate investment trust shall not be allowed any deduction for
dividends paid;
(15) "Person" means ["]person["] as defined in Section 7701(a)(1) of the Internal
Page 141 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Revenue Code;
(16) "Taxable year" means the calendar year or fiscal year ending during such calendar
year, upon the basis of which net income is computed, and in the case of a return
made for a fractional part of a year under the provisions of this chapter or under
administrative regulations prescribed by the commissioner, "taxable year" means
the period for which the return is made;
(17) "Resident" means an individual domiciled within this state or an individual who is
not domiciled in this state, but maintains a place of abode in this state and spends in
the aggregate more than one hundred eighty-three (183) days of the taxable year in
this state;
(18) "Nonresident" means any individual not a resident of this state;
(19) "Employer" means ["]employer["] as defined in Section 3401(d) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(20) "Employee" means ["]employee["] as defined in Section 3401(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(21) "Number of withholding exemptions claimed" means the number of withholding
exemptions claimed in a withholding exemption certificate in effect under KRS
141.325, except that if no such certificate is in effect, the number of withholding
exemptions claimed shall be considered to be zero (0);
(22) "Wages" means ["]wages["] as defined in Section 3401(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code and includes other income subject to withholding as provided in Section
3401(f) and Section 3402(k), (o), (p), (q), and (s) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(23) "Payroll period" means ["]payroll period["] as defined in Section 3401(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(24) (a) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2005, and after December 31,
2006, "corporation" means ["]corporation["] as defined in Section 7701(a)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code; and
Page 142 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(b) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004, and before January 1,
2007, "corporations" means:
1. ["]Corporations["] as defined in Section 7701(a)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
2. S corporations as defined in Section 1361(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
3. A foreign limited liability company as defined in KRS 275.015;
4. A limited liability company as defined in KRS 275.015;
5. A professional limited liability company as defined in KRS 275.015;
6. A foreign limited partnership as defined in KRS 362.2-102(9);
7. A limited partnership as defined in KRS 362.2-102(14);
8. A limited liability partnership as defined in KRS 362.155(7) or in 362.1-
101(7) or (8);
9. A real estate investment trust as defined in Section 856 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
10. A regulated investment company as defined in Section 851 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
11. A real estate mortgage investment conduit as defined in Section 860D of
the Internal Revenue Code;
12. A financial asset securitization investment trust as defined in Section
860L of the Internal Revenue Code; and
13. Other similar entities created with limited liability for their partners,
members, or shareholders.
For purposes of this paragraph, "corporation" shall not include any publicly
traded partnership as defined by Section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code that is treated as a partnership for federal tax purposes under Section
7704(c) of the Internal Revenue Code or its publicly traded partnership
Page 143 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
affiliates. As used in this paragraph, "publicly traded partnership affiliates"
shall include any limited liability company or limited partnership for which at
least eighty percent (80%) of the limited liability company member interests
or limited partner interests are owned directly or indirectly by the publicly
traded partnership;
(25) "Doing business in this state" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Being organized under the laws of this state;
(b) Having a commercial domicile in this state;
(c) Owning or leasing property in this state;
(d) Having one (1) or more individuals performing services in this state;
(e) Maintaining an interest in a pass-through entity doing business in this state;
(f) Deriving income from or attributable to sources within this state, including
deriving income directly or indirectly from a trust doing business in this state,
or deriving income directly or indirectly from a single-member limited
liability company that is doing business in this state and is disregarded as an
entity separate from its single member for federal income tax purposes; or
(g) Directing activities at Kentucky customers for the purpose of selling them
goods or services.
[Nothing in ]This subsection shall not be interpreted in a manner that goes beyond
the limitations imposed and protections provided by the United States Constitution
or Pub. L. No. 86-272;
(26) "Pass-through entity" means any partnership, S corporation, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, or similar entity
recognized by the laws of this state that is not taxed for federal purposes at the
entity level, but instead passes to each partner, member, shareholder, or owner their
proportionate share of income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and any other
similar attributes;
Page 144 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(27) "S corporation" means ["]S corporation["] as defined in Section 1361(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(28) "Limited liability pass-through entity" means any pass-through entity that affords
any of its partners, members, shareholders, or owners, through function of the laws
of this state or laws recognized by this state, protection from general liability for
actions of the entity; and
(29) "Captive real estate investment trust" means a real estate investment trust as defined
in Section 856 of the Internal Revenue Code that meets the following requirements:
(a) 1. The shares or other ownership interests of the real estate investment
trust are not regularly traded on an established securities market; or
2. The real estate investment trust does not have enough shareholders or
owners to be required to register with the Securities and Exchange
Commission; and
(b) 1. The maximum amount of stock or other ownership interest that is owned
or constructively owned by a corporation equals or exceeds:
a. Twenty-five percent (25%), if the corporation does not occupy
property owned, constructively owned, or controlled by the real
estate investment trust; or
b. Ten percent (10%), if the corporation occupies property owned,
constructively owned, or controlled by the real estate investment
trust.
The total ownership interest of a corporation shall be determined by
aggregating all interests owned or constructively owned by a
corporation;
2. For the purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Corporation" means a corporation taxable under KRS 141.040,
and includes an affiliated group as defined in KRS 141.200, that is
Page 145 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
required to file a consolidated return pursuant to the provisions of
KRS 141.200; and
b. "Owned or constructively owned" means owning shares or having
an ownership interest in the real estate investment trust, or owning
an interest in an entity that owns shares or has an ownership
interest in the real estate investment trust. Constructive ownership
shall be determined by looking across multiple layers of a
multilayer pass-through structure; and
(c) The real estate investment trust is not owned by another real estate investment
trust.
Section 85. KRS 146.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within the boundaries of a designated stream area[,] as established and authorized
by the Kentucky General Assembly, the office shall be authorized and empowered
to acquire by purchase,[ exercise of the rights of eminent domain,] grant, gift,
devise, or otherwise[,] the fee simple title, an easement, or any acceptable lesser
interest in any lands, and by lease or conveyance, contract for the right to use and
occupy any lands. Where property within those[such ]boundaries is owned by the
federal government, the office may[can] enter into agreements with the landowning
agency concerning use of the property consistent with the objectives of KRS
146.200 to 146.360.[ Nothing in KRS 146.200 to 146.360 shall be construed to
deprive a landowner of the fee simple title to or lesser interest in his property
without just compensation.]
(2) The office shall[may] not exercise authority to acquire lands or interests in lands
located within any incorporated city or county when those[such] entities have in
force a duly adopted, valid ordinance or plan for the management, zoning and
protection of the[such] lands in accordance with [the provisions of ]KRS 146.200 to
146.360.
Page 146 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Section 86. KRS 146.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to those uses existing at the[such]
time [as ]a stream is included in the system.
(2) Land uses to be allowed within the boundaries of a designated stream area shall be
as follows:
New roads, structures, or buildings may be constructed only where necessary
to effect a use permitted under [the other provisions of ]KRS 146.200 to 146.360.
Utility lines or pipelines may be constructed as approved by the office in writing
and under provision that the affected land be restored as nearly as possible to its
former state. This provision, however, shall not[in no way] affect the rights
between a landowner and a utility company or pipeline company. There shall be no
strip mining as defined in KRS 350.010, and select cutting of timber or other
resource removal and agricultural use[,] may be allowed pursuant to administrative
regulations promulgated by the secretary in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
upon the granting of a permit under [the other provisions of ]KRS 146.200 to
146.360. All instream disturbances such as dredging[,] shall be prohibited. Except
for the management agency and any existing uses which do not conform to the
purposes and intent of KRS 146.200 to 146.360, travel upon a wild river or any
public lands within its[the] designated boundaries[ thereof,] shall be by foot,
horseback, canoe, boat, or other nonmechanical modes of transportation. If there are
existing agricultural areas within the boundaries of the area, those[such] areas may
continue to be used for agricultural purposes.
(3) Any landowner within the boundaries of the area may apply to the office for a
change of use to permit the select cutting of timber, a resource removal, or an
agricultural use upon his or her property located within the area. The office shall
provide public notice within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the permit application,
and the landowner or any interested person may, within thirty (30) days of the
Page 147 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
public notice, request a public hearing and provide any evidence or information as
to whether the proposed use by the applying landowner is in accordance with the
management plan developed pursuant to KRS 146.270, the purpose and intent of
the Wild Rivers Act as expressed in KRS 146.220, and other applicable law.
(4) The office shall, within thirty (30) days of the close of the comment period, or
public hearing, if one is requested[, either]:
(a) Issue an order, with accompanying opinion, denying the permit;[ or ]
(b) Issue an order, with accompanying opinion, granting the permit with
any[such] restrictions, terms, and conditions [as are ]appropriate to protect to
the fullest extent possible the wild rivers area and the public trust therein
within the intent of KRS 146.220; or
(c) Recommend an alternate use to which the land may be put under KRS
146.200 to 146.360 which is more consistent with the purposes and intent of
KRS 146.200 to 146.360 than the use for which application was made[; or
(d) Institute condemnation proceedings in the circuit court of the county in which
the land is located or else negotiate a purchase of the land affected, or any
interest therein].
(5) On or before thirty (30) days from the date of the office's determination, the
landowner may file with the office a written objection to the determination. If,
within the next sixty (60) days the landowner and the secretary are unable to reach
an agreement with respect to a modification of the determination, the office must
either permit the use applied for[, condemn the property,] or petition the Franklin
Circuit Court for an order restraining the proposed use. The order shall be entered
immediately upon the filing of the petition and the execution of a bond without
surety by the Commonwealth in an amount satisfactory to the court to indemnify
the landowner against loss of profits from any wrongful restraint of the use of his or
her property during the period from the filing of the petition until [such time as ]the
Page 148 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
matter is concluded by the courts. The court shall review the decision as to both law
and fact; but no factual finding shall be reversed unless clearly erroneous or else
arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of discretion.
Section 87. KRS 146.475 is amended to read as follows:
The fee simple estates, [or ]lesser interests, or other contractual rights held as nature
preserves are hereby declared to be held in trust[,] in the name of the Commonwealth[,]
for those uses and purposes expressed in KRS 146.410 to 146.530 which are not
prohibited by the articles of dedication, for the benefit of the people of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky of present and future generations and are declared to be put
to their highest, best, and most important use for the public benefit. [ Said ]Estates,
interests, or rights held as nature preserves shall be managed and protected in the manner
approved by[,] and subject to the rules and regulations established by the office[, and they
shall not be taken by another public body through eminent domain or otherwise for any
other use, except after a finding by the office of the existence of an imperative and
unavoidable public necessity for such other public use]. Except as may otherwise be
provided in the articles of dedication, the office may grant or dispose of an estate,
interest, or right held in a nature preserve only after a finding by the office of the
existence of an imperative and unavoidable public necessity for the[such] grant or
disposition; provided however, that where less than a fee simple interest has been
dedicated, the[such] disposition or grant shall also require the written consent of the
owner or owners of the other interests in the property[therein].
Section 88. KRS 146.485 is amended to read as follows:
In furtherance of the purposes of KRS 146.410 to 146.530, the office shall have the
following additional powers and duties:
(1) To seek and approve the dedication of nature preserves as part of the system;
(2) To make and publish policies and rules, and to recommend to the secretary the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
Page 149 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
for the selection, acquisition, management, protection, and use of natural areas and
nature preserves, and for the conduct of office affairs;
(3) To cooperate with and to contract with any public body of this state, any public
body of any other state, any private organization, any individual, and the federal
government and its agencies;
(4) To purchase land from a willing seller[ without the use of the powers of
condemnation or eminent domain, which said powers are expressly denied to the
office];
(5) To make reasonable investigations as to the ownership of any lands which it judges
may be appropriate for acquisition;
(6) To maintain a state registry of natural areas, an inventory of natural types, flora, and
fauna, and other records of natural areas and nature preserves within the
Commonwealth;
(7) To promote the coordination of all departments, divisions, and branches of state,
county, and city governments within the Commonwealth which relate to nature
preserves;
(8) To study the operation of all laws, rules, regulations, orders, and governmental
policies affecting conservation of natural resources pertaining to natural areas, and
to recommend to the Governor, and to the General Assembly, new legislation, rules,
regulations, orders, and policies in the interest of correcting natural resource
conservation problems pertaining to natural areas and nature preserves;
(9) To provide a central clearing house of information for environmental and
conservation matters and to promote educational programs pertaining to natural
areas and nature preserves;
(10) To conduct research, investigations, public hearings, and interpretative programs
and to publish and disseminate information to the general public pertaining to
natural areas and nature preserves;
Page 150 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(11) To supervise the protection, management, and use of nature preserves and to
enforce and administer rules and regulations pertaining thereto;
(12) To promote, study, investigate, recommend, encourage, advise and assist in the
preservation, protection, and management of natural areas;
(13) To report to the Governor and General Assembly on proposed legislation, policies,
regulations, or actions, public or private, which may significantly affect the quality
of the natural ecology or the human environment in the Commonwealth. The[
. Such] report shall include an evaluation of environmental and ecological effects,
and shall compare any adverse effects of the proposed action against possible social
benefits. The report shall describe and recommend appropriate alternatives that[,
which] avoid significant adverse effects on the quality of the natural ecology of
natural areas;
(14) To submit to the Governor and members of the General Assembly[,] a report on or
before October 1 of each even-numbered year, detailing the condition of each
nature preserve in the system, and each registered natural area, and make other
reports and recommendations as it may deem advisable.
Section 89. KRS 147A.080 is amended to read as follows:
Each board of directors shall have the power and authority to:
(1) Adopt and have a common seal and alter the seal[same] at pleasure;
(2) Sue and be sued;
(3) Adopt bylaws and make rules and regulations for the conduct of its business;
(4) Make and enter into all contracts or agreements necessary or incidental to the
performance of its duties;
(5) Provide upon request basic administrative, research, and planning services for any
planning and development body located within the district;
(6) Accept, receive, and administer loans, grants, or other funds or gifts from public
and private agencies including the Commonwealth and the federal government for
Page 151 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
the purpose of carrying out the functions of the district;
(7) Expend [such ]funds it deems[as may be considered by it to be] advisable or
necessary in the performance of its duties;
(8) Acquire, hold as may be necessary and convenient, encumber, or dispose of real
and personal property[, except that no board shall have the power of eminent
domain];
(9) Charge fees, rents, and otherwise charge for services provided by the board, except
that no board shall have any power to levy taxes;
(10) Enter into interlocal agreements or interstate compacts to the extent authorized by
laws of the Commonwealth. An area development district organization shall be
deemed a "public agency" as defined by the Interlocal Cooperation Act in KRS
Chapter 65;
(11) Promote, organize, and advise special districts or other authorities in accordance
with laws of the Commonwealth and act as the regional clearinghouse for
related[such] programs and projects [as ]prescribed by federal regulation;
(12) Perform any[such] other and further acts[ as may be] necessary to carry out the
duties and responsibilities created by KRS 147A.050 to 147A.120.
Section 90. KRS 148.0223 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The KMRRA shall:
(a) Supervise the design and construction of trail systems within the KMRA and
provide all management functions for the trails and for any other property
built, acquired, or leased pursuant to its powers under KRS 148.0221 to
148.0225;
(b) Construct, develop, manage, maintain, operate, improve, renovate, finance, or
otherwise provide for recreational and trail-related activities and facilities on
designated public lands and private lands of participating landowners who
have voluntarily entered into use agreements with the board;
Page 152 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) Promote the growth and development of the trail system, tourism, and the
hotel, restaurant, and entertainment industry within the KMRA and the
Commonwealth, through marketing KMRA to enhance local economic and
tourism development;
(d) Establish agreements with other persons, businesses, agencies, organizations,
or any other entity to levy a surcharge on tickets for events, activities,
festivals, or functions that are cosponsored with other entities and contribute
to the authority's operating revenue; and
(e) Procure insurance against any losses in connection with its property, licenses,
easements, or contracts, including hold-harmless agreements, operations, or
assets in [such ]amounts and from [such ]insurers that[as] the board considers
desirable.
(2) The board's management program shall prioritize contractual arrangements with
private landowners to use land for recreational purposes, which shall not diminish
the participating landowner's interest, control, or profitability of the land. If
necessary to implement a comprehensive trail system, the board may also contract
with public landowners through contractual agreements that recognize the primary
mission for which the public entity controls and manages the land.
(3) The board may carry out any of the following to accomplish the purposes of KRS
148.0221 to 148.0225:
(a) Acquire, own, and hold property, and all interests in the property[therein], by
deed, purchase, gift, devise, bequest, or lease, or by transfer from the State
Property and Buildings Commission[, except that the authority shall not
acquire property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain];
(b) Dispose of any property acquired in any manner provided by law;
(c) Lease property, whether as lessee or lessor, and acquire or grant through
easement, license, or other appropriate legal form, the right to develop and use
Page 153 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
property and open it to the use of the public;
(d) Mortgage or otherwise grant security interests in its property;
(e) Maintain sinking funds and reserves as the board determines appropriate for
the purposes of meeting future monetary obligations and needs of the
authority; however, contributions to a sinking fund during a fiscal year shall
not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total fees collected during the prior year;
(f) Sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in any
court;
(g) Make contracts and execute instruments necessary for carrying on its
business, including contracts with any Kentucky state agency, the federal
government, or any person, individual, partnership, or corporation to effect
any or all of the purposes of KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225, as follows:
1. Contracts shall go through a public bidding process;
2. Contracts for one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more shall be sent, with
at least three (3) bids from separate entities, to the Department for Local
Government for review and final approval;
3. Bids from entities within KMRRA participating counties are to be given
preference over competing bidders from outside of KMRRA
participating counties; and
4. If the Department for Local Government has not given a response in the
form of an approval or rejection after five (5) business days from the
date the department received the contract to be reviewed, it shall be
considered approved;
(h) Accept grants and loans from and enter into contracts and other transactions
with any federal agency, regional commission, or state agency for
accomplishing the purposes of KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225;
(i) Borrow money and issue bonds, security interests, or notes;
Page 154 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(j) Provide for and secure the payment of the bonds, security interests, or notes;
(k) Provide for the rights of the holders of the bonds, security interests, or notes;
(l) Purchase, hold, and dispose of any of its bonds, security interests, or notes;
(m) Accept gifts or grants of property, security interests, money, labor, supplies,
or services from any governmental unit or from any person, firm, or
corporation;
(n) Establish a regional recreational trail system based upon contracts and
agreements with participating landowners. The board may enter into contracts
with landowners, and other persons holding an interest in the land being used
for its recreational facilities, to hold those landowners harmless with respect
to any claim in tort growing out of the use of the land for public recreation or
growing out of the recreational activities operated or managed by the board
from any claim, except a claim for damages proximately caused by the willful
or malicious conduct of the landowner or any of his or her agents or
employees;
(o) 1. Establish a fee-based system of permits, user registrations, or other trail
or facility access mechanisms.
2. The fees may be imposed for access to and use of the trails, parking
facilities, visitor centers, or other trail-related recreational purpose
facilities or recreation activities that are part of the KMRA or as an
admission to an event.
3. The fees shall be decided by the board.
4. The KMRRA shall retain and use the revenue from fees for any
purposes consistent with KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225 and within the
guidelines in subsection (4) of this section;
(p) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
to govern use and maintenance of the KMRA and any other matters for
Page 155 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
effective management of the KMRA;
(q) Cooperate and contract with the regional recreation authorities of Tennessee,
Virginia, West Virginia, and other contiguous states to connect the trails in
Kentucky with similar recreation facilities in those states; and
(r) Exercise all of the powers that a corporation may lawfully exercise under the
laws of the Commonwealth.
(4) The fees collected by the KMRRA are to be used within the following guidelines:
(a) To pay the salary of the executive director and all staff of the KMRRA;
(b) To reimburse travel expenses of board members including lodging, subject to
Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations;
(c) To fund the construction, maintenance, and all necessary expenses of the
KMRRA trail system;
(d) To maintain a sinking fund with contributions to the fund during a fiscal year
not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total fees collected during the prior
year and the total fund not to exceed a balance of one million dollars
($1,000,000) at the end of any fiscal year; and
(e) Any remaining moneys not already appropriated in accordance with KRS
148.0221 to 148.0225 at the end of the fiscal year are to be sent to the
Department for Local Government to be placed into an account to be used
exclusively for economic development grants in KMRRA participating
counties. These grants shall give preference to projects in economically
distressed counties, then to at-risk counties, and then to transitional counties,
as defined by the Appalachian Regional Commission.
(5) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed as a waiver of sovereign immunity.
Section 91. KRS 148.031 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cost of acquiring, equipping,[ parks] and constructing improvements and
facilities in parks[therein and equipping same] may be defrayed by funds received
Page 156 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
from general expenditure fund appropriations, gifts, the use of money received as
fees and charges for the use of the[said] parks and facilities, or by the issuance of
revenue bonds, or by a combination of those[such] sources of funds.
(2) In the event revenue bonds are issued to defray all or any part of those[such] costs,
[said ]revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to [the terms of ]KRS 58.010 to
58.130[58.140].
(3) The Department of Parks may unite into one (1) project for financing purposes all
or as many parks, and the improvements therein, or to be constructed, enlarged or
improved, as it deems practicable, so that the fees and charges and other revenue or
receipts from every source whatsoever from the parks thus united shall be used for
the payment of the principal and interest of all bonds which may be issued.
The[Such] united receipts shall continue until all bonds issued have been paid in
full. The lien of the bonds for a[such] united project shall be a lien upon the gross
income and revenue of all parks thus united into a project.
(4) All parks in which improvements and facilities are constructed and equipped by the
issuance of revenue bonds shall be maintained and operated by the Department of
Parks until the bonds are paid, and the cost of operation and maintenance shall be
paid out of appropriations and receipts received by the Department of Parks.
Section 92. KRS 148.036 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The KORRRA shall:
(a) Supervise the design and construction of trail systems within the RA and
provide all management functions for the trails and for any other property
built, acquired, or leased pursuant to its powers under KRS 148.033 to
148.039;
(b) Construct, develop, manage, maintain, operate, improve, renovate, finance, or
otherwise provide for recreational and trail-related activities and facilities on
designated public lands and private lands of participating landowners who
Page 157 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
have voluntarily entered into use agreements with the board;
(c) Promote the growth and development of the trail system, tourism, and the
hotel, restaurant, and entertainment industry within the RA and the
Commonwealth, through marketing RA to enhance local economic and
tourism development;
(d) Establish agreements with other persons, businesses, agencies, organizations,
or any other entity to levy a surcharge on tickets for events, activities,
festivals, or functions that are cosponsored with other entities and contribute
to the authority's operating revenue; and
(e) Procure insurance against any losses in connection with its property, licenses,
easements, or contracts, including hold-harmless agreements, operations, or
assets in such amounts and from such insurers as the board considers
desirable.
(2) The board's management program shall prioritize contractual arrangements with
private landowners to use land for recreational purposes, which shall not diminish
the participating landowner's interest, control, or profitability of the land. If
necessary to implement a comprehensive trail system, the board may also contract
with public landowners through contractual agreements that recognize the primary
mission for which the public entity controls and manages the land.
(3) The board may carry out any of the following to accomplish the purposes of KRS
148.033 to 148.039:
(a) Acquire, own, and hold property, and all interests therein, by deed, purchase,
gift, devise, bequest, or lease, or by transfer from the State Property and
Buildings Commission[, except that the authority shall not acquire property
through the exercise of the power of eminent domain];
(b) Dispose of any property acquired in any manner provided by law;
(c) Lease property, whether as lessee or lessor, and acquire or grant through
Page 158 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
easement, license, or other appropriate legal form, the right to develop and use
property and open it to the use of the public;
(d) Mortgage or otherwise grant security interests in its property;
(e) Maintain sinking funds and reserves as the board determines appropriate for
the purposes of meeting future monetary obligations and needs of the
authority; however, contributions to a sinking fund during a fiscal year shall
not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total fees collected during the prior year;
(f) Sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in any
court;
(g) Make contracts and execute instruments necessary for carrying on its
business, including contracts with any Kentucky state agency, the federal
government, or any person, individual, partnership, or corporation to effect
any or all of the purposes of KRS 148.033 to 148.039 as follows:
1. Contracts shall go through a public bidding process;
2. Contracts for one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more shall be sent, with
at least three (3) bids from separate entities, to the Department for Local
Government for review and final approval;
3. Bids from entities with KORRRA participating counties are to be given
preference over competing bidders from outside of KORRRA
participating counties; and
4. If the Department for Local Government has not given a response in the
form of an approval or rejection after five (5) business days from the
date the department received the contract to be reviewed, it shall be
considered approved;
(h) Accept grants and loans from and enter into contracts and other transactions
with any federal agency, regional commission, or state agency for
accomplishing the purposes of KRS 148.033 to 148.039;
Page 159 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(i) Borrow money and issue bonds, security interests, or notes;
(j) Provide for and secure the payment of the bonds, security interests, or notes;
(k) Provide for the rights of the holders of the bonds, security interests, or notes;
(l) Purchase, hold, and dispose of any of its bonds, security interests, or notes;
(m) Accept gifts or grants of property, security interests, money, labor, supplies,
or services from any governmental unit or from any person, firm, or
corporation;
(n) Establish a regional recreational trail system based upon contracts and
agreements with participating landowners. The board may enter into contracts
with landowners, and other persons holding an interest in the land being used
for its recreational facilities, to hold those landowners harmless with respect
to any claim in tort growing out of the use of the land for public recreation or
growing out of the recreational activities operated or managed by the board
from any claim, except a claim for damages proximately caused by the willful
or malicious conduct of the landowner or any of his or her agents or
employees;
(o) 1. Establish a fee-based system of permits, user registrations, or other trail
or facility access mechanisms.
2. The fees may be imposed for access to and use of the trails, parking
facilities, visitor centers, or other trail-related recreational purpose
facilities or recreation activities that are part of the RA or as an
admission to an event.
3. The fees shall be decided by the board.
4. The KORRRA shall retain and use the revenue from fees for any
purposes consistent with KRS 148.033 to 148.039 and within the
guidelines in subsection (4) of this section;
(p) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
Page 160 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
to govern use and maintenance of the RA and any other matters for effective
management of the RA;
(q) Cooperate and contract with the regional recreation authorities of Illinois,
Indiana, Ohio, West Virginia, and other contiguous states to connect the trails
in Kentucky with similar recreation facilities in those states; and
(r) Exercise all of the powers that a corporation may lawfully exercise under the
laws of the Commonwealth.
(4) The fees collected by the KORRRA are to be used within the following guidelines;
(a) To pay the salary of the executive director and all staff of the KORRRA;
(b) To reimburse travel expenses of board members including lodging, subject to
Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations;
(c) To fund the construction, maintenance, and all necessary expenses of the
KORRRA trail system;
(d) To maintain a sinking fund with contributions to the fund during a fiscal year
not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total fees collected during the prior
year and the total fund not to exceed a balance of one million dollars
($1,000,000) at the end of any fiscal year; and
(e) Any remaining moneys not already appropriated in accordance with KRS
148.033 to 148.039 at the end of the fiscal year are to be sent to the
Department for Local Government to be placed into an account to be used
exclusively for economic development grants in KORRRA participating
counties. These grants shall give preference to projects in economically
distressed counties, then to at-risk counties, then to transitional counties, as
defined by Kentucky Council of Area Development Districts.
(5) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed as a waiver of sovereign immunity.
Section 93. KRS 148.874 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby designated a linear state park, the boundaries of which shall be
Page 161 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
determined by the department in accordance with this section known as the Pine
Mountain State Scenic Trail, a trail of approximately one hundred twenty (120)
miles in length[,] located exclusively within the boundaries of Kentucky beginning
along the border of Kentucky and Virginia at or near Breaks Interstate Park, and
extending generally south-southwest along the crest of Pine Mountain to the
vicinity of Pine Mountain State Resort Park and continuing south to the
Cumberland Gap National Park on the vicinity thereof. Insofar as practicable, the
boundaries of the trail from the Breaks Interstate Park to Bad Branch State Nature
Preserve shall be a one thousand (1,000) foot corridor, the center of which shall be
the crest of Pine Mountain, to the extent that the corridor does not encroach upon
the territory of the Commonwealth of Virginia. Insofar as practicable, the
boundaries of the trail from the Bad Branch State Nature Preserve to the Pine
Mountain State Resort Park shall be a corridor one hundred (100) to two hundred
fifty (250) feet along the level top of Pine Mountain. The route of the trail from
Pine Mountain State Resort Park to Cumberland Gap National Park shall be a
corridor no wider than two hundred fifty (250) feet to be determined by the
department. Notwithstanding these boundary limitations, the department may
through negotiations with the land owner acquire additional land outside the
boundary limitations. The trail shall be depicted on the "Pine Mountain State Scenic
Trail Map," which shall be on file and available for public inspection in the office
of the commissioner of the department. The trail map shall delineate those portions
of the trail that are owned or leased by the Commonwealth or on which the
Commonwealth has obtained an easement and shall be updated periodically solely
for the purpose of reflecting additions to those specific areas.
(2) The department may designate connecting or side paths which shall provide
additional points of public access to the trail or access to points of interest, and
which shall be of the same scenic nature as the trail[, except that connecting or side
Page 162 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
paths shall not be acquired through eminent domain].
(3) Because of its extended length, the department may supplement the trail by support
facilities located on certain designated parts of the trail or outside the trail. These
support facilities may include, as the department deems necessary and feasible,
primitive shelters, fireplaces, safe water supplies, and other related public-use
facilities that shall meet department standards. [No ]Open wood fires shall not be
permitted on the trail except in areas with support facilities specifically designated
for that purpose.
(4) The trail shall be a state scenic trail, so chosen because of its unique location. It
shall be limited to foot use and other nonmotorized uses as permitted on segments
where deemed appropriate by the department, and as set forth in KRS 148.878.
(5) The department shall, no later than June 30, 2003, determine the boundaries of the
trail. In determining the boundaries of the trail, the department shall not encroach
upon any privately owned dwelling, or areas designated for residential structures
and their surrounding properties, but shall route the trail around a privately owned
dwelling or areas designated for a residential structure.[
(6) The department shall not acquire through eminent domain any cemetery or its
surrounding property which is designated as a cemetery or burial ground on July 15,
2002.]
Section 94. KRS 148.876 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) The power of eminent domain may only be exercised to acquire land in fee within
the boundaries of the trail, except that the power of eminent domain shall not be
exercised to acquire any privately owned dwelling, areas designated for residential
structures and their surrounding properties, or property owned or leased, including
adjacent or contiguous tracts of land leased or owned or which may be acquired, for
the purposes of operating an oil or gas well, surface or underground coal mine
operation, or surface or underground mineral quarrying operation, if the person
Page 163 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
holds a state permit or license issued by the Energy and Environment Cabinet,
Division of Mine Permits or Division of Mine Safety.
(2) ]Within the boundaries of the trail, the department may acquire, on behalf of the
Commonwealth, fee title or lesser interests in land. Acquisition of land may be by gift, by
purchase with donated funds, by funds appropriated by the General Assembly, by the use
of proceeds from the sale of bonds, by exchange, by assumption of property tax
payments, or by other authorized means. Notwithstanding [the provisions in ]KRS
350.085(3) and 353.610, in acquiring any interests the Commonwealth or its agencies
shall waive the three hundred (300) foot restriction [contained ]in KRS 350.085(3) and
boundary restrictions for a well [set forth ]in KRS 353.610.
Section 95. KRS 148.878 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Within the boundaries of the trail, as designated by the department and once
acquired:
(a) The natural vegetation shall be kept undisturbed except for any clearing
required for construction of the trail, occasional vistas, or trail-use facilities
described in KRS 148.870 to 148.892, except as provided under [paragraph
(c) of ]subsection (3)(c) of this section. Development and management of
each segment of the trail shall be designed to harmonize with and complement
any established multiple-use plans for that specific area in order to ensure
continual maximum benefits from the land;
(b) Hunting of wild game shall be permitted only on or along areas as identified
and permitted in administrative regulations as promulgated by the Department
of Fish and Wildlife Resources after consultation with the Department of
Parks, and as permitted under [paragraph (c) of ]subsection (3)(c) of this
section; and
(c) The use of motorized vehicles by the general public within the boundaries of
the trail shall be limited, and [nothing in ]KRS 148.870 to 148.892 shall not
Page 164 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
be construed as authorizing the use of motorized vehicles in this area, except
upon existing or newly constructed public roadways within the boundaries of
the trail and as provided under [paragraph (c) of ]subsection (3)(c) of this
section.
(2) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A authorizing the use of motorized vehicles on areas other than
public roadways, when these vehicles are required to meet emergencies where life
or health is at risk, or to enable adjacent landowners to have access to their lands or
mineral rights, as provided under subsection[paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection]
(3)(a) and (c) of this section.
(3) (a) Except as expressly authorized in KRS 148.870 to 148.892 or in the
administrative regulations promulgated by the department, or as may be
allowed under a change of use permit issued by the department, permissible
land uses within the boundaries of the trail as designated by the department
shall be as set forth in this section. Uses that lawfully existed on July 15,
2002, may continue. After the trail boundaries are designated, new or
additional uses shall be in compliance with the policy and purposes of KRS
148.870 to 148.892 and shall minimize disturbance to the trail. Above-ground
blasting operations authorized under [the provisions of ]KRS 351.315 to
351.375, except those operations conducted on sites utilizing no more than a
total of ten thousand (10,000) pounds of explosives or the equivalent on the
site, shall be prohibited for new or additional uses within an area of one
thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) feet outward from the crest of Pine
Mountain on the portion of the trail from Breaks Interstate Park to Bad
Branch State Nature Preserve and within an area of five hundred (500) feet
outward from the boundary of the trail on the portion of the trail from Bad
Branch State Nature Preserve to Pine Mountain State Resort Park. Select
Page 165 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
cutting of timber or other resources removal may be allowed pursuant to KRS
148.870 to 148.892 and administrative regulations promulgated by the
department in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A upon the issuance of a
change of use permit. Unless the property is purchased by the department, any
net revenue from the cutting of timber or other resources removal shall inure
to the benefit of the owner of the property or property rights from which the
Commonwealth acquired the property. In promulgating administrative
regulations related to KRS 148.870 to 148.892 and in developing the
management plan as set forth in KRS 148.882, the department shall schedule
public hearings in the county in which the trail lies that is affected by the
administrative regulations and management plan.
(b) In the development of management plans as set forth in KRS 148.882, the
department shall include provisions to allow for means of ingress and egress
as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection by owners of property rights
affected by the creation of the trail, and for the construction of new roads,
utility facilities, and pipelines that would encroach upon the trail. The
department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A setting forth the procedures required to establish means of
ingress and egress relating to obtaining rights-of-way, easements, and permits
necessary for the construction of new roads, utility facilities, and pipelines
that encroach upon the trail.
(c) When the Commonwealth acquires land for the trail authorized by KRS
148.870, regardless of whether the trail property is acquired by purchase,
[eminent domain, ]donation, or otherwise restricted, the person from whom
the property is acquired or restricted or their successor in title shall have the
following rights with regard to the property which has been acquired or
restricted by the Commonwealth:
Page 166 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
1. Ingress, egress, and access to trail property for purposes specified in this
section or any other provision of law;
2. An easement to use trail property for the purpose of access to adjacent
land of the same property owner or their successor, including but not
limited to motorized travel;
3. To hunt, fish, or trap on that portion of trail property formerly owned, in
accordance with applicable law and administrative regulations;
4. To gather and remove edible, medicinal, or ornamental plants and herbs
from that portion of the trail property formerly owned, in accordance
with applicable law and administrative regulations; and
5. To access and maintain a cemetery and burial grounds on that portion of
trail property formerly owned.
(d) The rights specified in this section or other provisions of law or administrative
regulation shall be included in [any judgment when property or an interest
therein is taken or restricted by eminent domain and shall be included in ]any
contract for purchase, donation, or other acquisition of the property or an
interest in the property[therein] unless voluntarily waived in that document.
(4) Any person owning property or property rights within the boundaries of the trail
may apply to the department for a change of use permit. The secretary or the
secretary's designee shall hold a public hearing after public notice on the
application within sixty (60) days. Any person shall be allowed to present evidence
as to whether the use proposed by the applicant is in accordance with the
management plan developed pursuant to [the provisions of ]KRS 148.870 to
148.892, the administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 148.870 to
148.892, and other applicable law.
(5) The secretary shall, within sixty (60) days after a hearing, issue an order and
accompanying opinion granting the permit, denying the permit, or recommending
Page 167 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
an alternative use to which the land may be put that is more consistent with [the
provisions of ]KRS 148.870 to 148.892 than the use for which the application was
made. Any aggrieved party to the hearing shall have the right to petition the local
Circuit Court in which the property lies within thirty (30) days after issuance of the
secretary's order.
Section 96. KRS 150.024 is amended to read as follows:
The department shall have the right to acquire [such ]property [as may be ]necessary to
carry out the purpose of this chapter[, and it shall have the right of eminent domain as
provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky].
Section 97. KRS 150.610 is amended to read as follows:
The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, with approval of
the commission, may call for the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to the entire terms
of KRS 58.010 to 58.130[through 58.140] for the purpose of establishing public shooting
areas, waterfowl or other wildlife refuges, public fishing lakes or the establishment of
other projects of public benefit in the interest of fish and game and may unite into one (1)
project for financing purposes all revenue as may be pledged by the commissioner. From
every source whatsoever these revenues thus united shall be used for the payment of the
principal and interest of all bonds which may be issued. These[Such] united receipts,
unless otherwise agreed upon by the commissioner and bonding company, shall continue
until all bonds issued have been paid in full. The lien of the bonds from a[such] limited
project shall be a lien upon the united gross income and revenue as specified in the
original terms ascribed to by the commissioner with the concurrence of the commission.
Section 98. KRS 151.611 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A Stream Restoration and Mitigation Authority may be established for any HUC 10
watershed in the Commonwealth. Each authority formed under this section shall be
a public body corporate and politic with the authority to:
(a) Sue and be sued;
Page 168 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(b) Enter into contracts with public and private individuals and corporations and
engage in cooperative agreements with federal, state, and local governments
or agencies, utilities, special districts, and nonprofit organizations for the
performance of its duties and functions under KRS 151.610 to 151.615;
(c) Employ personnel as needed, as its fiscal resources may allow, and use the
services of volunteers individually or through agreement with governmental
agencies, nonprofit organizations, or foundations;
(d) Receive and expend funds from any source, including but not limited to
private donations, charitable contributions, public grants, 404 In-lieu Fee
Program, and appropriations from the General Assembly; and
(e) Acquire, sell, and hold real interests in property.
(2) [Nothing in ]KRS 151.610 to 151.615 shall not be construed to empower or
authorize an authority established under KRS 151.610 to 151.615 to exercise
regulatory powers with respect to water resources or water quality.[ An authority
established under KRS 151.610 to 151.615 shall not be vested with the power of
eminent domain.]
(3) It is the preference of the General Assembly that funds contributed by a permittee
under a Section 404 Permit into an in-lieu fund for a project designed for stream
restoration and mitigation be utilized within the watershed where the adverse
effects occur. The General Assembly recognizes that conservation and protection of
the water resources of the Commonwealth, including streams, rivers, wetlands, and
riparian habitats, may involve, in addition to restoration and enhancement of
aquatic and riparian habitat, proper management of wastewater and stormwater, and
abatement of pre-existing sources of pollution. Where an authority has been
qualified by the USACE to manage an in-lieu fee or other compensatory mitigation
arrangement that is approved after July 15, 2008, under Section 404, and to the
extent that the USACE and the Mitigation Review Team has approved the use of
Page 169 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
[such ]funds for elimination of pre-existing sources of pollution, the authority may
expend a portion of the funds for those purposes, provided that the:
(a) Funds spent on water quality improvements are a component of a stream or
wetland restoration plan for replacement of aquatic resource functions and
values;
(b) Project has been reviewed and approved by the USACE and the Division of
Water as being consistent with Sections 404 and 401 of the Clean Water Act;
and
(c) In-lieu fees shall be available statewide, to all one hundred twenty (120)
counties, subject to federal and state regulatory requirements.
(4) [Nothing in ]KRS 151.610 to 151.615 shall not preclude the authority, when acting
as an approved qualified organization managing an in-lieu fee arrangement
approved after July 15, 2008, from combining funding from other sources with in-
lieu fees in order to achieve efficiencies in stream restoration or mitigation.
Section 99. KRS 151.720 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky River Authority is authorized and empowered to:
(1) Construct, reconstruct, provide for the major maintenance, or repair the locks and
dams on the Kentucky River and all real and personal property pertaining to the
locks and dams[thereto], as well as maintain the channel;
(2) Acquire by purchase,[ exercise of the rights of eminent domain,] grant, gift, devise,
or otherwise[,] the fee simple title to or any acceptable lesser interest in any real or
personal property and by lease or other conveyance, contract for the right to use and
occupy any real or personal property selected in the discretion of the authority as
constituting necessary, desirable, or acceptable sites to fulfill its statutory authority
and power;
(3) Lease its real or personal property to other state agencies, political subdivisions of
the Commonwealth, corporations, partnerships, associations, foundations, or
Page 170 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
persons as the authority deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section;
(4) Sell or otherwise dispose of its real or personal property in accordance with KRS
56.463 and 45A.045;
(5) Collect water use fees from all facilities using water from the Kentucky River basin,
except those facilities using water primarily for agricultural purposes. Facilities
charged with the[such a] fee may pass on all or any part of the fee;
(6) Issue revenue bonds in accordance with KRS 151.730;
(7) Employ persons to carry out the authority's responsibilities with revenue from the
water use fees, including an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the
authority;
(8) Contract for services with other state agencies, political subdivisions of the
Commonwealth, corporations, partnerships, associations, foundations, or persons to
perform its duties;
(9) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
providing for clean water, which shall not be less stringent than the state and federal
regulations for clean water;
(10) Exercise all other powers necessary to perform its public purpose to implement and
enforce the plans developed by the authority pursuant to this section and KRS
151.727 and 151.728, and to enforce administrative regulations promulgated by the
authority. The long-range water resource plan and drought response plan shall be
implemented for the basin upon the direction of the authority;
(11) Develop comprehensive plans for the management of the Kentucky River within
the basin, including a long-range water resource plan and a drought response plan.
Each county within the basin shall develop a long-range water resource plan and
submit it to the authority. The authority, after consultation with the Energy and
Environment Cabinet, shall develop a unified long-range water resource plan for the
basin. The unified long-range water resource plan shall be implemented over short-
Page 171 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
range and long-range time periods. The short-range plan shall be for a period of six
(6) years and the long-range plan shall be for a period of twenty (20) years. The
authority shall conduct a public hearing on the plan prior to its adoption and amend
the plan as appropriate based on the comments received. The Energy and
Environment Cabinet shall review the draft unified plan and provide comment
during the public comment period concerning the consistency of the plan with the
state requirements under KRS Chapters 224 and 151. A drought response plan for
the basin shall be developed by the authority and shall be coordinated with the
Energy and Environment Cabinet to assure consistency with KRS Chapters 224 and
151, and this plan shall be implemented for the basin upon the direction of the
authority;
(12) Develop and promote a plan for the protection and use of groundwater within the
basin. Administrative regulations may be promulgated implementing the plan, and
these regulations shall not be less stringent than state and federal regulations
protecting groundwater;
(13) Promote private investment in the installation of hydroelectric generating units on
all existing constructed and reconstructed Kentucky River dams under the
jurisdiction of the authority, by developing a standard lease, establishing reasonable
financial responsibility requirements, verifying that the proposed installation of the
hydroelectric unit will not adversely affect the structural integrity of the dam, and
adopting a schedule of reasonable fees for water used in the generation of
hydroelectric power;
(14) Develop recreational areas within the basin. These recreational areas may be
operated and funded by the state Department of Parks, Office of Kentucky Nature
Preserves, or other governmental entity as specifically authorized or permitted
within the biennial executive budget. There is hereby created the Kentucky River
Park to be located as determined by the authority;
Page 172 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(15) Utilize funds provided for recreational purposes within the biennial executive
budget for major or minor maintenance if the authority certifies to the secretary of
the Finance and Administration Cabinet that a significant need exists for the repairs
and no other funds are available for the maintenance;
(16) Coordinate the Kentucky River basin water resources activities among state
agencies;
(17) Report quarterly on all of its activities to the legislative Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue;
(18) Receive reports from state agencies on litigation concerning the Kentucky River,
which agencies are hereby directed to report to the authority;
(19) Credit to the authority any income derived from the interest earned on the
investment of the water use fees collected, which shall be available for the
authority's expenditure; and
(20) Accomplish the watershed management mission of the authority, which is to fulfill
the provisions of this section for the Kentucky River basin, the boundary of which
shall be defined by a hydrologic map promulgated in an administrative regulation.
Section 100. KRS 152.590 is amended to read as follows:
The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall have the following general powers:
(1) To acquire by purchase,[ exercise of the right of eminent domain,] grant, gift,
devise, or otherwise[,] the fee simple title to or any acceptable lesser interest in any
lands, and by lease or other contract the right to use and occupy any lands, selected
in the discretion of the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet as
constituting necessary, desirable, or acceptable sites for projects of the cabinet,
including any and all lands adjacent to a project site as in the discretion of the
secretary may be necessary or suitable for satellite projects or restricted areas; but
in all instances lands which are to be designated as radioactive waste material sites
shall be acquired in fee simple absolute and dedicated in perpetuity to that[such]
Page 173 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
purpose;
(2) To convey to private enterprise, or to lease to private enterprise for a[such] term[ as
in the discretion of] the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet deems
to[may] be in the public interest, any lands so acquired, either for a fair and
reasonable consideration or solely or partly as an inducement to the establishment
or location in the Commonwealth of any scientific or technological facility, project,
satellite project, or nuclear storage area; but subject to [such ]restraints [as may be
]deemed proper to bring about a reversion of title or termination of any lease in the
event the grantee or lessee, as the case may be, ceases[shall cease] to use the
premises or facilities in the conduct of business or activities consistent with laws
and regulations of the Commonwealth; provided, however, radioactive waste
material sites may be leased but may not otherwise be disposed of except to the
Commonwealth, or to the United States;
(3) To construct, reconstruct, maintain, repair, operate, and regulate projects at [such
]locations within the Commonwealth as [may be ]determined by the secretary;
(4) To fix by contract, or to establish, [and ]revise, [from time to time and ]charge, and
collect revenues, rentals, rates, and charges for use of the services and facilities of
projects;
(5) To combine for financing purposes any two (2) or more projects;
(6) To establish and enforce rules and regulations for the use of any project;
(7) Without reference to KRS Chapter 56, to acquire and hold real and personal
property in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its functions and
duties under this section, and to dispose of property[the same] with due regard for
public health and safety, except in the case of radioactive waste material sites,
which may be disposed of only to the Commonwealth itself, or to the United States,
except as provided in subsection (2) of this section;
(8) To designate the locations and establish, limit, and control [such ]points of ingress
Page 174 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
to and egress from each project as the secretary determines[may determine] to be
necessary or desirable to ensure the proper operation and maintenance of the[such]
project, and to prohibit entrance to the[such] project from any point or points not so
designated;
(9) To make and enter into [such ]contracts and agreements with governmental
agencies and private enterprise [as may be ]necessary or incidental to the
performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this section;
(10) To employ scientists, consulting engineers, health officers, attorneys, accountants,
construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and [such ]other
employees and agents [as may be ]necessary in the judgment of the secretary and to
fix their compensation;
(11) To receive and accept from any governmental agency, or from private enterprise,
appropriations, grants, or contributions in money, property, labor, or other things of
value, to be held, used and applied for or in aid of any project; and
(12) To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly
granted in this section.
Section 101. KRS 153.420 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Center for the Arts Corporation:
(1) Shall supervise construction of the Kentucky Center for the Arts in conjunction
with the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and shall provide all management
functions for the facility and for any other property acquired or leased pursuant to
its powers under this section;
(2) May [take, ]acquire and hold property, and all interests in property[therein], by
deed, purchase, gift, devise, bequest, or lease[ or eminent domain], or by transfer
from the State Property and Buildings Commission, and may dispose of any
property so acquired in any manner provided by law[. In the exercise of its power of
eminent domain, it shall proceed in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain
Page 175 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Act of Kentucky, KRS 416.540 to 416.680];
(3) May consult or enter into agreements with other segments of the arts and
entertainment industry to provide technical, professional, or management support or
assistance, consistent with its purpose and mission;
(4) May issue revenue bonds, subject to procedures which shall be established by the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, solely payable from the charges, revenues,
rentals, and other funds pledged for their payment for the purpose of paying all or
any part of the cost of any project or for the acquisition of property;
(5) Shall promote the growth and development of the arts, convention trade, tourism
and the hotel industry within Jefferson County and the Commonwealth, through
utilization of the Kentucky center and activities authorized in this section to
enhance these and the public interest;
(6) May adopt administrative regulations, as provided in KRS Chapter 13A, governing
the operation, maintenance or use of property under its custody and control;
(7) May levy a surcharge on tickets for all functions held within the center to contribute
to operating revenue;
(8) May receive tax revenues from any governmental unit, and financial contributions
of local governments, private persons and foundations;
(9) Shall have exclusive control of all exhibitions, performances, and concessions in
the Center for the Arts. The corporation shall have a prior lien upon the property of
any private exhibitor, concessionaire, or other person holding an exhibition or
performance or operating a concession in the center, and may sell the[such]
property upon ten (10) days' notice to satisfy any indebtedness;
(10) Shall develop in conjunction with local hotels, and the arts and entertainment
industry, tourist packages including performance and group plans, and shall
participate with local hotels and convention bureaus in attracting non-arts related
conferences and conventions;
Page 176 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(11) May establish an executive committee from among its membership with full
authority to act between its meetings to the extent delegated by the corporation;
(12) May sue and be sued and maintain and defend legal actions in its corporate name;
(13) May, if the corporation elects, be exempt from [the provisions of ]KRS 56.065 to
56.180, and, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet and the Department of Insurance, purchase from the funds allotted to the
corporation property insurance for buildings and contents from responsible
insurance companies doing business in this state; and
(14) May purchase liability insurance for the protection of the corporation and its
employees from liability arising in the operation of the center.
Section 102. KRS 154.20-228 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall not approve a proposed data center project that otherwise meets
the requirements of KRS 154.20-220 to 154.20-229 if the proposed data center
project will result in the replacement of facilities existing in the state, except as
provided in this section.
(2) The authority may approve a proposed data center project that:
(a) Rehabilitates an existing data center used for activities of an eligible
company, if:
1. The data center to be rehabilitated has not been in operation for a period
of ninety (90) or more consecutive days;
2. a. The current occupant of the data center to be rehabilitated has
advertised a notice of closure; and
b. The eligible company proposing the data center project is not an
affiliate of the current occupant of the data center to be
rehabilitated; or
3. a. The data center to be rehabilitated is sold or transferred pursuant to
a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or an
Page 177 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
order of a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction; and
b. The title to the data center to be rehabilitated prior to the sale is
not vested in the eligible company;
(b) Replaces an existing data center of an eligible company if:
1. a. Title to the data center to be replaced:
i. Is held by exercise of the power of eminent domain; or
ii. May be taken pursuant to a nonappealable judgment granting
authority to exercise the power of eminent domain;
b. The title or judgment under subdivision a. of this subparagraph
was obtained prior to the effective date of this Act; and
c.[b.] Normal operations at the data center to be replaced cannot be
resumed within twelve (12) months; or
2. The data center to be replaced has been damaged or destroyed by fire or
other casualty to the extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at
the facility within twelve (12) months; or
(c) Replaces an existing data center located in the same county if the existing data
center cannot be expanded due to the unavailability of real estate at or
adjacent to the data center to be replaced. Any qualifying data center project
satisfying the requirements of this paragraph shall be eligible for incentives
under this subchapter only to the extent of the expansion. [No ]Incentives
shall not be available for the equivalent of the facility to be replaced or
rehabilitated.
(3) The authority shall not approve a proposed data center project under this section
which results in a lease abandonment or lease termination by the eligible company
without the consent of the lessor.
Section 103. KRS 154.22-040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each year, the authority shall, under its Rural Economic Development Assistance
Page 178 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Program, on the basis of the final unemployment figures calculated by the
Department of Workforce Development in the Education and Labor Cabinet,
determine which counties have had a countywide rate of unemployment exceeding
the statewide unemployment rate of the Commonwealth in the most recent five (5)
consecutive calendar years, or which have had an average countywide rate of
unemployment exceeding the statewide unemployment rate of the Commonwealth
by two hundred percent (200%) in the most recent calendar year, and shall certify
those counties as qualified counties. A county not certified on the basis of final
unemployment figures may also be certified as a qualified county if the authority
determines the county is one (1) of the sixty (60) most distressed counties in the
Commonwealth based on the following criteria with equal weight given to each
criterion:
(a) The average countywide rate of unemployment in the most recent three (3)
consecutive calendar years, on the basis of final unemployment figures
calculated by the Department of Workforce Development in the Education
and Labor Cabinet;
(b) In each county the percentage of adults twenty-five (25) years of age and
older who have attained at least a high school education or equivalent, on the
basis of the most recent data available from the United States Department of
Commerce, Bureau of the Census; and
(c) Road quality, as quantified by the access within a county to roads ranked in
descending order from best quality to worst quality as follows: two (2) or
more interstate highways, one (1) interstate highway, a state four (4) lane
parkway, four (4) lane principal arterial access to an interstate highway, state
two (2) lane parkway and none of the preceding road types, as certified by the
Kentucky Transportation Cabinet to the authority.
If the authority determines that a county which has previously been certified as a
Page 179 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
qualified county no longer meets the criteria of this subsection, the authority shall
decertify that county. The authority shall not provide inducements for any facilities
in that county and an approved company shall not be eligible for the inducements
offered by KRS 154.22-010 to 154.22-070 unless the tax incentive agreements
required herein are entered into by all parties prior to July 1 of the year following
the calendar year in which the authority decertified that county. In addition, the
authority shall certify coal-producing counties, not otherwise certified as qualified
counties in this subsection, for economic development projects involving the new
construction of electric generation facilities. A coal-producing county shall mean a
county in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that has produced coal upon which the
tax imposed under KRS 143.020 was paid at any time. For economic development
projects undertaken in a regional industrial park, as defined in KRS 42.4588, or in
an industrial park created pursuant to an interlocal agreement in which revenues are
shared as provided in KRS 65.210 to 65.300, where the physical boundaries of the
industrial park lie within two (2) or more counties of which at least one (1) of the
counties is a qualified county under this section, an eligible company undertaking
an economic development project within the physical boundaries of the industrial
park may be approved for the inducements under KRS 154.22-010 to 154.22-080.
(2) The authority shall establish the procedures and standards for the determination and
approval of eligible companies and their economic development projects by the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
The criteria for approval of eligible companies and economic development projects
shall include but not be limited to the creditworthiness of eligible companies; the
number of new jobs to be provided by an economic development project to
residents of the Commonwealth; and the likelihood of the economic success of the
economic development project.
(3) The economic development project shall involve a minimum investment of one
Page 180 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) by the eligible company and shall result in the
creation by the eligible company, within two (2) years from the date of the final
approval authorizing the economic development project, of a minimum of fifteen
(15) new full-time jobs at the site of the economic development project for
Kentucky residents to be employed by the eligible company and to be held by
persons subject to the personal income tax of the Commonwealth. The authority
may extend this two (2) year period upon the written application of an eligible
company requesting an extension.
(4) (a) Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall
compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees
whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:
1. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the
Commonwealth; or
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the county in
which the project is to be undertaken.
(b) If the base hourly wage calculated in paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection is
less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage, then
the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal
minimum wage. However, for projects receiving preliminary approval of the
authority prior to July 1, 2008, the base hourly wage shall be one hundred
fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage existing on January 1,
2007. In addition to the applicable base hourly wage calculated above, the
eligible company shall provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen
percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage; however, if the eligible
company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent
(15%) of the applicable base hourly wage, the eligible company may qualify
under this section if it provides the employees hired by the eligible company
Page 181 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
as a result of the economic development project total hourly compensation
equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the applicable
base hourly wage through increased hourly wages combined with employee
benefits.
(c) The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to eligible companies
which are nonprofit corporations established under KRS 273.163 to 273.387
and whose employees are handicapped and sheltered workshop workers
employed at less than the established minimum wage as authorized by KRS
337.295.
For an eligible company, within a regional industrial park which lies within two (2)
or more counties, the calculation of the wage and benefit requirement shall be
determined by averaging the average county hourly wage for all counties within the
regional industrial park.
(5) An[No] economic development project which will result in the replacement of
agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facilities existing in the state
shall not be approved by the authority; however, the authority may approve an
economic development project that:
(a) Rehabilitates an agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facility:
1. Which has not been in operation for a period of ninety (90) or more
consecutive days;
2. For which the current occupant of the facility has published a notice of
closure so long as the eligible company intending to acquire the facility
is not an affiliate of the current occupant; or
3. The title to which is vested in other than the eligible company or an
affiliate of the eligible company and that is sold or transferred pursuant
to a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or an order
of a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction;
Page 182 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(b) Replaces an agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facility
existing in the Commonwealth that[:
1. The title to which shall have been taken under the exercise of the power
of eminent domain, or the title to which shall be the subject of a
nonappealable judgment granting the authority to exercise the power of
eminent domain, if the title or judgment was obtained prior to the
effective date of this Act, and in either event to the extent that normal
operations cannot be resumed at the facility within twelve (12) months;
or
2. Which has been damaged or destroyed by fire or other casualty to the
extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within
twelve (12) months; or
(c) Replaces an existing agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation
facility located in the same qualified county, and the existing agribusiness,
manufacturing, or electric generation facility to be replaced cannot be
expanded due to the unavailability of real estate at or adjacent to the
agribusiness, manufacturing, or electric generation facility to be replaced. Any
economic development project satisfying the requirements of this subsection
shall only be eligible for inducements to the extent of the expansion, and [no
]inducements shall not be available for the equivalent of the agribusiness,
manufacturing, or electric generation facility to be replaced. An[No]
economic development project otherwise satisfying the requirements of this
subsection shall not be approved by the authority if the project would
result[which results] in a lease abandonment or lease termination by the
approved company without the consent of the lessor.
(6) With respect to each eligible company making an application to the authority for
inducements, and with respect to the economic development project described in
Page 183 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
the application, the authority shall request materials and make inquiries of the
applicant as necessary or appropriate. Upon review of the application and
completion of initial inquiries, the authority may, by resolution, give its preliminary
approval by designating an eligible company as a preliminarily approved company
and authorizing the undertaking of the economic development project. After
preliminary approval, the authority may by final approval designate an eligible
company to be an approved company.
Section 104. KRS 154.27-095 is amended to read as follows:
An[No] application for incentives found in KRS 154.27-010 to 154.27-095[154.27-100]
shall not be accepted by the authority for alternative fuel facilities, gasification facility,
energy-efficient facility, renewable energy facility, or a carbon dioxide transmission
pipeline after August 1, 2018. All outstanding projects with preliminary or final approval
shall continue to be governed by [the provisions of ]this subchapter.
Section 105. KRS 154.28-080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall promulgate standards for the determination and approval of
eligible companies and their economic development projects in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) The standards for approval of eligible companies and economic development
projects shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The creditworthiness of eligible companies;
(b) The number of new jobs to be provided by an economic development project
to the residents of the Commonwealth; and
(c) The likelihood of the economic success of the economic development project.
(3) The economic development project shall involve a minimum investment of one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) by the eligible company and shall result in the
creation by the eligible company, within two (2) years from the date of the final
resolution authorizing the economic development project, of a minimum of fifteen
Page 184 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(15) new full-time jobs at the site of the economic development projects for
Kentucky residents to be employed by the eligible company and to be held by
persons subject to the personal income tax of the Commonwealth. The authority
may extend this two (2) year period upon the written application of an eligible
company requesting an extension.
(4) (a) Within six (6) months after the activation date, the approved company shall
compensate a minimum of ninety percent (90%) of its full-time employees
whose jobs were created with base hourly wages equal to either:
1. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the
Commonwealth; or
2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the average hourly wage for the county in
which the project is to be undertaken.
(b) If the base hourly wage calculated in paragraph (a)1. or 2. of this subsection is
less than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage, then
the base hourly wage shall be one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the federal
minimum wage. However, for projects receiving preliminary approval of the
authority prior to July 1, 2008, the base hourly wage shall be one hundred
fifty percent (150%) of the federal minimum wage existing on January 1,
2007. In addition to the applicable base hourly wage calculated above, the
eligible company shall provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen
percent (15%) of the applicable base hourly wage; however, if the eligible
company does not provide employee benefits equal to at least fifteen percent
(15%) of the applicable base hourly wage, the eligible company may qualify
under this section if it provides the employees hired by the eligible company
as a result of the economic development project total hourly compensation
equal to or greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the applicable
base hourly wage through increased hourly wages combined with employee
Page 185 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
benefits.
(5) An[No] economic development project which will result in the replacement of a
manufacturing or agribusiness facility existing within the Commonwealth shall not
be approved by the authority; however, the authority may approve an economic
development project that:
(a) Rehabilitates a manufacturing or agribusiness facility:
1. Which has not been in operation for a period of ninety (90) or more
consecutive days;
2. For which the current occupant of the facility has published a notice of
closure so long as the eligible company intending to acquire the facility
is not an affiliate of the current occupant; or
3. To which the title is vested in other than the eligible company or an
affiliate of the eligible company and that is sold or transferred pursuant
to a foreclosure ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction or an order
of a bankruptcy court of competent jurisdiction;
(b) Replaces a manufacturing or agribusiness facility existing in the
Commonwealth:
1. To which the title shall have been taken under the exercise of the power
of eminent domain, or to which the title shall be the subject of a
nonappealable judgment granting the authority to exercise the power of
eminent domain, provided that the title or judgment was obtained prior
to the effective date of this Act, and in either event to the extent that
normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within twelve (12)
months; or
2. Which has been damaged or destroyed by fire or other casualty to the
extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility within
twelve (12) months; or
Page 186 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) Replaces an existing manufacturing or agribusiness facility located in the
same county that cannot be expanded due to the unavailability of real estate at
or adjacent to the manufacturing or agribusiness facility to be replaced. Any
economic development project satisfying the requirements of this subsection
shall be eligible only for inducements to the extent of the expansion, and [no
]inducements shall not be available for the equivalent of the manufacturing or
agribusiness facility to be replaced. An[No] economic development project
otherwise satisfying the requirements of this subsection shall not be approved
by the authority if the project would result[that results] in a lease
abandonment or lease termination by the eligible company without the
consent of the lessor.
(6) With respect to each eligible company making an application to the authority for
inducements, and with respect to these economic development projects described in
the application which do not involve an expansion, the authority shall make
inquiries and request materials of the applicant, including but not limited to written
evidence that except for the receipt of inducements authorized by KRS 154.28-015
to 154.28-090 and KRS 141.400, the eligible company will not locate its economic
development project within the Commonwealth. Upon the review of the application
and completion of initial inquiries, the authority may, by resolution, give its
preliminary approval by designating an eligible company as a preliminarily
approved company and authorizing the undertaking of the economic development
project.
(7) After a diligent review of the relevant materials and completion of its inquiries, the
authority, by resolution of its board of directors, may designate an eligible company
to be an approved company.
(8) All meetings of the board of directors of the authority shall be held in accordance
with KRS 61.805 to 61.850. The board of directors of the authority may, pursuant
Page 187 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
to KRS 61.815, hold closed sessions of its meetings to discuss matters exempt from
the open meetings law and pertaining to an eligible company.
Section 106. KRS 154.32-060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The authority shall not approve an economic development project that otherwise
meets the requirements of this subchapter if the economic development project will
result in the replacement of facilities existing in the state, except as provided in this
section.
(2) The authority may approve an economic development project that:
(a) Rehabilitates an existing facility used for activities of an eligible company, if:
1. The facility has not been in operation for a period of ninety (90) or more
consecutive days; or
2. a. The current occupant of the facility has advertised a notice of
closure; and
b. The eligible company proposing the economic development
project is not an affiliate of the current occupant of the facility; or
3. a. The facility is sold or transferred pursuant to a foreclosure ordered
by a court of competent jurisdiction or an order of a bankruptcy
court of competent jurisdiction; and
b. The title to the facility prior to the sale is not vested in the eligible
company or an affiliate of the eligible company; or
4. The existing facility is rehabilitated to enable a business to produce vital
medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to
produce personal protective equipment;
(b) Replaces an existing facility of an eligible company if:
1. a. Title to the facility:
i. Is held by exercise of the power of eminent domain; or
ii. May be taken pursuant to a nonappealable judgment
Page 188 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
granting authority to exercise the power of eminent
domain;
b. The title or judgment under subdivision (a) of this subparagraph
was obtained prior to the effective date of this Act; and
c.[b.] Normal operations at the facility cannot be resumed within twelve
(12) months;[ or]
2. The facility has been damaged or destroyed by fire or other casualty to
the extent that normal operations cannot be resumed at the facility
within twelve (12) months; or
3. The existing facility is replaced to enable a business to produce vital
medications, personal protective equipment, or equipment necessary to
produce personal protective equipment; or
(c) Replaces an existing facility located in the same county if the existing facility
cannot be expanded due to the unavailability of real estate at or adjacent to the
facility to be replaced. Any economic development project satisfying the
requirements of this paragraph shall be eligible for incentives under this
subchapter only to the extent of the expansion. No incentives shall be
available for the equivalent of the facility to be replaced or rehabilitated.
(3) The authority shall not approve an economic development project under this section
which results in a lease abandonment or lease termination by the approved company
without the consent of the lessor.
Section 107. KRS 154.50-320 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The purpose, duties, and powers of the authority shall be to:
(1)[(a)] Acquire, retain, and develop land for industrial and commercial purposes in
Kentucky; aid in the development and promotion of industrial sites, parks, and
subdivisions to meet industrial and commercial needs in Kentucky;[.]
(2)[(b)] Encourage the acquisition, retention, and development of land for industrial
Page 189 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
and commercial needs in Kentucky by other local development organizations, both
public and private;[.]
(3)[(c)] Cooperate with the United States Army Corps of Engineers and other federal
agencies in formulating development plans and in acquiring and developing land
for industrial and commercial purposes in accordance with these plans; and[.]
(4)[(d)] Acquire by contract, lease, purchase, gift, [condemnation, ]or otherwise any
real or personal property, or rights in property[therein], necessary or suitable for
establishing industrial sites, parks, or subdivisions. The authority may dispose of
any real or personal property, or rights in property[therein], which in the opinion of
the authority are no longer needed to carry out the purposes of KRS 154.50-301 to
154.50-346. The authority may lease, sell, or convey any or all industrial sites,
parks, and subdivisions owned or optioned by it to any public or private
organization, governmental unit, or industry for the purpose of constructing [and/]or
operating any manufacturing, industrial, or commercial facility. [Provided,
]However, a[that no] sale or conveyance of any land shall not be made to a private
organization or industry without that[such] organization or industry first having
executed a written contract with the authority providing that if no actual
construction of a manufacturing, industrial, or commercial facility, as set forth in
the executed contract, is commenced within ten (10) years, the organization or
industry shall offer to reconvey the land, free and clear of liens and encumbrances,
to the authority, and should the authority accept the offer of reconveyance, it shall
return to the organization or industry ninety-five percent (95%) of the purchase
price paid[ therefor].[
(2) Upon the adoption by the authority of a resolution reciting that property is needed
for industrial sites, parks, and subdivisions and cannot be acquired by negotiation
and purchase at its fair market value, the governmental units in which such land is
located may direct and institute condemnation proceedings in the name of such
Page 190 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
governmental units, for the use and benefit of the authority. The procedure for
condemnation shall conform to the procedure set out in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky. Upon acquisition of the property, the governmental unit shall convey the
property to the authority upon payment by the authority to the governmental unit of
an amount of money equal to the judgment and costs paid by the governmental
unit.]
Section 108. KRS 160.1597 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the approval of a charter contract by a public charter school authorizer, the
applicant shall be permitted to operate a public charter school for a term of five (5)
years.
(2) The board of directors of the public charter school shall negotiate and execute a
charter contract with the governing body of the authorizer.
(3) A public charter school shall have all corporate powers necessary and desirable for
carrying out a public charter school program in accordance with this section and the
terms of the charter contract, including all of the powers of a local board of
education and of a local school district, except as otherwise provided in KRS
160.1590 to 160.1599.
(4) The powers granted to a public charter school under this section constitute the
performance of essential public purposes and governmental purposes of this state. A
public charter school shall be exempt to the same extent as other public schools
from all taxation, fees, assessments, and special ad valorem levies on its earnings
and its property. Instruments of conveyance to or from a public charter school and
any bonds or notes issued by a public charter school, together with the income
received, shall at all times be exempt from taxation.
(5) A public charter school shall not have the power to levy taxes[ or to acquire
property by eminent domain], but shall have police powers to the same extent and
under the same requirements as a local school district.
Page 191 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(6) The board of directors of the public charter school shall have final authority over
policy and operational decisions of the public charter school, although the decision-
making authority may be delegated to the administrators and staff of the school in
accordance with the provisions of the charter contract.
(7) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, [no ]civil liability shall not attach
to any public charter school authorizer or to any of its members or employees,
individually or collectively, for any acts or omissions of the public charter school.
Neither the local school district nor the Commonwealth shall be liable for the debts
or financial obligations of a public charter school or any person or corporate entity
who operates a public charter school.
Section 109. KRS 164.260 is amended to read as follows:
The board of trustees may acquire additional lands or other property or material under
KRS 45.750(1)(f) and 164A.575 for the purpose of expanding its plant and extending its
usefulness.[ When unable to contract with the owner of land or other property or material
necessary for the purposes of the university, it may acquire the same by condemnation
proceedings in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.]
Section 110. KRS 164.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing board of a postsecondary education institution may purchase or lease
land under KRS 164A.575 for the purpose of securing the erection of buildings and
may receive by any legal mode of conveyance or[,] purchase, and hold property
under KRS 164A.575 of any description that the board deems necessary for the
purposes of the school, and may build and construct improvements for such
purposes and hold or sell the same. [If a governing board is unable to agree with the
owner of the real estate as to its value, or to its purchase, it may proceed in its own
name to condemn the real estate in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act
of Kentucky. ]Real estate acquired by purchase [or condemnation ]shall be paid for
out of money appropriated to the institution.
Page 192 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(2) The governing board of each institution shall periodically review the assets of the
institution and shall sell and convey under KRS 164A.575 those assets not
necessary for implementing the institutional mission. Proceeds from the disposition
shall be deposited in the unexpended plant fund account or in the fund for
excellence authorized by KRS 164A.620.
(3) Any real property acquired under this section shall be in name of the
Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the institution.
Section 111. KRS 164A.575 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing boards of each institution may elect to purchase interest in real
property, contractual services, rentals of all types, supplies, materials, equipment,
printing, and services, except that competitive bids may not be required for:
(a) Contractual services where no competition exists;
(b) Food, clothing, equipment, supplies, or other materials to be used in
laboratory and experimental studies;
(c) Instructional materials available from only one (1) source;
(d) Where rates are fixed by law or ordinance;
(e) Library books;
(f) Commercial items that are purchased for resale;
(g) Professional, technical, scientific, or artistic services, but contracts shall be
submitted in accordance with KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725;
(h) All other commodities, equipment, and services which, in the reasonable
discretion of the board, are available from only one (1) source; and
(i) Interests in real property.
(2) [Nothing in ]This section shall not deprive the boards from negotiating with
vendors who maintain a General Services Administration price agreement with the
United States of America or any agency thereof.[, provided,] However, a[that no]
contract executed under this section[provision] shall not authorize a price higher
Page 193 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
than is contained in the contract between General Services Administration and the
vendor affected.
(3) The governing board shall require the institution to take and maintain inventories of
plant and equipment.
(4) The governing board shall establish procedures to identify items of common
general usage among all departments to foster volume purchasing. It shall establish
and enforce schedules for purchasing supplies, materials, and equipment.
(5) The governing board shall have power to salvage and[,] to exchange[, and to
condemn] supplies, equipment, and real property.
(6) Upon the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the
governing board may purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to
be needed for the institution's use. The amount paid shall not exceed the fair market
value as determined by a qualified appraiser[ or the value set by the eminent
domain procedure]. Any real property acquired under this section shall be in name
of the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the institution.
(7) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 56.806, the governing board may renegotiate the cost
of a lease after the expiration of the lease term and any renewal terms
provided in the lease prior to any renewal not provided for in the terms of the
lease.
(b) Except when a lease incorporates a lease-purchase under KRS 56.806, the
governing board shall reserve the right to cancel a lease upon at least thirty
(30) days' written notice.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 56.823(2) and (3), any lease renewals, except automatic
renewals permitted under KRS 56.803, 56.805(2), and 56.806(1), for which
the annual rental cost will exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000)
shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee in the
same format as set out in KRS 56.823(2).
Page 194 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 56.813, a public college or university may pay for
improvements to leased property costing in excess of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) but less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in a lump sum upon
approval of its board using non-general fund appropriations and without
incurring debt.
(8) The governing board shall sell or otherwise dispose of all real or personal property
of the institution which is not needed or has become unsuitable for public use, or
would be more suitable consistent with the public interest for some other use, as
determined by the board. The determination of the board shall be set forth in an
order, and shall be reached only after review of a written request by the institution
desiring to dispose of the property. The[Such] request shall describe the property
and state the reasons why the institution believes disposal should be effected. All
instruments required by law to be recorded which convey any interest in any [such
]real property [so ]disposed of shall be executed and signed by the appropriate
officer of the board. Unless the board deems it in the best interest of the institution
to proceed otherwise, all such real or personal property shall be sold either by
invitation of sealed bids or by public auction.[; provided,] However, [that ]the
selling price of any interest in real property shall not be less than its[the] fair market
value [thereof ]as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the
Transportation Cabinet for the[such] requirements of that department.
(9) Real property or any interest in real property[therein] may, subject to [the
provisions of ]KRS Chapter 45A, be purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired from
any officer or employee of any board of the institution, based upon a written
application by the grantor or lessor approved by the board, that the employee has
not either himself or herself or through any other person influenced or attempted to
influence either the board requesting the purchase of the property. In any case in
which such an acquisition is consummated, the [said ]request and finding shall be
Page 195 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
recorded and kept by the Secretary of State along with the other documents
recorded pursuant to [the provisions of ]KRS Chapter 56.
(10) (a) As used in this section, "construction manager-agency," "construction
management-at-risk," "design-bid-build," "design-build," and "construction
manager-general contractor" [shall ]have the same meaning as in KRS
45A.030.
(b) For capital construction projects, the procurement may be on a total design-
bid-build basis, a design-build basis, construction manager-general contractor
basis, or construction management-at-risk basis, whichever in the judgment of
the board offers the best value to the taxpayer. Best value shall be determined
in accordance with KRS 45A.070. Proposals shall be reviewed by the
institution's engineering staff to assure quality and value, and compliance with
procurement procedures. All specifications shall be written to promote
competition. Services for projects delivered on the design-build basis,
construction manager-general contractor basis, or construction management-
at-risk basis shall be procured in accordance with KRS 45A.180, KRS
45A.183, and the regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS 45A.180.
[Nothing in ]This section shall not prohibit the procurement of construction
manager-agency services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 45A.185, for all capital construction projects, bidder
security for competitive sealed bidding for construction contracts shall only be
required when the price is estimated to exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000).
(11) The governing board shall attempt in every practicable way to ensure[insure] the
institution's supplying its real needs at the lowest possible cost. To accomplish this
the board may enter into cooperative agreements with other public or private
institutions of education or health care.
Page 196 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(12) The governing board shall have control and supervision over all purchases of
energy consuming equipment, supplies, and related equipment purchased or
acquired by the institution, and shall designate by regulation the manner in which
an energy-consuming[energy consuming] item will be purchased so as to promote
energy conservation and acquisition of energy efficient products.
(13) The governing board may negotiate directly for the purchase of contractual
services, supplies, materials, or equipment in bona fide emergencies regardless of
estimated costs. The existence of the emergency must be fully explained, in writing,
by the vice president responsible for business affairs, and the[such] explanation
shall[must] be approved by the institution president. The letter and approval shall
be filed with the record of all such purchases. Where practical, standard
specifications shall be followed in making emergency purchases. A good-
faith[good faith] effort shall be made to effect a competitively established price for
emergency purchases.
(14) (a) All governing boards that purchase agricultural products[,] as defined by KRS
45A.630[,] shall, on or before January 1 of each year, provide a report to the
Legislative Research Commission and to the Department of Agriculture
describing the types, quantities, and costs of each product purchased. The
report shall be completed on a form provided by the department.
(b) If purchasing agricultural products, a governing board shall encourage the
purchase of Kentucky-grown agricultural products in accordance with KRS
45A.645. If a governing board purchases agricultural products through a
contract with a vendor or food service provider, the contract shall require that
if Kentucky-grown agricultural products are purchased, the products shall be
purchased in accordance with KRS 45A.645. Only contracts entered into or
renewed after July 15, 2008, shall be required to comply with [the provisions
of ]this subsection.
Page 197 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) All governing boards that purchase Kentucky-grown agricultural products
shall, on or before January 1 of each year, provide a report to the Legislative
Research Commission and to the Department of Agriculture describing the
types, quantities, and costs of each product purchased. The report shall be
completed on a form provided by the department.
(15) Notwithstanding KRS 45.760, the governing board may authorize a capital
construction project or a major item of equipment even though it is not specifically
listed in any branch budget bill, subject to the following conditions and procedures:
(a) The full cost shall be funded solely by non-general fund appropriations;
(b) Moneys specifically budgeted and appropriated by the General Assembly for
another purpose shall not be allotted or reallotted for expenditure on the
project or major item of equipment. Moneys utilized shall not jeopardize any
existing program and shall not require the use of any current general funds
specifically dedicated to existing programs; and
(c) The institution's president, or designee, shall submit the project or major item
of equipment to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for
review as provided by KRS 45.800.
(16) Governing boards shall apply the reciprocal resident bidder preference described in
KRS 45A.494 prior to the award of any contract.
(17) Governing boards may authorize the use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS
45A.070 for the procurement of goods and leases.
Section 112. KRS 165.070 is amended to read as follows:
The board of trustees of a municipal university in a city of the first class may acquire, by
purchase or gift, lands and improvements for the purpose of expanding the plant and
extending the usefulness of the university[, and when unable to agree with the owner of
land and improvements necessary for the purposes of the university may proceed to
condemn the land and improvements. The condemnation proceedings shall be conducted
Page 198 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky].
Section 113. KRS 165.195 is amended to read as follows:
The board of trustees of a municipal college established pursuant to KRS 165.160 may
acquire, by purchase or gift, lands and improvements for the purpose of expanding the
plant and extending the usefulness of the college[, and when unable to agree with the
owner of land and improvements necessary for the purposes of the college may proceed
to condemn the land and improvements. The condemnation proceedings shall be
conducted in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky].
Section 114. KRS 168.100 is amended to read as follows:
The authority shall have no power of taxation, nor is it vested with the police power of
the Commonwealth[, except insofar as the exercise of the power of eminent domain may
be deemed a part thereof]. Otherwise, in general terms, it shall have and is hereby given
all [such ]constitutional powers [as are ]necessary to its accomplishment of the purpose
and implementation of the public policy [set forth ]in KRS 168.010. Without limiting the
generality of the foregoing, but only for assurance to parties transacting business with the
authority, and who may demand and be entitled to assurance, the following specific
powers are hereby vested in the authority:
(1) To receive and use in the furtherance of its lawful objectives state funds [as may be
]appropriated or allotted to it, any funds received for services rendered under
contract or from the sale of property owned by it, and contributions, matching
funds, gifts, bequests, and devises from any source, whether state or federal, and
whether public or private,[;] unless [the same be ]tendered subject to one (1) or
more conditions which are inconsistent with KRS 168.010 to 168.100, or otherwise
unlawful;
(2) To make contracts and agreements whereunder the authority may undertake to
provide educational television facilities and related functions and facilities to or for
any public body of the state or federal government in furtherance of educational
Page 199 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
television or in aid of any other public function. However, it shall be an express
provision of every such contract that the authority will not undertake to transmit or
relay, and will not permit any other party to transmit or relay, in the use of the
authority's television facilities, any subversive matter, any political propaganda, or
any image or message in the interests of any political party or candidate for public
office; or be used by, or in aid of, any church, sectarian, or denominational school;
but this proviso is not intended and shall not be construed to be a limitation upon
dissemination by the authority of legitimate objective instructional material which
is properly related to the study of history or of current events, or which is no more
than factually informative, of current issues of government, or of various political
ideologies;
(3) To produce, prepare, transmit, and relay, either from life or by recording on tape or
films, educational television programs and related services coordinated with the
curricula prescribed or approved for the public schools of the Commonwealth by
the department or the board pursuant to KRS 158.6451;
(4) To purchase or lease from others, or to contract with others for the use of, or the
right to transmit or relay, similar educational television programs and related
services, whenever in the opinion of the authority the programs or services[same]
are suitable and cannot be produced as effectively or economically through the use
of its own facilities;
(5) To purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, and to operate, television and related
facilities deemed by the authority to be necessary in the furtherance of its lawful
objectives[; and in this connection to acquire property by the exercise of the power
of eminent domain, in the manner authorized for the Department of Highways by
the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, whenever the same cannot be purchased,
leased, or otherwise acquired at a reasonable price after reasonable negotiations
with the owner or owners]. In all such matters, the authority shall be subject to [the
Page 200 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
provisions of ]KRS Chapters 45A and 56;
(6) To prescribe standards for receiving instruments which are purchased in the future
for use in the public schools, in order that reception of educational television
programs and related services may be acceptable and in conformity with the manner
of their transmission[ thereof]; and to disseminate those[such] standards, together
with technical information with regard to installations and use of receiving
instruments, to all of the public school districts, or to such as may request the
information[same];
(7) In its discretion and within the limitation of availability of funds from any sources,
to:
(a) Establish a program of matching funds as an inducement to public school
districts to purchase and install proper facilities for receiving and utilizing
educational television programs and related services, especially in situations
where by reason of topographical difficulties of reception, special antennas[,]
or other equipment may be required, and
(b) If [so ]requested by the boards of education of a sufficient number of public
school districts, to purchase through the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
subject to [the provisions of ]KRS Chapter 45A, receiving instruments on
their behalf on a wholesale basis for the purposes of economy, any such
purchases to be on a public competitive basis after due advertisement
according to law, but restricted to [such ]receiving instruments that[as] meet
the standards prescribed by the authority.
Section 115. KRS 173.600 is amended to read as follows:
Public library districts may, in addition to all other methods provided by law, acquire,
construct, and improve library facilities through the issuance of revenue bonds under the
terms and provisions of KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140].
Section 116. KRS 173.785 is amended to read as follows:
Page 201 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Public library districts may, in addition to all other methods provided by law, acquire,
construct, and improve library facilities through the issuance of revenue bonds under the
terms and provisions of KRS 58.010 to 58.130[58.140].
Section 117. KRS 175.590 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The authority is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase,
whenever it shall deem a[such] purchase expedient, solely from funds provided pursuant
to this chapter, any[such] lands, structures, property, rights, rights of way, franchises,
easements, and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian
rights, which are located within the Commonwealth, as it may deem necessary or
convenient for the construction and operation of any project, upon [such ]terms and at
[such ]prices it considers[as may be considered by it to be] reasonable and can be agreed
upon between it and the owner of the property[thereof], and to take title to the
property[thereto] in the name of the authority.[
(2) Whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon, or whenever the owner
is legally incapacitated or is absent, unknown or unable to convey valid title, the authority
is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by condemnation or by the exercise of the
power of eminent domain any lands, property, rights, rights of way, franchises, easements
and other property, including public lands, parks, playgrounds, reservations, highways or
parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein, of any person, copartnership, association,
railroad, public service, public utility or other corporation, or municipality or political
subdivision, deemed necessary or convenient for the construction or the efficient
operation of any project or necessary in the restoration of public or private property
damaged or destroyed. Any such proceedings shall be conducted, and the compensation
to be paid shall be ascertained and paid, in the manner provided by the Constitution and
laws of the Commonwealth then applicable which relate to condemnation or to the
exercise of the power of eminent domain by the department. Title to any property
acquired by the authority shall be taken in the name of the authority. In any
Page 202 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
condemnation proceedings the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action or proceeding
may make such orders as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to
be condemned and may require an undertaking or other security to secure such owners
against any loss or damage by reason of the failure of the authority to accept and pay for
the property, but neither such undertaking or security nor any act or obligation of the
authority shall impose any liability upon the Commonwealth except as may be paid from
the funds provided under this chapter.
(3) If the owner, lessee or occupier of any property to be condemned shall refuse
to remove his personal property therefrom or give up his possession thereof, the authority
may proceed to obtain possession in any manner now or hereafter provided by law.
(4) With respect to any railroad property or right of way upon which railroad
tracks are located, any powers of condemnation or of eminent domain may be exercised
to acquire only an easement interest therein which shall be located either sufficiently far
above or sufficiently far below the grade of any railroad track or tracks upon such
railroad property so that neither the proposed project nor any part thereof, including any
bridges, abutments, columns, supporting structures and appurtenances, nor any traffic
upon it, shall interfere in any manner with the use, operation or maintenance of the trains,
tracks, works or appurtenances or other property of the railroad nor endanger the
movement of the trains or traffic upon the tracks of the railroad. Prior to the institution of
condemnation proceedings for such easement over or under such railroad property or
right of way, plans and specifications of the proposed project showing compliance with
the above mentioned above or below grade requirements and showing sufficient and safe
plans and specifications of such overhead or undergrade structure and appurtenances
shall be submitted to the railroad for examination and approval. If the railroad fails or
refuses within thirty (30) days to approve the plans and specifications so submitted, the
matter shall be submitted to the Public Service Commission of Kentucky whose decision
arrived at after due consideration in accordance with its usual procedure, shall be final as
Page 203 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
to the sufficiency and safety of such plans and specifications and as to such elevations or
distances above or below the tracks. Said overhead or undergrade structure and
appurtenances shall be constructed only in accordance with such plans and specifications
and in accordance with such elevations or distances above or below the tracks so
approved by the railroad or the Public Service Commission as the case may be. A copy of
the plans and specifications approved by the railroad or the Public Service Commission
shall be filed as an exhibit with the petition for condemnation.]
Section 118. KRS 175B.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each project constructed or operated under this chapter shall be maintained and
kept in good condition and repair by the developing authority, which may contract
with the department or with any local highway department for maintenance of a
project.
(2) All private property damaged or destroyed in carrying out the powers granted by
this chapter shall be restored or repaired and placed in its original condition as
nearly as practicable or adequate compensation shall be made out of funds provided
under this chapter.
(3) All counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions and all public agencies
and commissions of the Commonwealth, notwithstanding any contrary provision of
law, may lease, lend, grant, or convey to an authority any real property which may
be necessary or convenient to the effectuation of the authorized purposes of the
authority, including public roads and other real property already devoted to public
use.[
(4) In obtaining property under this chapter, an authority shall pursue the acquisition
under the procedures and mandates of KRS 416.540 to 416.670.]
Section 119. KRS 177.081 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) The Commonwealth of Kentucky, Department of Highways, when it has, by official
order, designated the route, location, or relocation of a highway, limited access
Page 204 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
highway, bridge, roadside park, borrow-pit, quarry, garage, or other property or
structure deemed necessary for the construction, reconstruction, or maintenance of
an adequate system of highways, may, if unable to contract or agree with the owner
or owners thereof, condemn the lands or material, or the use and occupancy of the
lands designated as necessary. All property acquired by the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, Department of Highways, shall be in fee simple whenever so specified in
the petition filed in the action. The official order of the Department of Highways
shall be conclusive of the public use of the condemned property and the
condemnor's decision as to the necessity for taking the property will not be
disturbed in the absence of fraud, bad faith, or abuse of discretion.
(2) ]Any property purchased or otherwise acquired by the Department of Highways for
the purpose of construction or reconstruction of a road, street, or highway shall be cleared
and maintained by the Department of Highways from the time of acquisition until
the[such] property is no longer owned by the department.
[(3) The proceedings for condemnation shall be as provided in the Eminent Domain Act
of Kentucky.]
Section 120. KRS 177.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Highways is hereby authorized to acquire and improve strips of
land necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty
within and adjacent to federal-aid highways of this state, including acquisition and
development of publicly owned and controlled rest and recreation areas and
sanitary and other facilities within or adjacent to the highway right-of-way
reasonably necessary to accommodate the traveling public.
(2) The interest in any land authorized to be acquired and maintained under this section
may be the fee simple or any lesser interest, as determined by the Department of
Highways to be reasonably necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.
An[Such] acquisition may be by gift, purchase, or exchange[, or condemnation.
Page 205 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(3) The acquisition through condemnation shall be in accordance with the provisions of
the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky].
Section 121. KRS 177.420 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The department is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase,
whenever it shall deem a[such] purchase expedient, solely from funds provided under the
authority of KRS 177.390 to 177.570, any[such] lands, structures, property, rights, rights-
of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands lying under
water and riparian rights, which are located within the Commonwealth, as it may deem
necessary or convenient for the construction and operation of any project, upon [such
]terms and at [such ]prices it considers[as may be considered by it to be] reasonable and
can be agreed upon between it and the owner of the property[thereof], and to take title to
the property[thereto] in the name of the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of the
department.[
(2) Whenever a reasonable price cannot be agreed upon, or whenever the owner is
legally incapacitated or is absent, unknown or unable to convey valid title, the
department is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire by condemnation or by
the exercise of the power of eminent domain any lands, property, rights, rights-of-
way, franchises, easements and other property, including public lands, parks,
playgrounds, reservations, highways or parkways, or parts thereof or rights therein,
of any person, copartnership, association, railroad, public service, public utility or
other corporation, or municipality or political subdivision, deemed necessary or
convenient for the construction or the efficient operation of any project or necessary
in the restoration of public or private property damaged or destroyed. Any such
proceedings shall be conducted, and the compensation to be paid shall be
ascertained and paid, in the manner provided by the Constitution and laws of the
Commonwealth then applicable which relate to condemnation or to the exercise of
the power of eminent domain by the department. Title to any property acquired by
Page 206 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
the department shall be taken in the name of the Commonwealth for the use and
benefit of the department. In any condemnation proceedings the court having
jurisdiction of the suit, action or proceeding may make such orders as may be just to
the department and to the owners of the property to be condemned and may require
an undertaking or other security to secure such owners against any loss or damage
by reason of the failure of the department to accept any pay for the property, but
neither such undertaking or security nor any act or obligation of the department
shall impose any liability upon the Commonwealth except as may be paid from the
funds provided under the authority of KRS 177.390 to 177.570.
(3) If the owner, lessee or occupier of any property to be condemned shall refuse to
remove his personal property therefrom or give up possession thereof, the
department may proceed to obtain possession in any manner now or hereafter
provided by law.
(4) With respect to any railroad property or right-of-way upon which railroad tracks are
located, any powers of condemnation or of eminent domain may be exercised to
acquire only an easement interest therein which shall be located either sufficiently
far above or sufficiently far below the grade of any railroad track or tracks upon
such railroad property so that neither the proposed project nor any part thereof,
including any bridges, abutments, columns, supporting structures and
appurtenances, nor any traffic upon it, shall interfere in any manner with the use,
operation or maintenance of the trains, tracks, works or appurtenances or other
property of the railroad nor endanger the movement of the trains or traffic upon the
tracks of the railroad. Prior to the institution of condemnation proceedings for such
easement over or under such railroad property or right-of-way, plans and
specifications of the proposed project showing compliance with the above-
mentioned above or below grade requirements and showing sufficient and safe
plans and specifications of such overhead or undergrade structure and
Page 207 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
appurtenances shall be submitted to the railroad for examination and approval. If
the railroad fails or refuses within thirty (30) days to approve the plans and
specifications so submitted, the matter shall be submitted to the Public Service
Commission of Kentucky whose decision, arrived at after due consideration in
accordance with its usual procedure, shall be final as to the sufficiency and safety of
such plans and specifications and as to such elevations or distances above or below
the tracks. Said overhead or undergrade structure and appurtenances shall be
constructed only in accordance with such plans and specifications and in
accordance with such elevations or distances above or below the tracks so approved
by the railroad or the Public Service Commission as the case may be. A copy of the
plans and specifications approved by the railroad or the Public Service Commission
shall be filed as an exhibit with the petition for condemnation.]
Section 122. KRS 177.867 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]The commissioner of the Department of Highways is authorized to acquire by
purchase[,] or gift[, or condemnation pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky
and shall pay just compensation upon the removal of] the following advertising devices:
(1)[(a)] Those lawfully in existence on October 22, 1965;
(2)[(b)] Those lawfully on any highway designated a part of the interstate or federal-
aid primary system on or after October 22, 1965, and before January 1, 1968;
(3)[(c)] Those lawfully erected on or after January 1, 1968;
(4)[(d)] Those lawfully in existence on January 1, 1976; and
(5)[(e)] Those lawfully erected or maintained, or both, between January 1, 1976, and
December 31, 1989.[
(2) Compensation shall be paid for the following:
(a) The taking from the owner of any such advertising device of all right, title,
leasehold, and interest in such advertising device; and
(b) The taking from the owner of the real property on which the advertising
Page 208 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
device is located, of the right to erect and maintain such advertising devices
thereon.]
Section 123. KRS 177.880 is amended to read as follows:
[Nothing in ]KRS 177.830 to 177.890 shall not be construed to abrogate or affect [the
provisions of ]any municipal ordinance, regulation, or resolution which is more
restrictive concerning advertising devices than [the provisions of ]KRS 177.830 to
177.890 or of the regulations adopted hereunder[; provided that no city, county or urban-
county government and no commission, agency or department of any of the foregoing, or
any person acting under authority directly or indirectly conferred by any municipal
ordinance, regulation or resolution shall have any authority to require any sign or other
advertising device which is within its jurisdiction, which was lawfully erected or installed
and which is maintained in good repair to be removed without payment of just
compensation as provided under KRS 177.867(2)].
Section 124. KRS 178.333 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The fiscal court of a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated
local government may[,] at any time[,] add other roads, or portions of roads, to the
county through road system adopted in accordance with KRS 178.330. The fiscal
court or a consolidated local government shall cause the proposed addition to be
marked on a map to be deposited with the county road engineer and to be open to
public inspection. The same procedure [set forth ]in KRS 178.330 for the
establishment or maintenance of the county through road system shall be followed
in the case of roads or portions of roads added thereto. Notice of the proposed
addition to the system shall conform to KRS 424.130(1)(b).
(2) The fiscal court of a county containing a city of the first class or a consolidated
local government may establish or maintain a new road in compliance with[ the
provisions of ]KRS 178.115, 178.116, and 178.117[ to 178.125], or relocate a road
in accordance with KRS 178.115, and at the same time add it to the county through
Page 209 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
road system, following the same procedure [as is now set forth ]in KRS 178.330
and subsection (1) of this section, including notice in accordance with KRS
424.130(1)(b).
(3) The decisions of the fiscal court or the consolidated local government made in
accordance with this section shall be final.
Section 125. KRS 179.310 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]When lands are entered upon under [the provisions of ]KRS 179.300, the county
engineer may agree with the owner of the lands, subject to the approval of the fiscal
court, as to the amount of damages sustained by the owner because of the entry, and the
amount of damages shall be paid by the fiscal court out of the county road fund.[
(2) If the county engineer is unable to agree with the owner upon the amount of the
damages, the amount shall be determined and paid in the manner provided in KRS
178.110.]
Section 126. KRS 179.370 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If it appears necessary to close a county road or bridge which is being constructed
or repaired, the county engineer shall execute a notice in duplicate, stating the
necessity for closing the road or bridge, and describing the portion to be closed. He
or she shall cause a copy of the notice to be posted at each end of the portion of the
road or bridge to be closed, and shall close that[such] portion to travel by erecting
suitable obstructions and posting conspicuous notices to the effect that it is closed.
Not more than one (1) mile of any county road shall be closed at one (1) time.
(2) The county engineer shall provide a new location for constructing a temporary road
to be used in lieu of the closed road, and may erect temporary bridges when
necessary. For the purposes of locating or constructing the temporary road or
bridge, the county engineer may enter upon the lands adjoining or near the closed
road, and may, with the approval of the fiscal court, agree with the owners of the
lands as to the damages caused thereby.
Page 210 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(3) [If the county engineer is unable to agree with the owner upon the amount of
damages sustained, the amount shall be ascertained and paid as provided in KRS
178.110.
(4) ]When a county road[,] or bridge, has been closed to the public as provided in this
section, a[no] person shall not disregard the obstructions and notices and drive or
ride over the portion of the road, or bridge, so closed.
Section 127. KRS 179.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any county engineer who fails to comply with [the provisions of subsection (3) of
]KRS 179.040(3) shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500).
(2) Any person who fails to perform the duties imposed by KRS 179.220 and 179.230
shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).
(3) Any county engineer who fails to publish the notices required by KRS 179.230
shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25), nor more than one hundred
dollars ($100).
(4) Any person who violates[ subsection (2) of] KRS 179.240(2) shall be fined not less
than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).
(5) Any railroad company that fails to comply with [the provisions of ]KRS 179.290
within the specified time[,] shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500)
nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each failure.
(6) Any county engineer who willfully fails to comply with [the provisions of ]KRS
179.320 for sixty (60) days after the fiscal court has ordered the guideboards to be
erected[,] shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25).
(7) Any person who violates[ subsection (4) of] KRS 179.330(4)[,] shall be fined not
less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each
offense.
(8) Any owner of a toll bridge who fails to repair the bridge when ordered to do so
under [the provisions of ]KRS 179.360 shall be fined fifty dollars ($50).
Page 211 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(9) Any person who violates[ subsection (4) of] KRS 179.370(3) shall be fined not less
than five dollars ($5) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25).
(10) Any person who violates[ subsection (2) of] KRS 179.380(2) shall be fined not less
than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).
(11) Any county engineer who violates KRS 179.460 shall be fined not less than twenty
dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
(12) Any county engineer who fails to perform the duties of his or her office shall,
unless a different penalty is prescribed, be fined not over one hundred dollars
($100).
(13) Any county engineer who fails to cause contractors for county road and bridge
work to perform their duties shall be fined not over one hundred dollars ($100).
(14) Any county engineer who fails to prosecute for any penalty [provided ]in KRS
Chapters 178 and 179, knowing that the penalty has been incurred, shall be fined
twenty-five dollars ($25) for each failure to prosecute.
(15) If a fiscal court or county judge/executive willfully fails to perform any duty
required of it by [the provisions of ]this chapter, except KRS 179.230 and 179.320,
every member of the court concurring in the failure shall be fined not less than ten
dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) by the Circuit Court of the
county.
(16) All fines imposed by this chapter shall be paid into the county road fund.
(17) A[No] fine imposed by this chapter shall not bar an action for damages for breach
of contract.
(18) Any person, subdivider, builder, contractor, or developer of any construction
project who violates[ subsection (2) of] KRS 179.070(2) shall be fined not less than
five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each
offense.
Section 128. KRS 180.240 is amended to read as follows:
Page 212 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
The money collected under KRS 180.020 to 180.250 shall be paid into the State Treasury
and constitute the highway bridge fund. A[No] part of the fund [thereof] shall not be
withdrawn from the Treasury, except for the purposes of refunding to the state road fund
the cost of preparing plans, specifications, purchasing real estate, [exercising the rights of
eminent domain, ]issuing and selling of bonds, the payment for labor and material and all
expenses necessary to begin the construction of a bridge, and all other purposes
specifically set out or reasonably implied in KRS 180.020 to 180.240, including the
acquisition or building of bridges.
Section 129. KRS 180.260 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Highways may purchase [or condemn ]any ferry [that is ]located
within ten (10) miles of a toll bridge owned in whole or in part by the state, if the
department considers it necessary or advisable in order to protect the bridge from
ferry competition.
(2) Any ferry acquired under subsection (1) of this section shall be paid for out of
appropriations out of the state road fund.
Section 130. KRS 183.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet may acquire or dispose by contract, purchase, lease, donation,
[condemnation ]or otherwise, airports, buildings, runways, grounds and other
facilities suitable for airport purposes and the proper safeguards to flying where
the[such] acquisition or disposal shall be in the public interest.
(2) The cabinet may make additions and improvements to airports or facilities, and
either alone or with the cooperation of others, provide personnel, heat, light, water,
fuel, telephone service, drainage, runways, fueling facilities, radio and navigation
facilities, and other costs of operation and maintenance, including insurance, and
may bear the expense of removal or change of obstructions that menace air travel.
(3) The cabinet may enter into contracts of lease for land or facilities to which title is
vested in the Commonwealth with any city, or cities, county, or counties,
Page 213 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
governmental unit, political subdivision, air board, or person for the furtherance of
the purposes of this chapter. All rents or revenues derived from any contracts of
lease shall become the property of the cabinet to be expended by it in carrying out
the purposes of this chapter.
(4) The cabinet may give any[such] advice and assistance, including financial aid,
engineering, and technical assistance within the limits of its resources as it deems
advisable, to enable any governmental unit or board to acquire, construct, expand,
maintain, and operate airports or otherwise assist in the development of aeronautics
within their limits.[ Aid may include the exercise of the cabinet's power of eminent
domain, if such usage is requested by the governmental unit or board. Where such
eminent domain powers are utilized, title to acquire property may vest in the
governmental unit.]
Section 131. KRS 183.122 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Where necessary, in order to provide unobstructed air space for the landing and
taking off of aircraft utilizing airports acquired or operated under [the provisions of
]this chapter, the cabinet is hereby granted authority to [condemn and ]acquire, in
the same manner as is provided for the acquisition of property for airport purposes,
easements through or other interests in air space over land or water, interests in
airport hazards outside the boundaries of the airports and any[such] other airport
protection privileges, together with rights of ingress and egress thereto and
therefrom, as are necessary to ensure[insure] safe approaches to the landing areas
[of said airports ]and the safe and efficient operation of the airports[thereof]. The
cabinet is authorized to acquire, in the same manner, the right or easement, for a
term of years or perpetually, to place or maintain suitable marks for the daytime
marking and suitable lights or marks for the night marking of airport hazards,
including the right of ingress and egress to and from any[such] airport hazards for
the purpose of maintaining and repairing [such ]lights and marks.
Page 214 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(2) The secretary may, by order, authorize any airport board or governmental unit to
[condemn and ]acquire[, with the full power of the Commonwealth, in the manner
provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky,] any of the interests, easements,
airport protection privileges, interests in air space, rights, or hazard marking
privileges described in subsection (1), or any real or personal property.[ Any
condemnation proceeding which may be necessary for such acquisition, if filed
under this subsection, shall be filed in the name of the Commonwealth on relation
of the secretary of transportation, and of the airport board or governmental unit
making such acquisition.]
(3) The authority granted in subsections (1) and (2) shall not be [so ]construed [as ]to
limit the right, power, or authority of the state or any municipality or governmental
unit to zone property adjacent to any airport pursuant to any law of this state.
Section 132. KRS 183.133 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of the board shall be to establish, maintain, operate, and expand
necessary, desirable, or appropriate airport and air navigation facilities. It shall have
the duty and any[such] powers [as may be ]necessary[,] or desirable to promote and
develop aviation, including air transportation, airports, and air navigation facilities.
(2) The board shall establish and fix reasonable rates, charges, and fees for the use of
the landing area, ramps, and other common aviation facilities. In fixing those[such]
rates, charges, or fees, the board may take into consideration, among other factors,
the total capital investment by the board or other local or state governmental
authority, the revenue needed properly to maintain the[such] facilities, the revenue
needed properly to expand the airport and its facilities, the portion of the facilities
utilized by the licensee or contracting party and its customers, and the volume and
type of business conducted. Any party aggrieved by the rates, charges, or fees may
appeal from the action of the board to the Circuit Court of the county within which
the board operates, within ninety (90) days from the date that the board finally
Page 215 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
publishes the[such] rates, charges, or fees and gives notice of their
publication[same] to the contracting party or licensee. The Circuit Court may hear
evidence and determine whether or not the rates, charges, or fees are, or are not,
reasonable in amount. Appeal from the judgment of the Circuit Court may be
prosecuted as any other civil appeal.
(3) The board shall likewise have power[, from time to time,] to fix rates, charges, or
fees by contract, or by publishing general rates, charges, or fees for commercial
vendors, concessionaires, or other persons for the use or occupancy of terminal or
other ground use facilities, under [such ]terms or conditions as it deems[may deem]
to be in the best interest of maintaining, operating, or expanding necessary airport
or air navigation facilities, and the public use of the facilities[thereof].
(4) The board may acquire by contract, lease, purchase, gift, [condemnation ]or
otherwise any real or personal property, or rights in property[therein], necessary for
establishing, operating, or expanding airports and air navigation facilities. The
board may erect, equip, operate, and maintain on such property, buildings and
equipment necessary, desirable, or appropriate for airport or air navigation
facilities. The board may dispose of any real or personal property, or rights in
property[therein], which, in the opinion of the board are no longer needed for
operating or expanding the airport or air navigation facilities.
(5) [The board or any other governmental unit may by resolution reciting that the
property is needed for airport or air navigation purposes direct the condemnation of
any property, including navigation or other easements. The procedure for
condemnation shall conform to the procedures set out in the Eminent Domain Act
of Kentucky.
(6) ]The board or any other governmental unit may [from time to time ]make, adopt,
and enforce such rules, regulations, and ordinances as it may find necessary,
desirable, or appropriate for carrying into effect the purposes of this chapter,
Page 216 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
including those relating to the operation and control of the airport, airport facilities,
or air navigation facilities owned or operated by the[such] board or [such ]other
governmental unit. All rules, regulations, and ordinances adopted pursuant to this
section shall be published according to [the provisions of ]KRS 424.130, and the
board or other governmental unit adopting them shall keep a permanent record of
the[such] rules, regulations, and ordinances available for public inspection[,] on the
airport premises. Prosecution for a violation of any rule, regulation, or ordinance
adopted pursuant to this section shall be in the District Court of any county within
which the airport is located.
(6)[(7)] Any board may engage in activities to promote, encourage, or develop the use
of airports or air navigation facilities under its control, and any board which has
members [thereof ]appointed by the Governor shall be assisted in those[such]
activities by the state Cabinet for Economic Development if it requests [such
]assistance from the cabinet.
Section 133. KRS 183.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person violating [any of the provisions of ]this chapter with respect to
operation of aircraft[,] or violating [the provisions of ]any rule, regulation, or
ordinance adopted under KRS 183.133(5)[(6),] shall be fined not less than fifty
dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more
than ninety (90) days or both.
(2) Each violation of the statutes pertaining to the state airport zoning commission or of
any order, rule, or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto shall be punishable by a
fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500) or imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days or both and each day a
violation continues to exist shall constitute a separate offense.
(3) Any person who violates [the provisions of ]KRS 183.886 shall be fined not less
than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or shall be
Page 217 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
imprisoned in the county jail for not less than ten (10) nor more than ninety (90)
days, or both.
(4) Any person who violates [the provisions of ]KRS 183.086 or 183.887(2) shall be
guilty of:
(a) A Class A misdemeanor; or
(b) A Class D felony[,] if the violation causes a significant change of course or a
serious disruption to the safe travel of the aircraft that threatens the physical
safety of the passengers and crew of the aircraft.
Section 134. KRS 184.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [(a) ]A transportation improvement district may acquire by purchase, lease, lease-
purchase, lease with option to purchase, appropriation, or otherwise in the manner
and for the consideration it considers proper, any public or private property
necessary, convenient, or proper for the construction, maintenance, repair, or
operation of a project. The district may pledge net revenues, to the extent permitted
by KRS 184.350 to 184.395 with respect to bonds, to secure payments to be paid by
the district under such a lease, lease-purchase agreement, or lease with option to
purchase. Title to real and personal property shall be held in the name of the
district.[
(b) If a district cannot come to terms on any property purchase, the district may
request the city or county that established the district to acquire the property
in accordance with KRS 416.540 to 416.670. Except as otherwise agreed to
by the owner, full compensation shall be paid for public property so taken.]
(2) This section shall[does] not authorize a district to take or disturb property or
facilities belonging to any public utility or to a common carrier engaged in
interstate commerce when the property or facilities are required for the proper and
convenient operation of the public utility or common carrier, unless provision is
made for the restoration, relocation, replication, or duplication of the property or
Page 218 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
facilities elsewhere at the sole cost of the district.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in KRS 184.350 to 184.395, disposition of real
property shall be by sale, lease-purchase agreement, lease with option to purchase,
or otherwise in the manner and for the consideration as the district determines if to
a governmental agency, and otherwise in the manner provided in this section.
Disposition of personal property shall be in the manner and for the consideration as
the district determines.
Section 135. KRS 216.335 is amended to read as follows:
The government of the hospital district shall be vested in the board which shall have
general control of the property and affairs of the district and shall have all the powers
necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS 216.310 to 216.360, including[,] but not
confined to[,] the following:
(1) To construct, acquire, add to, maintain, operate, develop and regulate, sell and
convey all lands, property rights, equipment, hospital facilities and systems for the
maintenance of hospitals, buildings, structures and any other facilities;
(2) [To exercise the right of eminent domain for the purposes of the district except that
no hospital district shall have the right of eminent domain against any hospital,
clinic or sanatorium operated by a nonprofit charitable, religious or public
organization, or against any private hospital, clinic or sanatorium;
(3) ]To receive, acquire, hold, manage, expend, sell, and convey donations and
bequests of real and personal property for hospital purposes within the district;
(3)[(4)] To establish and maintain a public hospital or hospitals in the district and
where necessary make provision for education of needed personnel to operate
those[such] hospitals;
(4)[(5)] To lease existing hospital or hospitals and equipment and other property used
in connection with the operation of a hospital, and to pay rent[such rental therefor
]as the board shall deem proper;
Page 219 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(5)[(6)] To enter into contracts and agreements with any person or corporation, public
or private, affecting the affairs of the district, including contracts with cities,
counties, other municipalities, the Commonwealth, or the United States of America
and any of its agents or instrumentalities;
(6)[(7)] To enter into contracts with a nonprofit corporation acting as a governmental
agency for the construction and equipping of a hospital or hospitals, and the leasing
of the same to the district;
(7)[(8)] To sue and be sued;
(8)[(9)] To make contracts, employ an administrator, attorneys, and other technical or
professional assistance and all other employees as the needs of the district may
require, and to prescribe their duties and compensation;
(9)[(10)] To have perpetual existence;
(10)[(11)] To borrow money on the credit of the board in anticipation of the revenue to
be derived from anticipated revenue from user fees or from taxes levied by the
district for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed, and to pledge the taxes
levied for the district for the payment of the principal and interest of the loan;
(11)[(12)] To establish bylaws it deems necessary or expedient to define the duties of
officers, assistants, or employees, to fix the conditions of admission to the hospitals
of the district, and the support and discharge of patients, and to conduct in a proper
manner the professional and business affairs of the district;
(12)[(13)] To establish and enforce a suitable system of rules and regulations for the
internal government, discipline, and management of the hospitals of the district;
(13)[(14)] To determine annually the amount of tax, not to exceed ten cents ($0.10) per
one hundred dollars ($100) of property assessed for taxation, to be levied upon the
taxable property of the district, for the purposes of the district, and to certify to the
fiscal court of each county in the district and to each county clerk for inclusion on
the tax bills of property owners in the district.
Page 220 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Section 136. KRS 220.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If no suit is filed against the commissioner under KRS 220.100, or if suit is filed
and final judgment in the Circuit Court or an appeal is in favor of the commissioner,
the commissioner shall immediately[forthwith] declare the district organized into a
sanitation district and give it a corporate name, as provided in KRS 220.050, by
which in all proceedings it shall thereafter be known. The commissioner shall
certify his or her act to the county clerk of each county in which any part of the
district is located, and to the Secretary of State, each of whom shall record the
certificate as articles of incorporation. The commissioner shall also certify his or
her act to the county judge/executive of each county in which any part of the
district is located. The district shall then be a political subdivision, except as
otherwise specifically provided in KRS 220.530, with power to sue and be sued,
contract and be contracted with, incur liabilities and obligations,[ exercise the right
of eminent domain,] assess, tax, and contract for rentals as herein provided, issue
bonds, and do and perform all acts [herein ]expressly authorized and all acts
necessary and proper for the carrying out of the purpose for which the district was
created, and for executing the powers with which it is invested.
(2) The board of directors of the district may amend the corporate name of the district,
but the amendment shall not be effective until certified by the board to the
commissioner, the county clerk and county judge/executive of each county in which
any part of the district is located, and to the Secretary of State.
Section 137. KRS 224.80-180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An environmental covenant shall be perpetual except under the following
circumstances:
(a) By its terms, the environmental covenant is limited to a specific duration or is
terminated by the occurrence of a specific event;
(b) The environmental covenant is terminated pursuant to KRS 224.80-190; or
Page 221 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) The environmental covenant is terminated by foreclosure of an interest that
has priority over the environmental covenant[; or
(d) The environmental covenant is terminated or modified in an eminent domain
proceeding and the following conditions exist:
1. The cabinet is a party to the eminent domain proceeding;
2. All persons identified in KRS 224.80-190(1) and (2) are given notice of
the pendency of the eminent domain proceeding; and
3. A court of competent jurisdiction determines, after hearing, that the
termination or modification of the environmental covenant will not
adversely affect human health or the environment].
(2) If the cabinet or [if ]any holder determines that the intended benefits of an
environmental covenant can no longer be realized, Franklin Circuit Court, under the
doctrine of changed circumstances, in an action in which all persons identified in
KRS 224.80-190(1) and (2) have been given notice, may terminate the
environmental covenant or reduce its burden on the real property subject to the
environmental covenant.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an
environmental covenant may not be extinguished, limited, or impaired through the
issuance of a tax deed, foreclosure of a tax lien, or application of the doctrine of
adverse possession, prescription, abandonment, waiver, lack of enforcement,
acquiescence, or a similar doctrine.
Section 138. KRS 224A.070 is amended to read as follows:
The authority may carry out and perform the following essential governmental functions
of statewide import and concern:
(1) To promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
and adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business,
which shall define with specificity conditions precedent under which applications
Page 222 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
for loans or grants may be made and the order of priority upon which applications
shall be acted upon;
(2) To retain an executive director, who shall be experienced and knowledgeable in the
fields in which the authority may act, together with other employees, including for
example only, engineers, accountants, and attorneys, necessary and appropriate to
enable the authority to fulfill its duties, functions, and responsibilities;
(3) To adopt a corporate seal;
(4) To sue and be sued in its own name and to have the right, power, and authority to
enforce its obligations and covenants made pursuant to [the provisions of ]this
chapter;
(5) To levy a tax on every purchase of water service and sewer service in the state,
[such] a tax to be equal to not more than two percent (2%) of the gross amount of
the bill for water services rendered;
(6) To approve or reject applications made to the authority for loans or grants;
(7) To lease an infrastructure project or make loans or grants to or purchase or
refinance obligations of any governmental agency for the purpose of assisting the
governmental agency in the construction of an infrastructure project. A lease, loan,
or grant shall be in accordance with the terms and conditions of an assistance
agreement by and between the authority and the governmental agency, which shall
include the provisions and conditions specified in KRS 224A.100, and any[such]
other reasonable terms and conditions as the authority shall determine;
(8) [Without reference to the provisions of KRS Chapter 56, to acquire and hold in the
name of the authority, by the exercise of the power of eminent domain pursuant to
the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, the real property or rights therein, including
rights-of-way, easements and licenses, and the personal property reasonably
deemed necessary to effectuate the development, implementation, financing, and
construction or acquisition of any infrastructure project, and to make the properties
Page 223 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
available to a governmental agency in connection with an infrastructure project;
(9) ]To receive service charges from governmental agencies which have entered into
assistance agreements with the authority, in accordance with the terms and
conditions of the assistance agreements, and to use and employ the service charges
in accordance with [the provisions of ]this chapter, the service charges to constitute
authority revenues;
(9)[(10)] To enter into and enforce assistance agreements made and entered into with
governmental agencies by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, including
the obtaining by judicial decree of the appointment of a receiver to administer
infrastructure projects financed by leases, loans, or grants which have been
undertaken by governmental agencies;
(10)[(11)] To enter into any necessary or required agreement with federal or state
agencies or persons to carry out [the provisions of ]this chapter;
(11)[(12)] To bid at a competitive public sale of obligations of a governmental agency or
negotiate the purchase or sale of obligations of a governmental agency,
notwithstanding any other law to the contrary;
(12)[(13)] To borrow money and issue negotiable bonds and notes pursuant to this
chapter;
(13)[(14)] To lend money to governmental agencies or to advance moneys from the
infrastructure revolving fund to the federally assisted wastewater revolving fund in
order to match federal moneys that may become available;
(14)[(15)] To contract with the federal government as to any infrastructure project;
(15)[(16)] To participate with the federal government or any of its agencies, the state
government or any of its agencies or political subdivisions, or any other person in
the construction or repair of any infrastructure project; and
(16)[(17)] To have, possess, and exercise all other powers reasonably incident to the
carrying out of the duties and responsibilities of the authority.
Page 224 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Section 139. KRS 243.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [The provisions of ]This section shall apply to any licensee who is unable to
continue in business at the licensed premises because of:
(a) An act of God;
(b) A casualty;
(c) An acquisition by a federal[, state, city, or other] governmental agency under
the power of eminent domain granted to the government or agency;
(d) [A voluntary or involuntary acquisition by any corporation or other business
entity recognized by law through the power of eminent domain;
(e) ]A loss of lease because the landlord fails to renew an existing lease;
(e)[(f)] Court action;
(f)[(g)] Default under a security agreement;
(g)[(h)] Default under a lease; or
(h)[(i)] Other verifiable business reason.
(2) If a license issued by the department has been revoked, the former licensee may,
under the supervision of the state administrator, dispose of and transfer the former
licensee's stock to another licensee if the disposition is completed within ninety (90)
days and the licensee is a distiller, rectifier, winery, or brewer. The disposition shall
be completed within thirty (30) days if the licensee is a wholesaler or distributor or
within twenty (20) days if the licensee is a retailer.
(3) A retail licensee in good standing with the department who voluntarily ceases to
operate the licensed business for any reason other than revocation by the board or a
court order shall dispose of all alcoholic beverage or cannabis-infused beverage
inventory within thirty (30) days of the event. The following requirements shall
apply to the disposition of the licensee's inventory:
(a) If the premises is still open to the public and the licensee has not yet
surrendered the license, the licensee shall sell alcoholic beverages or
Page 225 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
cannabis-infused beverages only to the public and shall not sell below costs;
(b) If a licensee has terminated the licensed business, the licensee shall submit a
written request for approval from the state administrator within ten (10) days
in advance of the sale to dispose of the licensee's remaining inventory. The
request shall identify the retailer who is purchasing the inventory, the
proposed date of the sale, and the quantity, types, and brands of alcoholic
beverages or cannabis-infused beverages to be sold; and
(c) If a licensee has more than one (1) licensed retail premises and closes one (1)
or more retail premises and seeks to transfer the inventory to another licensed
retail premises the licensee owns, the licensee shall submit a request in
writing to the state administrator at least ten (10) days before the inventory is
transferred. The request shall identify the premises to which the alcoholic
beverages or cannabis-infused beverages are being transferred, the proposed
date of the transfer, and the quantity, types, and brands of alcoholic beverages
or cannabis-infused beverages to be sold.
(4) If a licensee files for bankruptcy or is directed by a court to dispose of inventory to
satisfy a lien or judgment, the inventory may be sold only to a licensee holding any
license that authorizes the possession and sale of those alcoholic beverages or
cannabis-infused beverages. The bankrupt licensee or the licensee subject to the
court order shall notify the department of the sale and shall attach a copy of the
court order or the judgment directing the sale and a list of the quantity, types, and
brands of alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages to be sold, but if the
licensee fails to do so, the notification may be made by the bankruptcy trustee, the
lienholder, or the judgment creditor. Any licensee who purchases the inventory
shall notify the department within five (5) days after the transfer of the specific
inventory sold.
(5) A secured creditor or landlord that is in possession, custody, or control of any
Page 226 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
alcoholic beverages owned by a licensee may dispose of those alcoholic beverages
through the department's public auction as authorized by subsection (6) of this
section or may dispose of alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages in the
following manner:
(a) The secured creditor or landlord shall submit a written request for approval
from the state administrator, within twenty (20) days in advance of the sale or
destruction of the licensee's remaining inventory. The request shall identify
the:
1. Licensee who is purchasing the inventory or the business to destroy the
inventory;
2. Proposed date of the sale or destruction; and
3. Quantity, types, and brands of alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused
beverages to be sold or destroyed;
(b) The proposed transferee or transferees may be any person or persons holding
any license that authorizes the possession and sale of those alcoholic
beverages or cannabis-infused beverages, or a business authorized to dispose
of alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages;
(c) A copy of the written request shall be mailed by the department to the
licensee's registered agent or last known address on file with the department
by certified mail. Within ten (10) days after the department's mailing of this
request, the licensee shall file with the department and applicant any objection
the licensee has to the request, or be permanently barred from objecting; and
(d) If a sale is approved, the licensee who purchases the inventory shall notify the
department within five (5) days after the transfer of that specific inventory.
(6) The board may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A for additional means for the transfer or disposal of alcoholic beverage
inventory, including procedures to allow the board to dispose of the inventory
Page 227 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
through public auction if:
(a) A final order relating to those alcoholic beverages has been entered after all
administrative and judicial proceedings are conducted, if applicable;
(b) The entire proceeds of the public auction are donated to the alcohol wellness
and responsibility education fund established in KRS 211.285; and
(c) The board deems the inventory safe to release to the public, including but not
limited to the alcoholic beverages being in their original, unopened packaging.
Section 140. KRS 247.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The State Fair Board:
(a) Shall have the custody and control of [such ]property [as ]now [is ]under its
custody and control, and of [such ]property [as may ]hereafter [be ]placed
under its control or transferred to it by the State Property and Buildings
Commission, for any purposes [mentioned ]in this section, and the physical
properties [so ]under its custody and control or transferred to it are
[hereinafter] referred to in this section, and in KRS 247.150 and 247.160, as
the "state fairgrounds and an area in a city of the first class to be used as an
exhibition center";
(b) May erect and repair buildings on the state fairgrounds and exhibition center,
make any and all necessary or proper improvements, and generally carry on a
program of development and extension of facilities designed to accomplish
the objectives defined in this section;
(c) Shall promote the progress of the state and stimulate public interest in the
advantages and development of the state by providing the facilities of the state
fairgrounds for agricultural and industrial exhibitions, public gatherings,
cultural activities, and other functions calculated to advance the educational,
physical, and cultural interests of the public and by providing the facilities of
the exhibition center for conventions, trade shows, public gatherings, and
Page 228 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
other functions calculated to advance and enhance the visitor industry,
economy, entertainment, cultural, and educational interests of the public;
(d) Shall hold an annual fair on the state fairgrounds, for the exhibition of
agricultural, mechanical, horticultural, dairy, forestry, poultry, livestock,
mineral, and all other industrial interests of the state, and prepare premium
lists and establish rules of exhibition for the fair;
(e) May purchase liability insurance for the members and executive officers
exempted from the classified service of the state by KRS 18A.115; and
(f) Shall own and operate shows and expositions that include but are not limited
to the:
1. North American International Livestock Exposition, including its North
American Championship Rodeo;
2. Kentucky State Fair and World's Championship Horse Show; and
3. National Farm Machinery Show and its Championship Tractor Pull.
(2) The State Fair Board may [take, ]acquire[,] and hold property, and all interest in
property[therein], by deed, gift, devise, bequest, or lease[, or eminent domain], or
by transfer from the State Property and Buildings Commission, and may dispose of
any property so acquired in the manner provided by law.[ In the exercise of its
power of eminent domain it shall proceed in the manner provided in the Eminent
Domain Act of Kentucky.]
Section 141. KRS 262.745 is amended to read as follows:
Subject to the approval of the board of supervisors, the board of directors of a watershed
conservancy district shall have power to:
(1) Levy an annual tax on the real property within the district within the limitations
provided in KRS 262.760 for administration, construction, operation, and
maintenance of works of improvement within the district;[.]
(2) Acquire by purchase, gift, grant, bequest, or devise[, or through condemnation
Page 229 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
proceedings in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky,] the
fee simple title or any lesser interest in land including easements and flowage rights
[as are ]necessary for the exercise of any authorized function of the district, and for
that[such] purpose, may cause examinations and surveys to be made of any lands,
easements, or rights-of-way necessary for the performance of any authorized
function of the district;[.]
(3) Construct, improve, operate, and maintain [such ]structures [as may be ]necessary
for the performance of any function authorized by KRS 262.700 to 262.795; and[.]
(4) Borrow [such ]money [as is ]necessary for the purpose of acquiring lands or rights-
of-way and establishing, constructing, reconstructing, repairing, enlarging, and
maintaining [such ]structures and improvements [as are ]required by the district in
the performance of its functions, and issue, negotiate, and sell its bonds as provided
in KRS 262.750.
Section 142. KRS 266.130 is amended to read as follows:
The board of levee commissioners may [enter upon, ]acquire[, take] and hold any lands
or premises necessary and proper for locating, constructing, reconstructing, enlarging,
extending, repairing, and maintaining its line of levees, as well as for the cutting of
ditches for the purpose of relieving the levees and the lands adjacent thereto enlarged by
sipe and rain water. The board may also cut and remove trees, timbers and other materials
that may, by falling or otherwise, encumber or endanger any levee.[ In case the owners
cannot agree with the board as to the value of any property taken under authority of this
section, the board may condemn the property in the manner provided in the Eminent
Domain Act of Kentucky. ]
Section 143. KRS 267.100 is amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in KRS 267.010, 267.090, and 267.490, the directors from the various
districts of the county shall constitute the county board of drainage commissioners, with
the right to acquire, hold, encumber, sell, and convey any property necessary to the
Page 230 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
conduct of its affairs, with all the rights and powers of a corporation, and with all other
rights and powers necessary to carry out its work under [the provisions of ]this chapter[,
including the right of eminent domain].
Section 144. KRS 267.450 is amended to read as follows:
The owner of any land that has been assessed for the cost of any improvement may use
the improvement as an outlet for lateral drains from his or her land. [If the land is
separated from the improvement by the land of another, and the owners are unable to
agree as to the terms on which the one may enter the land of the other and construct the
drain or ditch, he may file his ancillary petition in the pending proceeding, and have the
same condemned in the same manner as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky. ]When the ditch is constructed it shall become a part of the drainage system
and be under the control of, and kept in repair by, the board.
Section 145. KRS 268.510 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to effect the drainage, protection, and reclamation of the land and other
property in any district organized under this chapter subject to assessment, to
protect cities from overflow, and to promote the public health or general welfare of
the community, the board acting for the district may clean out, alter, construct, or
maintain any drain in or out of the district, and construct and maintain any levees,
dikes, dams, revetments, reservoirs, holding basins, floodways, pumping stations,
syphons, and any other work and improvements deemed necessary to preserve and
maintain the works or prevent overflow of land or protect any city or parts of a
city[thereof] in or out of the district. The board may construct or enlarge any bridge
needed in or out of the district across any drain or other improvement or any public
highway, railroad right-of-way, track, grade, fill, or cut, subject to [the provisions of
]KRS 268.530; construct roadways upon, along, and over levees and embankments;
and remove any fence, building, or improvement in or out of the district.
(2) The board may hold, control, and acquire by donation or purchase[, or, if need be,
Page 231 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
condemn] any land, easement, railroad right-of-way, sluice, conduit, sewer, holding
basin, or franchise in or out of the district for any purpose provided for in this
chapter.[
(a) The board may also condemn, pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky,
for the use of the district any property within or without the district not acquired or
condemned by the board on the report of the appraisers.]
(3) The board may control all water power created by the construction of improvements
in the district, and construct and maintain any hydroelectric power plants to develop
[such ]power for the use of the district and use any funds in the treasury of the
district not otherwise appropriated for the construction and maintenance of
those[such] plants. The board may lease any power in excess of that required for
the use of the district. The proceeds of that[such] lease shall be turned in to the
treasury of the district.
(4) [However, ]The construction or maintenance of any improvement shall not impair
navigation upon any navigable stream in this state.
Section 146. KRS 268.570 is amended to read as follows:
Any owner may use the drain as an outlet for lateral ditches from his or her land.[ If his
land is separated from the drain by the land of another and they are unable to agree as to
the conditions on which one may enter another's land and construct the ditch, he may file
his ancillary petition in the pending proceeding to the court, and secure condemnation as
provided for in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.] When the ditch is constructed, it
shall become a part of the drainage system and shall be under the control of the board and
kept in repair by it.
Section 147. KRS 269.070 is amended to read as follows:
Any county may remove any ponds, pools, or swamp marshes, or reclaim swamp land
that may cause sickness in the county, by ditching, leveeing, or cleaning out logs and
brush that may cause any creek to scatter or form pools of stagnant water. The cost shall
Page 232 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
be paid for out of the county levy or by taxation of the property in the county subject to
taxation for state purposes. When the fiscal court undertakes such a project, it may
acquire for the county by contract [or condemnation ]any land necessary to carry out the
project.[ If condemnation proceedings are necessary, they shall be conducted in the
manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky. ]
Section 148. KRS 269.210 is amended to read as follows:
The corporation may extend its ditches, make other ditches, connect with any creek or
stream and straighten or cut across any curve to facilitate drainage[, and, when necessary,
take the lands of private persons. The corporation is vested with the right and power of
eminent domain for the condemnation of land that may be necessary, which remedy shall
be pursued as provided by the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, the proceedings to be
brought by the corporation in the Circuit Court, providing due compensation to the
owners of land].
Section 149. KRS 269.270 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The county judge/executive in each county of this Commonwealth, wherein the
fiscal court has requested it, is hereby authorized to establish a countywide surface
water drainage district for the entire county including all municipalities. The cost of
procuring the necessary rights-of-way and the construction and maintenance of
a[such] countywide drainage district shall be paid by the fiscal court out of the
annual levy for county taxes. When the fiscal court undertakes such a project it may
acquire for the county by contract [or condemnation ]any land necessary to carry
out the project.[ If condemnation proceedings are necessary they shall be conducted
in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.]
(2) The administration of this district shall be exclusively by or within the fiscal court
of the[said] county, and the fiscal court is hereby authorized and empowered to
employ [such ]assistants, including commissioners or a superintendent, and other
employees [as may be ]necessary for the construction, maintenance, and continued
Page 233 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
operation of the[said] system, and shall fix the salaries of all employees to be paid
as other county employees are paid.
(3) In the construction and maintenance of a[such] drainage system the fiscal court is
authorized and empowered, as a part of the cost of construction and maintenance of
the[said] system, to build or construct [such ]bridges and culverts over and across
the ditches or canals of this system that[as in the opinion of] the fiscal court
deems[are] necessary.
(4) This section[Nothing herein contained] shall not authorize or empower the
construction or maintenance of a sanitary sewer system or sanitary sewers.
Section 150. KRS 272.321 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A member of a constituent association to be affected by a merger or
consolidation may give to the association prior to or at the meeting of its
members to which the proposal of merger or consolidation is submitted to a
vote, written notice that he or she objects to the[such] proposal.
(b) Within twenty (20) days after the date on which the vote was taken, that[such]
member may, unless he or she votes in favor of the proposal, make written
demand on the association for payment of the fair market value of his or her
stock or other property rights or interest in the association. A demand[Such
demands] shall state the number and class of shares of stock owned by the
member[him] or the nature and amount of other property rights or interest
owned by him or her in the association.
(c) In addition to any other right he or she may have in law or equity, a member
giving a[such] notice shall be entitled, if and when the merger or
consolidation is effected, to be paid by the surviving association, or new
association, the fair market value of the[such] stock, or other property rights
or interests, as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken,
subject only to the member's surrender [by him ]of the certificate[,] or
Page 234 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
certificates of the[such] stock or other evidence of ownership or other
property rights or interests.
(2) If within thirty (30) days after the date upon which the objecting member tendered
his or her written demand for payment of his or her stock or other property rights
or interest, the fair market value of the[such] stock or other property rights or
interests is agreed upon between the member and the surviving association, the
payment for the stock[therefor] shall be made within sixty (60) days after the date
of the[such] agreement, upon surrender of the certificate or other evidence of [such
]property rights or interests, whereupon the member shall cease to have any interest
in the[such] stock or other property rights or interest in the association.
(3) (a) If, during the thirty (30) day period mentioned in subsection (2) of this
section[the preceding subsection], the member and the surviving association
or new association do not agree as to the fair market value of the[such] stock
or other property rights or interests, the member may, within sixty (60) days
thereafter, file a petition in the Circuit Court of the county in which the
surviving association or new association has its registered office or principal
place of business asking for the appointment of three (3) disinterested
appraisers to appraise the fair market value of his or her stock or other
property rights or interests.
(b) A summons, together with a copy of the petition, shall be served on the
surviving association or new association at least twenty (20) days prior to a
hearing on the petition by the court. The award of the appraisers, or a majority
of them, if no exceptions are[be] filed to the award[thereto] within ten (10)
days after it[the award] has been filed in court, shall be confirmed by the
court, and when confirmed shall be final and conclusive, and the member,
upon depositing with the court the proper stock certificates or other evidence
of his or her[such] property rights or interests, shall be entitled to judgment
Page 235 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
against the association for the appraised value of the rights or
interests[thereof] as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken.
(c) If either party files exceptions to the award of the appraisers within ten (10)
days after the award has been filed in court, the case shall be transferred to the
civil issue docket of the Circuit Court for trial[ and shall be there tried in the
same manner, as near as may be practicable, as is provided for the trial of
cases under the eminent domain law of this state], and with [the same ]right of
appeal to the Court of Appeals. The court shall assess the cost of the
proceedings as it deems equitable.
(d) Upon payment of the judgment, the surviving association or new association
is entitled to have the member's stock certificates or other evidence of his or
her[such] property rights or interests surrendered to it by the clerk of the
court.
(e) Unless the member files [such ]a petition within the time prescribed[,] in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the member and[he,] his or her assigns and
heirs [claiming under him ]shall have no right to payment under this
subsection[hereunder], but in that event, this subsection[ nothing herein] shall
not impair his or her status as a member.
(4) If the notices sent to members in connection with any meeting to vote upon a
proposed merger or consolidation make no reference to the provisions of subsection
(1) of this section, a member entitled to, but through lack of actual knowledge did
not, avail himself or herself of the provisions of this section, unless he or she voted
for the proposal, is entitled, if the member[he so] demands in writing within one (1)
year after the date on which the vote was taken on the proposed merger or
consolidation, to recover from the surviving association or new association any
actual damage which he or she suffered from failure of the association of which he
or she was a member to make such reference.
Page 236 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(5) The liability to pay for stock or other property rights or interests or to pay damages
imposed by subsection (4) of this section on an association extends to the surviving
association or new association.
(6) Shares of stock acquired by an association, a surviving association, or a new
association pursuant to the payment of an agreed fair market value of the
shares[thereof] or to payment of a judgment entered for the shares[therefor] may
be held and disposed of by such association as in the case of other treasury shares.
(7) This section does not apply to a merger if on the date of the filing of the articles of
merger the surviving association is the owner of all outstanding shares of the other
association or associations, domestic or foreign, participating in the merger and if
the merger makes no changes in the relative rights of the members of the surviving
association.
(8) A[No] member of a constituent association to be affected by a merger or
consolidation, who objects thereto and makes written demand for payment of the
fair market value of his or her stock or other property rights or interests in the
association[,] as provided in this section, shall not be[is] entitled to payment at any
time prior to the time that he or she would otherwise be entitled to payment
pursuant to valid provisions of the[such] stock, or valid provisions of the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of the association, in effect on the date of the vote for such
merger or consolidation.
Section 151. KRS 277.040 is amended to read as follows:
Any person operating a mine or a stone quarry may, for the purpose of transporting
material between any railroad or navigable stream and the mine or quarry, construct and
operate a line of railroad, truck road, overhead conveyor, or pipeline from the mine or
quarry to the most convenient and accessible point on the railroad or stream[, and may,
under the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, condemn the land necessary for track, truck
road, or supports for conveyor, or pipeline, not exceeding sixty (60) feet in width for each
Page 237 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
track, roadway, conveyor, or pipeline necessarily constructed, and the land for necessary
buildings at the railroad or stream, not exceeding two (2) acres]. The owner or operator of
the[such] railroad shall be governed by the laws relating to other railroads, so far as
applicable, and shall have the same rights and privileges granted to corporations owning
and operating railroads.
Section 152. KRS 277.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every railroad company may:
(a) Cause [such ]examinations and surveys to be made that[as] are necessary to
the selection of the most advantageous route for its proposed railroad, and for
that purpose its officers, agents, and servants may enter upon the property of
any person, subject to consent of the owner and liability for all damage done
by them to the[such] property;[.]
(b) Receive, hold, and take possession of any voluntary grants and donations of
property made to it to aid in the construction, maintenance, and operation of
the road; any real property so received shall be held and used for the purposes
of the grant or donation only;[.]
(c) Purchase, hold, [take possession of ]and use all franchises and property
necessary for the construction, maintenance and accommodation of its line of
railroads, but the same shall not be taken or appropriated without the consent
of the owner;[ until the compensation to be made therefor is agreed upon or
ascertained, and paid or deposited, as provided by the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky.]
(d) Lay out and construct its road not exceeding one hundred (100) feet in width,
unless more than one (1) track is laid, in which case the width may be
extended not exceeding fifty (50) feet for each additional track;[.]
(e) [Take, in the manner provided by the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky such
lands in the vicinity of or adjacent to its road as are necessary for cuts or
Page 238 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
embankments, the procurement of stone, gravel or other materials, or for
draining the roadbed.
(f) ]Change, when it deems proper, the gauge of its road;[.]
(f)[(g)] Change the location or grade of any portion of its road for any
reasonable cause, but shall not, except as otherwise provided by law, depart
from the general route prescribed in the articles of incorporation; and[.]
(g)[(h)] Construct its road upon or across any private road, highway, street, lane
or alley, and across any railroad, canal or watercourse.
(2) Every railroad company shall restore to its former condition, as near as may be, any
private road, highway, street, lane, alley, railroad, canal, or watercourse upon or
across which it has constructed its road, and shall maintain each of them[the same]
in that condition within the right-of-way of the railroad company. It shall construct
suitable road and street crossings for the passage of traffic by putting down planks
or other suitable material between and on each side of the rails, the top of which
shall be at least as high as the top of the rails.
(3) If the railroad is constructed upon any public street or alley, the construction shall
be upon [such ]terms and conditions [as are ]agreed upon between the company and
the authorities of the city, and the road shall not be constructed until compensation
is made[, either] by agreement with[or in the manner provided by the Eminent
Domain Act of Kentucky, to] the owners of the property adjoining those parts of the
street or alley on which the road is to be constructed.
(4) Any railroad company may build such spurs, switches, tracks, or branches [as are
]necessary to conduct its business or develop business along its line of road, and for
that purpose shall have the same powers and be subject to the same restrictions and
liabilities as are conferred or imposed upon it for the construction of its main line.
Section 153. KRS 278.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any telephone company or telegraph company authorized to do business in this
Page 239 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
state shall, upon making just compensation, have the right to construct, maintain,
and operate its lines through any public lands of this state and on, across and along
any public road, and across and under any navigable waters, but not in such a
manner as to interfere with travel on the road or to obstruct the navigation of the
waters.
(2) Any telephone company authorized to do business in this state may, by contract
with any person, construct, maintain and operate telephone lines on and across the
real property of that person[, and if it cannot obtain the right-of-way by contract it
may, except as provided in KRS 416.090, condemn the right-of-way in the manner
provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky].
(3) Any telegraph company authorized to do business in this state that desires to
construct, operate, and maintain its lines on or along the right-of-way and structure
of any railroad may, through an authorized agent, contract with the railroad
company for that right.
(4) The parts of this section relating to the rights of telephone companies do not apply
to any city.
Section 154. KRS 279.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Acquire" means to construct, purchase, obtain by lease, devise, or gift, [or by
eminent domain, ]or to obtain by any other lawful means;
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of a corporation formed under this chapter;
(3) "Business entity" means a domestic and foreign limited liability company,
corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, business or statutory trust, and
not-for-profit unincorporated association;
(4) "Corporation" means a profit or nonprofit corporation formed under the laws of any
state or a foreign country;
(5) "Farm Credit Act" means Section 12 of the Federal Farm Credit Act of 1935, as
Page 240 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
amended[ and the amendments thereto];
(6) "Federal agency" means and includes the United States, the President of the United
States, and all federal authorities, instrumentalities, and agencies in the ordinary
sense;
(7) "Improve" means to construct, reconstruct, extend, enlarge, alter, better, or repair;
(8) "Member" means and includes each person signing the articles of incorporation of a
corporation formed under this chapter, each person later admitted to membership
according to law or according to the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the
corporation, and each common stockholder in a corporation organized under this
chapter that has capital stock;
(9) "Name of record with the Secretary of State" means any real, fictitious, reserved,
registered, or assumed name of a business entity;
(10) "Obligations" means and includes negotiable bonds, notes, debentures, interim
certificates or receipts, and all other evidences of indebtedness either issued or the
payment thereof assumed by a corporation organized under this chapter;
(11) "Real name" has[shall have] the same meaning as[set forth] in KRS 365.015;[ and]
(12) "System" means and includes any plant, works, facilities, and properties, and all
parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, used or useful in the generation,
production, transmission, or distribution of electric energy; and
(13) "Telephone service":
(a) Includes communications services of all kinds allowed to any other
telephone utility, authorized by regulatory agency and with some
unregulated, that being the transmission of voice, data, sounds, signals,
pictures, writing, or signs of all kinds, by use of wire, radio, light,
electromagnetic impulse, broadband (wideband) spectrum, or any other
transmission mode and facility used in rendition of those services; and
(b) Does not include message telegram service or radio broadcasting services or
Page 241 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
facilities within the meaning of Section 153(O) of the Federal
Communications Act of 1934, as amended.
Section 155. KRS 279.110 is amended to read as follows:
Any corporation created under this chapter may:
(1) Acquire and hold any property necessary or incidental to the proper conduct of its
business, including preferred stock and common stock or other corporations
whether formed under this chapter or not, and the stock of any federal agency, and
may pay for the[any such] property in cash, property or on credit, or both, and
secure and procure payment of all or any part of the purchase price [thereof ]on
[such ]terms and conditions as its board of directors determines;
(2) Acquire, own, operate, maintain, and improve one (1) or more systems;
(3) Pledge all or part of its revenue or mortgage or encumber all or any part of its
property for the purpose of securing the payment of the principal and interest of any
of its obligations;
(4) [Have and exercise the right of eminent domain in the manner provided in the
Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky;
(5) ]Construct, own, lease, operate, and control any facilities across, along, or under
any street or public highway, and over any lands belonging to this state or to any
county, city, or political subdivision of this state, but shall restore any such street or
highway to its former condition as nearly as possible and shall not use it in such a
manner as to impair unnecessarily its usefulness;
(5)[(6)] Accept gifts and grants of money or property from this state, any county, city,
or political subdivision of this state, any federal agency, or any other person, and
accept voluntary and uncompensated services;
(6)[(7)] Make any contract necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers
granted by this chapter, or for any other corporate purpose, subject to any
limitations imposed by this chapter;
Page 242 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(7)[(8)] Sell, lease, or dispose of all or any part of its property, subject to [the
provisions of ]KRS 279.140;
(8)[(9)] Contract debts, borrow money without limitation as to the amount of
corporate indebtedness or liability, and issue or assume obligations;
(9)[(10)] Fix and collect reasonable rates and charges for services, subject to [the
provisions of ]KRS Chapter 278;
(10)[(11)] Assist its members in wiring their premises for the use of electric energy and
in purchasing electrical equipment, appliances, and supplies, and in financing
those[such] activities;
(11)[(12)] (a) Establish affiliates to engage in nonregulated businesses or activities as
provided [for ]in KRS 279.020.
(b) A cooperative formed under this chapter shall annually report to its member-
owners the nature of the nonregulated business or activity, its financial status
and future expectations, as well as any other information deemed appropriate
by its board of directors. The cooperative shall file with the Public Service
Commission a balance sheet and income statement for each nonregulated
business or activity, if the cooperative has established a separate affiliate to
engage in nonregulated business or activity.
(c) If the cooperative's nonregulated activities are conducted within the
cooperative pursuant to a contract with a federal military installation or a
local, state, or federal government as provided [for ]in KRS 279.020, a
balance sheet and statement of revenues and expenses for each nonregulated
business or activity shall be filed with the Public Service Commission.
(d) The information to be filed with the Public Service Commission shall be filed
simultaneously with the Public Service Commission annual report. The
cooperative may request confidentiality for any information it provides as
required in this subsection that it deems proprietary or competitive; and
Page 243 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(12)[(13)] Do anything not specifically set forth in this section that is reasonably deemed
necessary, proper, or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of the
corporation and is not prohibited by law.
Section 156. KRS 279.310 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 279.320 to 279.600, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) ["Cooperative" means any corporation organized under KRS 279.320 to 279.600 or
which becomes subject to those sections in the manner provided therein;
(2) "Person" means any natural person, firm, association, corporation, business trust, or
partnership;
(3) As used in this chapter, the term "telephone service" shall include in its meaning
communications services of all kinds allowed to any other telephone utility,
authorized by regulatory agency and with some unregulated, that being the
transmission of voice, data, sounds, signals, pictures, writing, or signs of all kinds,
by use of wire, radio, light, electromagnetic impulse, broadband (wideband)
spectrum, or any other transmission mode and facility used in rendition of such
services; but shall not include in their meaning message telegram service, or radio
broadcasting services or facilities within the meaning of Section 153(O) of the
Federal Communications Act of 1934, as amended;
(4) ]"Acquire" means to construct, purchase, obtain by lease, devise, or gift, [or
eminent domain, ]or to obtain by any other lawful means;
(2)[(5)] "Board" means the board of trustees of a corporation formed under KRS
279.320 to 279.600;
(3) "Business entity" means a domestic and foreign limited liability company,
corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, business or statutory trust,
and not-for-profit unincorporated association;
(4) "Cooperative" means any corporation organized under KRS 279.320 to 279.600
or which becomes subject to those sections in the manner provided therein;
Page 244 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(5) "Corporation" means a profit or nonprofit corporation formed under the laws of
any state or a foreign country;
(6) "Federal agency" means and includes the United States, the President of the United
States, and all federal authorities, instrumentalities, and agencies in the ordinary
sense;
(7) "Improve" means to construct, reconstruct, extend, enlarge, alter, better, or repair;
(8) "Member" means and includes each person signing the articles of incorporation of a
corporation formed under KRS 279.320 to 279.600, each person later admitted to
membership according to law or according to the articles of incorporation or bylaws
of the corporation, and each common stockholder in a corporation, having capital
stock, organized under KRS 279.320 to 279.600;
(9) "Name of record with the Secretary of State" means any real, fictitious, reserved,
registered, or assumed name of a business entity;
(10)[(9)] "Obligations" means and includes negotiable bonds, notes, debentures,
interim certificates or receipts, and all other evidences of indebtedness either issued
or the payment thereof assumed by a corporation organized under KRS 279.320 to
279.600;
(11) "Real name" has the same meaning as in KRS 365.015;
(12) "Rural area" means any area of this state not included within the boundaries of
any incorporated or unincorporated city or of a consolidated local government,
having a population in excess of fifteen hundred (1,500) inhabitants;
(13) "Person" means any natural person, firm, association, corporation, business
trust, or partnership;
(14)[(10)] "System" means and includes any plant, works, facilities, and properties, and
all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, used or useful in the operation and
maintenance of telephone[ communication] service; and
[(11) "Rural area" shall be deemed to mean any area of this state not included within the
Page 245 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
boundaries of any incorporated or unincorporated city or of a consolidated local
government, having a population in excess of fifteen hundred (1,500) inhabitants;]
(15)[(12)] "Telephone company" means any natural person, firm, association,
corporation, or partnership owning, leasing, or operating any line, facility, or
system used in the furnishing of telephone service within this state[;
(13) "Business entity" means a domestic and foreign limited liability company,
corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, business or statutory trust, and
not-for-profit unincorporated association;
(14) "Corporation" means a profit or nonprofit corporation formed under the laws of any
state or a foreign country;
(15) "Name of record with the Secretary of State" means any real, fictitious, reserved,
registered, or assumed name of a business entity; and
(16) "Real name" shall have the meaning set forth in KRS 365.015].
Section 157. KRS 279.360 is amended to read as follows:
Each corporation organized under [the provisions of ]KRS 279.310 to 279.600 shall have
power:
(1) To furnish, improve, and expand telephone service in rural areas to its members, to
governmental agencies and political subdivisions, and to other persons not in excess
of ten percent (10%) of the number of its members;[,] provided, however, that:[, ]
(a) Without regard to the[said] ten percent (10%) limitation, telephone service
may be made available by a cooperative through interconnection of facilities
to any number of subscribers of other telephone systems, and through pay
stations to any number of users;[ and provided, further, that ]
(b) A cooperative which acquires existing telephone facilities in rural areas may
continue service to persons, not in excess of forty percent (40%) of the
number of its members, who are already receiving service from those[such]
facilities, without requiring those[such] persons to become members, but
Page 246 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
those[such] persons may become members upon [such ]terms as may be
prescribed in the bylaws; and[ provided, further, that ]
(c) A[no] cooperative shall not:
1.[(a)] Construct or operate any line, facility, or system in any rural area
being furnished telephone service by any telephone company or other
cooperative unless the Public Service Commission determines[shall
determine], after a hearing on reasonable notice to all interested parties,
that any such telephone company or other cooperative is unwilling or
unable to furnish reasonably adequate telephone service in such area;[,]
or
2.[(b)] Furnish any telephone service in any area proposed to be served by
any telephone company, which may be found to be ready, willing, and
able to serve, within a[such] period of time [as may, after hearing, be
]determined to be reasonable by the Public Service Commission after a
hearing;
(2) To construct, purchase, lease as lessee, or otherwise acquire, and to improve,
expand, install, equip, maintain, and operate, and to sell, assign, convey, lease as
lessor, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber, telephone lines,
facilities or systems, lands, buildings, structures, plants and equipment, exchanges,
and any other real or personal property, tangible or intangible, which shall be
deemed necessary, convenient or appropriate to accomplish the purpose for which
the cooperative is organized; provided[,] that a[no] cooperative shall not construct,
purchase, lease as lessee, take, receive, or otherwise acquire, improve, expand,
install, equip, maintain, or operate any telephone lines, facilities or system, lands,
buildings, structures, plants and equipment, exchanges, or any other real or personal
property, tangible or intangible, within the boundaries of any incorporated or
unincorporated city, town, village, or borough within this state having a population
Page 247 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) inhabitants, unless those[said]
procedures [or any of them ]are determined by the administrator of the rural
electrification administration to be necessary [in order ]to furnish or improve
telephone service in rural areas, and unless the[said] determination by the
administrator of the rural electrification administration, after proper hearing on
reasonable notice to all interested parties, is[be] approved by the Public Service
Commission of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. In case of such a determination by
the administrator of the rural electrification administration as aforesaid with
approval by the Kentucky Public Service Commission, nothing contained in this
section or [elsewhere provided in ]KRS 279.310 to 279.600 shall deprive any
corporation organized under KRS 279.310 to 279.600 or foreign corporation doing
business in this state pursuant to KRS 279.310 to 279.600, of the power to improve,
expand, construct, acquire, and operate telephone lines, facilities, or systems
without regard to their geographical location;
(3) To connect and interconnect its telephone lines, facilities, or systems with other
telephone lines, facilities or systems;
(4) To make its facilities available to persons furnishing telephone service within or
without this state;
(5) To purchase, lease as lessee, or otherwise acquire, and to use, and exercise and to
sell, assign, convey, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or encumber,
franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, and easements;
(6) To issue membership certificates and nonvoting shares of stock as hereinafter
provided;
(7) To borrow money and otherwise contract indebtedness, and to issue or guarantee
notes, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness, and to secure the payment of the
debt[thereof] by mortgage, pledge, or deed of trust of, or any other encumbrance
upon, any or all of its then-owned[then owned] or after-acquired real or personal
Page 248 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
property, assets, franchises, or revenues;
(8) To construct, maintain, and operate telephone lines along, upon, under, and across
publicly owned lands and public thoroughfares, including, without limitation, all
roads, highways, streets, alleys, bridges, and causeways;
(9) [To exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by the laws of
this state for the exercise of such power by other corporations constructing or
operating telephone lines, facilities or systems;
(10) ]To become a member of other cooperatives or corporations or to own stock in
them[therein];
(10)[(11)] To conduct its business and exercise its powers within or without this state;
(11)[(12)] To adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws;
(12)[(13)] To make any and all contracts necessary, convenient, or appropriate for the
full exercise of the powers [herein ]granted in this section;
(13)[(14)] To exercise all other powers authorized by KRS Chapter 271B; and
(14)[(15)] To do and perform any other lawful acts and things, and to have and exercise
any other powers which may be necessary, convenient, or appropriate to
accomplish the purpose for which the cooperative is organized.
Section 158. KRS 350.152 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Commonwealth, acting by and through its Energy and Environment Cabinet,
shall have the power to acquire[, either] by negotiation [or by exercise of the power
of eminent domain, ]land which has been affected or disturbed by strip or auger
mining, or by other surface coal mining operations which consists of orphan banks
or unreclaimed spoil piles.
(2) Prior to acquiring any land pursuant to KRS 350.152 to 350.163 and KRS 350.240,
the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall extend to its[the] owners [thereof ]an
opportunity to backfill, grade, plant, and do other acts of restoration on the
property[thereon] to the same extent and within the same time limits as prescribed
Page 249 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
by this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. If the owner or owners
agree in writing to perform the[such] restoration and, weather permitting, start
the[such] restoration within a period of thirty (30) days, the land shall not be
acquired by the Commonwealth.
(3) The Energy and Environment Cabinet shall attempt to purchase any land which it
has determined should be acquired for the purpose of restoration and which the
owners have not agreed to restore as provided in subsection (2) above.[ In any case
where the cabinet and the owners of the land are unable to agree upon the amount to
be paid for the land, the cabinet may exercise the power of eminent domain against
such land by filing a condemnation suit under the procedure of the Eminent Domain
Act of Kentucky.]
(4) The purchase price[,] in the case of a negotiated acquisition[, or the damages as
finally determined, in the case of acquisition by condemnation,] and the necessary
expenses incidental thereto[,] shall be paid from appropriations made by the
General Assembly for those[such] purposes and appropriations to which federal
funds made available for those[such] purposes have been credited.
Section 159. KRS 350.570 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the cabinet makes a finding of fact pursuant to the Abandoned Mine Lands
Program that:
(a) Land or water resources have been adversely affected by past coal mining
practices; and
(b) The adverse effects are at a stage where, in the public interest, action to
restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent should be taken; and
(c) The owners of the land or water resources where entry must be made to
restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects of past coal
mining practices are not known or readily available; or
(d) The owners will not give permission for the United States, the
Page 250 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
Commonwealth, political subdivisions, or their agents, employees, or
contractors to enter upon the[such] property to restore, reclaim, abate, control,
or prevent the adverse effects of past coal mining practices;
then, upon giving notice by mail to the owners if known, or if not known, by
posting notice upon the premises and advertising once in a newspaper of general
circulation in the municipality or county in which the land lies, the cabinet and its
authorized representatives, agents, and contractors shall have the right to enter upon
the property adversely affected by past coal mining practices, and any other
property to have access to such property to do all things necessary or expedient to
restore, reclaim, abate, control, or prevent the adverse effects. An[Such] entry
under this subsection shall be construed as an exercise of the police power for the
protection of public health, safety, and general welfare and shall not be construed as
an act of condemnation of property nor of trespass on the property[thereon]. The
moneys expended for the[such] work and the benefits accruing to any [such
]premises so entered upon shall be chargeable against that[such] land and shall
mitigate or offset any claim in or any action brought by any owner of any interest in
the[such] premises for any alleged damages by virtue of the[such] entry;[:]
provided, however, that this subsection[provision] is not intended to create new
rights of action or eliminate existing immunities.
(2) The cabinet and its authorized representatives, agents, and contractors shall have
the right to enter upon any property for the purpose of conducting studies or
exploratory work to determine the existence of adverse effects of past coal mining
practices and to determine the feasibility of restoration, reclamation, abatement,
control, or prevention of those[such] adverse effects. An[Such] entry under this
subsection shall be construed as an exercise of the police power for the protection
of public health, safety, and general welfare, and shall not be construed as an act of
condemnation of property nor trespass on the property[thereon].
Page 251 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(3) The Commonwealth shall have the power to acquire[,] by purchase, donation, or
devise[, or condemnation,] any land [which is ]adversely affected by past coal
mining practices if acquisition of that[such] land is necessary for successful
reclamation and[ that]:
(a) The acquired land, after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or
prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices, will serve
recreation and historic purposes, conservation and reclamation purposes, or
provide open space benefits;[ or]
(b) Permanent facilities such as a treatment plant or a relocated stream channel
will be constructed on the land for the restoration, reclamation, abatement,
control, or prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices; or
(c) Acquisition of coal refuse disposal sites and all coal refuse on those
sites[thereon] will serve the purposes of this chapter or [that ]public
ownership is desirable to meet emergency situations and prevent recurrences
of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.
(4) Title to all lands acquired pursuant to this section shall be in the name of the
Commonwealth. The price paid for the land acquired under this section shall reflect
the market value of the land as adversely affected by past coal mining practices.
[The Commonwealth may exercise the power of eminent domain against such land
by filing a condemnation suit under the procedure of the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky. Provided, that ]When the Commonwealth acquires land adversely
affected by past coal mining practices pursuant to the Abandoned Mine Lands
Program and when [such ]abandoned mine reclamation fund moneys are less than
the purchase price, the Commonwealth shall be authorized to use whatever funds
are available pursuant to KRS 350.156(3).
(5) The Energy and Environment Cabinet may receive any federal, state, or other funds
for the purpose of reclaiming lands affected by past coal mining practices, including
Page 252 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
federal funds made available to it pursuant to Title IV of the Surface Mining
Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, Pub. L. No.[ (P.L.] 95-87[)]. The cabinet
may avail itself of any services which may be provided by other state agencies or
the federal government, and may compensate them for those[such] services.
(6) The cabinet shall have the power to backfill, grade, revegetate, and perform other
acts of restoration and reclamation on lands acquired pursuant to this section. The
cabinet may cause the reclamation work to be done by its own employees or by
employees of other governmental agencies or soil conservation districts, or through
contracts with qualified persons. Those[Such] contracts shall be awarded pursuant
to regulations promulgated by the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
The cabinet and any other agency and any contractor under a contract with the
cabinet shall have the right of access to the land affected to carry out the[such]
reclamation.
(7) Where land acquired pursuant to this section is deemed to be suitable for industrial,
commercial, residential, or recreational development, the Commonwealth shall
have the power to sell the[such] land by public sale under a system of competitive
bidding, at not less than fair market value and under [such ]regulations [as may be
]promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to ensure[insure] that
the[such] lands are put to proper use consistent with local and state land use plans,
if any. The proceeds of any [such ]sale under this subsection shall be credited to
the abandoned mine reclamation fund. The cabinet, when requested after
appropriate public notice, shall hold a public hearing, with the appropriate notice, in
the county or counties in which lands acquired pursuant to this section are located.
The hearings shall be held at a time which shall afford local citizens and
governments the maximum opportunity to participate in the decision concerning the
use or disposition of the lands after restoration, reclamation, abatement, control, or
prevention of the adverse effects of past coal mining practices.
Page 253 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(8) In addition to the authority to acquire and reclaim land for the purposes [set forth
]in subsection (3) of this section, the Commonwealth is given authority to use
money in the fund to acquire land by purchase, donation, or devise[, or
condemnation] and to reclaim the[such] land and to transfer it to any political
subdivision of the Commonwealth or to any person, firm, association, or
corporation, if doing so[such] is an integral and necessary element of an
economically feasible plan for a project to construct or rehabilitate housing for
persons disabled as the result of employment in the mines or work incidental to the
mines[thereto], persons displaced by acquisition of land pursuant to this section,
persons dislocated as the result of adverse effects of coal mining practices which
constitute an emergency as provided in KRS 350.585, or persons dislocated as the
result of natural disasters or catastrophic failures from any cause, or any related
commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or governmental use of facilities.
These[Such] activities shall be accomplished under [such ]terms and conditions as
the Commonwealth shall require, which may include transfers of land with or
without monetary consideration. [Provided, that ]To the extent that the
consideration is below the fair market value of the land transferred, no portion of
the difference between the fair market value and the consideration shall accrue as a
profit to those[such] persons, firms, associations, or corporations[firm,
association, or corporation]. No part of the funds provided under the abandoned
mine reclamation fund may be used to pay the actual construction costs of housing.
(9) All acquisitions and disposals of land or any interests in land[therein] pursuant to
the authority granted by this section shall be governed by the applicable provisions
of KRS Chapters 45A and 56.
Section 160. KRS 352.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] licensee, superintendent, mine manager, or mine foreman of any mine
opened after June 16, 1972, shall not permit persons to work in the mine[therein]
Page 254 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
unless there are to every seam of coal worked in the mine at least two (2) separate
outlets, separated by natural strata of not less than one hundred fifty (150) feet in
breadth if the mine is worked by shaft or slope, and separated by a pillar of natural
strata of not less than two thousand (2,000) square feet if the mine is worked by
drift, by which outlets distinct means of ingress and egress are readily available to
persons employed in the mine, but it shall not be necessary for the two (2) outlets to
belong to the same mine.
(2) This subsection shall[does] not apply to the openings of a new entry [that is ]being
worked for the purpose of making connection between the two (2) outlets so long as
not more than twenty (20) persons are employed at one (1) time in making the
connection or driving the second opening, or to any mine in which the second
opening has been rendered unavailable by reason of final robbing or removal of
pillars so long as not more than twenty (20) persons are employed in the
mine[therein] at one (1) time, and the workings are no farther than five hundred
(500) feet from the bottom of the shaft or slope or from the drift opening.[
(2) If any mine has but one (1) means of ingress or egress for persons employed
therein, and the owner does not own suitable ground for another opening, the owner
may select appropriate adjacent ground for that purpose and have it condemned
pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.]
Section 161. KRS 353.400 is amended to read as follows:
(1) KRS 353.400 to 353.410 may be cited as the "Natural Gas Acquisition Authority
Act."
(2) The Kentucky General Assembly hereby recognizes that the availability of reliable
and economical supplies of natural gas is vital to the health, welfare, and economic
well-being of the citizens and residents of the Commonwealth. In order to promote
the ability of municipal utilities to obtain natural gas on terms that will promote the
availability of reliable and economic supplies of energy to consumers, it is the
Page 255 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
intent of the General Assembly to authorize the creation of natural gas acquisition
authorities to:
(a) Acquire supplies of natural gas for the purpose of providing the supply
requirements of municipal utilities;
(b) Contract for the sale of natural gas to municipal utilities; and
(c) Exercise all powers necessary to enable them to accomplish such purposes.
(3) KRS 353.400 to 353.410 shall be liberally construed in conformity with this[such]
intent, it being hereby determined and declared that the means provided by this
chapter are necessary to provide for the continued availability to industrial,
commercial, and residential customers served by municipal utilities in the
Commonwealth of reliable supplies of natural gas at economic rates.[ But, KRS
353.400 to 353.410 shall not be construed or applied to increase the power of
eminent domain of public agencies.]
Section 162. KRS 381.020 is amended to read as follows:
All land titles in this state are allodial, and, subject to escheat, the entire and absolute
property in all land in this state is vested in the owners, according to the nature of their
respective estates[; except that the Commonwealth retains the right of eminent domain in
and to all real estate].
Section 163. KRS 381.830 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A unit owner shall have the exclusive ownership to his or her unit and shall
have a common right to a share, with other co-owners, in the common
elements of the property, equivalent to the percentage representing the floor
area of the individual unit, with relation to the floor area of the whole
property. This percentage shall be computed by taking as a basis the floor area
of the individual unit in relation to the floor area of the property as a whole.
(b) The[Such] percentage of common interest shall be expressed at the time the
condominium property regime is constituted, shall have a permanent
Page 256 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
character, and, except as may be otherwise provided in KRS 381.810 to
381.910, shall not be altered without the acquiescence of the co-owners
representing all the units of the building or buildings[building(s)]. The master
deed may, however, contain provisions relating to the appropriation, taking, or
condemnation by eminent domain by the federal[, state or local]
government[,] or its instrumentalities[an instrumentality thereof], including[,]
but not limited to[,] reapportionment or other change of the common interest
appurtenant to each unit, or part [thereof ]remaining after a partial
appropriation, taking, or condemnation. The master deed of a regime under
construction may further provide that by later amendment to the master
deed[thereto] and upon completion of all units, percentage of common interest
shall be redistributed on an as-built basis; provided, however, that the number
of units originally constituted in the regime may not be increased during
construction.
(2) Each co-owner may use the general common elements in accordance with the
purpose for which they are intended, without hindering or encroaching upon the
lawful rights of the other co-owners.
Section 164. KRS 381.9113 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a unit is acquired by eminent domain by the United States government, or if part
of a unit is acquired by federal eminent domain leaving the unit owner with a
remnant which may not practically or lawfully be used for any purpose permitted
by the declaration, the award shall compensate the unit owner for his or her unit and
its interest in the common elements, whether or not any common elements are
acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree otherwise provides, that unit's
allocated interests are automatically reallocated to the remaining units in proportion
to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, and the
association shall promptly prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the
Page 257 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
declaration reflecting the reallocations. Any remnant of a unit remaining after part
of a unit is taken under this subsection is thereafter a common element.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, if part of a unit is acquired by
federal eminent domain, the award shall compensate the unit owner for the
reduction in value of the unit and its interest in the common elements, whether or
not any common elements are acquired. Upon acquisition, unless the decree
otherwise provides:
(a) The unit's allocated interests are reduced in proportion to the reduction in the
size of the unit; and
(b) The portion of the allocated interests divested from the partially acquired unit
are automatically reallocated to that unit and the remaining units in proportion
to the respective allocated interests of those units before the taking, with the
partially acquired unit participating in the reallocation on the basis of its
reduced allocated interests.
(3) If part of the common elements is acquired by federal eminent domain, the portion
of the award attributable to the common elements taken shall be paid to the
association and, unless the declaration provides otherwise, the award attributable to
the acquisition of a limited common element shall be equally divided among the
owners of the units to which that limited common element was allocated at the time
of acquisition.
(4) The court decree shall be recorded in every county in which any portion of the
condominium is located.
Section 165. KRS 381.9115 is amended to read as follows:
Unless displaced by a particular provision of KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207, the principles
of law and equity, including the law of corporations and unincorporated associations, the
law of real property, and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent,
[eminent domain, ]estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake,
Page 258 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
receivership, substantial performance, or other validating or invalidating cause, shall
supplement KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207.
Section 166. KRS 381.9135 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A memorandum of lease shall be recorded with respect to any lease the expiration
or termination of which may terminate the condominium or reduce its size. Every
lessor of those leases shall sign the memorandum of lease, and the memorandum of
lease shall state:
(a) The elements of recording for the lease;
(b) The date on which the lease is scheduled to expire;
(c) A legally sufficient description of the real estate subject to the lease;
(d) Any right of the unit owners to redeem the reversion and the manner whereby
those rights may be exercised, or a statement that they do not have those
rights;
(e) Any right of the unit owners to remove any improvements within a reasonable
time after the expiration or termination of the lease, or a statement that they
do not have those rights; and
(f) Any rights of the unit owners to renew the lease and the conditions of any
renewal, or a statement that they do not have those rights.
(2) After the declaration for a leasehold condominium is recorded, neither the lessor
nor his or her successor in interest may terminate the leasehold interest of a unit
owner who makes timely payment of his or her share of the rent and otherwise
complies with all covenants which, if violated, would entitle the lessor to terminate
the lease. A unit owner's leasehold interest is not affected by failure of any other
person to pay rent or fulfill any other covenant.
(3) Acquisition of the leasehold interest of any unit owner by the owner of the
reversion or remainder does not merge the leasehold and fee simple interests unless
the leasehold interests of all unit owners subject to that reversion or remainder are
Page 259 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
acquired.
(4) If the expiration or termination of a lease decreases the number of units in a
condominium, the allocated interests shall be reallocated in accordance with KRS
381.9113(1), as though those units had been taken by eminent domain by the
federal government. Reallocations shall be confirmed by an amendment to the
declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.
Section 167. KRS 381.9143 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To exercise any development right reserved under KRS 381.9133(1)(h), the
declarant shall prepare, execute, and record an amendment to the declaration and
comply with KRS 381.9141. The declarant is the unit owner of any units thereby
created. The amendment to the declaration shall assign an identifying number to
each new unit created, and, except in the case of subdivision or conversion of units
described in subsection (3) of this section, reallocate the allocated interests among
all units. The amendment shall describe any common elements and any limited
common elements thereby created and, in the case of limited common elements,
designate the unit to which each is allocated to the extent required by KRS
381.9139.
(2) Development rights may be reserved within any real estate added to the
condominium if the amendment adding that real estate includes all matters required
by KRS 381.9133 or 381.9135, as the case may be, and the plats and plans include
all matters required by KRS 381.9141. This subsection[provision] does not extend
the time limit on the exercise of development rights imposed by the declaration
under KRS 381.9133(1)(h).
(3) If a declarant exercises a development right to subdivide or convert a unit
previously created into additional units, common elements, or both, the declaration
shall be amended as follows:
(a) If the declarant converts the unit entirely to common elements, the
Page 260 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
amendment to the declaration shall reallocate all the allocated interests of that
unit among the other units as if that unit had been taken by eminent domain by
the United States government; or
(b) If the declarant subdivides the unit into two (2) or more units, whether or not
any part of the unit is converted into common elements, the amendment to the
declaration shall reallocate all the allocated interests of the unit among the
units created by the subdivision in any reasonable manner prescribed by the
declarant.
(4) If the declaration provides, pursuant to KRS 381.9133(1)(h), that all or a portion of
the real estate is subject to the development right of withdrawal, then the following
shall apply:
(a) If all the real estate is subject to withdrawal, and the declaration does not
describe separate portions of real estate subject to that right, none of the real
estate may be withdrawn after a unit has been conveyed to a purchaser
without the written consent of all unit owners owning units within the real
estate; and
(b) If a portion or portions are subject to withdrawal, no portion may be
withdrawn after a unit in that portion has been conveyed to a purchaser
without the written consent of all unit owners owning units within that
portion.
Section 168. KRS 381.9157 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain by the United
States government, a condominium may be terminated only by agreement of unit
owners of units to which at least eighty percent (80%) of the votes in the
association are allocated, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. The
declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units in the
condominium are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.
Page 261 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(2) An agreement to terminate a condominium shall be evidenced by the execution of a
termination agreement, or ratification of a termination agreement[thereof], in the
same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The termination
agreement shall specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless it is
recorded before that date. A termination agreement and all ratifications of an
agreement[thereof] shall be recorded in every county in which a portion of the
condominium is situated, and is effective only upon recordation.
(3) In the case of a condominium containing only units having horizontal boundaries
described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide that all the
common elements and units of the condominium shall be sold following
termination. If, pursuant to the agreement, any real estate in the condominium is to
be sold following termination, the termination agreement shall set forth the
minimum terms of the sale.
(4) In the case of a condominium containing any units not having horizontal boundaries
described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the
common elements, but shall not require that the units be sold following termination,
unless the declaration as originally recorded provided otherwise or unless all the
unit owners consent to the sale.
(5) The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract for the sale of real
estate in the condominium, but the contract is not binding on the unit owners until
approved pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If any real estate in the
condominium is to be sold following termination, title to that real estate, upon
termination, vests in the association as trustee for the holders of all interests in the
units. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect
the sale. Until the sale has been concluded and the proceeds thereof distributed, the
association continues in existence with all powers it had before termination.
Proceeds of the sale shall be distributed to unit owners and lienholders as their
Page 262 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
interests may appear, in proportion to the respective interests of unit owners as
provided in subsection (8) of this section. Unless otherwise specified in the
termination agreement, as long as the association holds title to the real estate, each
unit owner and his or her successors in interest have an exclusive right to
occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her unit.
During the period of that occupancy, each unit owner and his or her successors in
interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on unit
owners by KRS 381.9101 to 381.9207 or the declaration.
(6) If the real estate constituting the condominium is not to be sold following
termination, title to the common elements and, in a condominium containing only
units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, title to all the real
estate in the condominium, vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in
common in proportion to their respective interests as provided in subsection (8) of
this section, and liens on the units shift accordingly. While the tenancy in common
exists, each unit owner and his or her successors in interest have an exclusive right
to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted his or her
unit.
(7) Following termination of the condominium, the proceeds of any sale of real estate,
together with the assets of the association, are held by the association as trustee for
unit owners and holders of liens on the units as their interests may appear.
Following termination, creditors of the association holding liens on the units, which
were recorded before termination, may enforce those liens in the same manner as
any lienholder. All other creditors of the association are to be treated as if they had
perfected liens on the units immediately before termination.
(8) The respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections (5), (6), and (7) of
this section are as follows:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the respective interests
Page 263 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
of unit owners are the fair market values of their units, limited common
elements, and common element interests immediately before the termination,
as determined by one (1) or more independent appraisers selected by the
association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to
the unit owners and becomes final unless disapproved within thirty (30) days
after distribution by unit owners of units to which twenty-five percent (25%)
of the votes in the association are allocated. The proportion of any unit
owner's interest to that of all unit owners is determined by dividing the fair
market value of that unit owner's unit and common element interest by the
total fair market values of all the units and common elements; and
(b) If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an
appraisal of the fair market value of the unit or element[thereof] before
destruction cannot be made, the interests of all unit owners are their respective
common element interests immediately before the termination.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, foreclosure or enforcement of
a lien or encumbrance against the entire condominium does not of itself terminate
the condominium, and foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against
a portion of the condominium, other than withdrawable real estate, does not
withdraw that portion from the condominium. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien
or encumbrance against withdrawable real estate does not of itself withdraw that
real estate from the condominium, but the person taking title thereto has the right to
require from the association, upon request, an amendment excluding the real estate
from the condominium.
(10) If a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the real estate comprising the
condominium has priority over the declaration, the parties foreclosing the lien or
encumbrance may, upon foreclosure, record an instrument excluding the real estate
subject to that lien or encumbrance from the condominium. [The provisions of
Page 264 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
]This subsection shall not apply to any common elements constituting a portion of
the real estate to the extent the common elements as described in and subject to the
declaration have been developed.
Section 169. KRS 382.850 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A conservation easement shall not be transferred by owners of property in which
there are outstanding subsurface rights without the prior written consent of the
owners of the subsurface rights.
(2) A conservation easement shall not operate to limit, preclude, delete or require
waivers for the conduct of coal mining operations, including the transportation of
coal, upon any part or all of adjacent or surrounding properties[; and shall not
operate to impair or restrict any right or power of eminent domain created by
statute, and all such rights and powers shall be exercisable as if the conservation
easement did not exist].
Section 170. KRS 453.260 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any costs [which are ]awarded as prescribed by statute, a court shall
award costs to any party which prevails by a final adjudication on the merits in any
of the following:
(a) A civil action brought by the Commonwealth against the party; and
(b) A civil action brought by the party against the Commonwealth to challenge
the assessment or collection of taxes.
(2) The court in its discretion may deny the award provided for in this section, or may
reduce the award, if it finds that:
(a) During the course of the proceeding the prevailing party unduly and
unreasonably protracted the final resolution of the matter;
(b) The reason that the party other than the Commonwealth has prevailed is an
intervening change in the applicable statutes, regulations, or case law;
(c) The prevailing party refused an offer of civil settlement which was at least as
Page 265 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
favorable to the party as the relief ultimately granted; or
(d) The position of the Commonwealth was substantially justified or a special
circumstance would make an award unjust; provided, however, that the
burden of proof of substantial justification or special circumstance shall rest
with the Commonwealth.
(3) A party may apply pursuant to the applicable Rules of Civil Procedure for an award
of attorney fees and other expenses authorized under this section and shall include
as part of the application evidence of the party's eligibility for the award and the
amount sought, including an itemized and attested statement from the attorneys and
experts stating the actual time expended in representing the party and the rate at
which the fees were computed. The party shall also allege in the[such] application
that the Commonwealth acted without substantial justification.
(4) The court shall base any award of fees as provided in this section on prevailing
market rates for the kind and quality of services furnished, except that:
(a) An expert is not eligible for compensation at a rate in excess of the prevailing
rate of compensation for similar experts paid by the Commonwealth;
(b) The award of attorney fees shall[may] not exceed the amount which the
prevailing party has paid or has agreed to pay the attorney or a maximum
amount of forty dollars ($40) per hour unless the court determines that an
increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability
of qualified attorneys for the proceeding involved, justifies a higher fee;
(c) An[No] award shall not be greater than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to each
party, except that an[no] award shall not be made to any party who
voluntarily intervenes in any such action.
(5) This section does not:
(a) Apply to an action arising from a proceeding before the Commonwealth in
which the role of the Commonwealth was to determine the eligibility or
Page 266 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
entitlement of an individual to a monetary benefit or its equivalent, or to
adjudicate a dispute or issue between private parties or to establish or fix a
rate. As used in this subsection, monetary benefit or its equivalent shall not
include a license, permit, charter, or similar instrument that the
Commonwealth may require to engage in a business, profession, or similar
activity;
(b) Apply to proceedings brought by the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS
Chapters 218A, 431 to 439, and 500 to 534;
(c) Apply to proceedings involving [eminent domain, ]foreclosure, collection of
judgment debts, or proceedings in which the Commonwealth is a nominal
party;
(d) Personally obligate any officer or employee of the Commonwealth for the
payment of an award entered under this section; and
(e) Apply to proceedings brought pursuant to KRS Chapters 209, 342, and 625.
Section 171. KRS 99.650 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each agency created under the terms of KRS 99.610 to 99.680 shall constitute a
public body corporate and politic, exercising public and essential governmental
functions, and shall have all of the powers necessary and convenient to carry out
and effectuate the purposes and provisions of KRS 99.610 to 99.680 including but
without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the following powers in addition to
other powers granted herein and by other statutory authority:
(a) To sue and be sued; to have a seal; to make and execute contracts and other
instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers;
(b) To make, and from time to time amend and repeal bylaws, rules, and
regulations not inconsistent with KRS 99.610 to 99.680, to carry into effect
the powers and purposes thereof, subject to approval, amendment, or
modification by the governing board;
Page 267 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(c) To select and appoint such officers, agents, counsel, and employees,
permanent and temporary, as it may require, and determine their
qualifications, duties, and compensation, subject, however, to the provisions
of its budget;
(d) Within the jurisdiction of the city in which it is established, and for the
purpose of developing a project area or areas, to purchase, lease, obtain option
upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any real or personal
property or any interest therein, together with any improvements thereon; to
clear any and all buildings, structures, or other improvements from any real
property so acquired; to renovate or rehabilitate any improvements to such
real property so acquired and to dispose of any personal property resulting
therefrom; to develop and construct residential housing for persons and
families of lower income; to sell, lease, exchange, subdivide, transfer, assign,
pledge, encumber by mortgage, deed of trust or otherwise, or otherwise to
dispose of any real or personal property or any interest therein at its fair value
for uses in accordance with the development plan, irrespective of the cost of
acquiring and preparing said property; to insure or provide for the insurance
of any real or personal property or operation of the agency against risks or
hazards; and pursuant to the provisions of KRS 99.610 to 99.680, to rent,
maintain, manage, operate, and repair such real property and any
improvements thereto;
(e) Within the jurisdiction of the city in which it is established, and for the
purpose of developing a project area or areas: to make or participate in the
making of construction, land development, mortgage, and rehabilitation loans
and to purchase or participate in the purchase of construction, land
development, mortgage, and rehabilitation loans for residential housing
projects, provided, however, that such loans shall be made only upon the
Page 268 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
determination by the agency that such loans are not otherwise available,
wholly or in part, from private lender upon reasonably equivalent terms and
conditions; to insure or reinsure construction, land development, mortgage,
and rehabilitation loans on residential housing projects provided, however,
that any such insurance or reinsurance shall be made only upon the
determination by the agency that such insurance or reinsurance is not
otherwise available wholly or in part from private insurers upon reasonably
equivalent terms and conditions; to make grants from appropriated funds, and
any other funds from any source available to the agency, to builders,
developers, and owners of residential housing for the development,
construction, rehabilitation, or maintenance of residential housing and such
facilities related thereto as the agency shall deem important for a proper living
environment, all on such terms and conditions as may be deemed appropriate
by the agency; to sell, at public or private sale, all or any part of any mortgage
or other instrument or document securing a construction land development, or
rehabilitation loan for residential housing projects of any type, appropriate to
the purpose of the agency; to consent, whenever it deems it necessary or
desirable in the fulfillment of its corporate purposes, to the modification of the
rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, or
any other terms, of any mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment,
construction or land development loan, rehabilitation loan, contract, or
agreement of any kind relating to residential housing projects to which the
agency is a party;
(f) Within a project area, to cause streets and highways to be laid out and graded,
and pavements or other road surfacing, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, storm
sewers, and public utilities of every kind to be improved, constructed, and
installed and to close any streets according to the development plan;
Page 269 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
(g) To invest any funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any funds not
required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which banks
or insurance companies may legally invest funds subject to their control; to
purchase its bonds at a price not more than the principal amount thereof and
accrued interest, all bonds so purchased to be canceled;
(h) To obligate lessees or purchasers of land acquired in a project: (1) to use such
land for the purpose designated in the development plan; (2) to begin the
building of specified improvements or renovation of existing improvement
within a period of time which the agency fixes as reasonable; and (3) to
comply with such other conditions as in the opinion of the agency are
necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS 99.610 to 99.680; the agency, by
provision in the contract, deed, or lease may make any of the purchaser's
obligations, covenants or conditions running with the land, whose breach shall
cause the fee to revert to the agency;
(i) To contract as, and to accept the obligations of, an owner of benefited
property under the terms of KRS 107.010 to 107.220, inclusive;
(j) To exercise all powers granted to governmental agencies under proposed
legislation which deals with the use of "tax increment" revenues and financing
of public purpose projects through the use thereof;
(k) To exercise all powers granted to governmental agencies by KRS 58.010 to
58.130[58.140], inclusive;
(l) To make periodic grants to reduce principal and interest payments on
mortgages or rentals payable by persons and families of low income;
(m) To rehabilitate, acquire, establish, and operate, lease, and sublease, residential
housing for persons and families of lower income and to enter into agreements
or other transactions with any federal, state, or local government agency for
the purpose of providing adequate living quarters for such persons and
Page 270 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
families and to contract to assume the rights, powers, duties, and obligations
of any local housing authority or similar agency of the federal, state, city, or
urban-county governments;
(n) To borrow from and to accept loans and grants from the federal, state, city, or
urban-county governments or any agency thereof, or from any sources, public
or private, for the purposes of KRS 99.610 to 99.680, and to pledge such
security as may be required, an agency, notwithstanding the provisions of any
other law, may include in any contract for financial assistance with the
federal, state, city, or urban-county government any conditions which the
federal, state, city, or urban-county government may attach to its financial aid
not inconsistent with the purposes of KRS 99.610 to 99.680; and
(o) To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers herein granted.
(2) Nothing contained in this section shall authorize such agency to construct any of the
buildings for residential, commercial, industrial, or other use contemplated by the
development plan, except as to the development and construction of residential
housing for persons and families of lower income and except insofar as any
industrial building may be authorized to be constructed by a lessee, on behalf of the
agency, under the provisions of KRS 103.200 to 103.285, inclusive.
Section 172. The following KRS sections are repealed:
39A.110 Compensation for property taken for temporary use -- Notice to owner of
property where title taken.
39A.120 Procedure when owner refuses to accept compensation fixed by Governor.
39A.130 Appeal from award of Board of Claims.
39A.140 Procedure for payment of compensation.
58.140 Condemnation.
65.460 Local legislative bodies denied power of eminent domain.
67.085 Condemnation for county purposes.
Page 271 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
74.090 Condemnation.
80.150 Condemnation authorized -- Procedure.
80.540 Power of condemnation -- Procedure.
82.180 Power of eminent domain.
96.080 Water company may condemn land and material.
96.178 Eminent domain.
96.547 Condemnation and eminent domain.
96.580 Proceedings to agree upon sale price of existing plant required before
condemnation or construction of competing plant.
96.590 Power of condemnation.
96.600 Procedure for condemnation -- Report of commissions -- Jury award --
Procedure when condemnor not a utility.
97.257 Power of condemnation for park purposes.
97.540 Condemnation of property by city for parks or cemeteries.
99.220 Certificate of approval of condemnation.
99.230 Method of condemnation -- Conveyance of property to corporation.
99.240 Kinds of evidence admissible on question of value of condemned property --
Expedition of proceedings -- Condemnation of property devoted to public use.
99.700 Legislative findings and policy.
99.705 Definitions for KRS 99.700 to 99.730.
99.710 Ordinance adopting provisions of state statutes on blighted or deteriorated areas
-- Vacant property review commission.
99.715 Acquisition and disposal of blighted property by local government.
99.720 Certification of blight deterioration -- Notice to owner demanding abatement.
99.725 Eminent domain proceedings by local government.
99.730 Acquisition by certain employees prohibited -- Disclosure of previous interest
required -- Payment under eminent domain proceedings.
Page 272 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
103.2451 Eminent domain power not conferred.
106.220 Power of eminent domain.
106.230 Procedure for condemnation.
107.390 Condemnation powers of board.
109.160 Condemnation of property.
148.121 Condemnation of land designated by United States for parks -- Procedure.
154.27-100 Construction of carbon dioxide transmission pipeline -- Proceedings for
condemnation under Eminent Domain Act -- Legislative determination of essential
public use.
154.50-323 Limitations on condemnation powers.
162.030 Condemnation of property for school purposes.
177.082 County attorney to represent Department of Highways in condemnation
proceedings -- Petition.
178.110 Condemnation of right-of-way -- Temporary roads.
178.120 Condemnation of land by fiscal court.
178.125 Condemnation of additional land adjacent to existing road -- Procedure.
180.030 Condemnation proceedings.
180.270 Condemnation of competing ferries.
181.620 Condemnation of property.
196.140 Condemnation by department.
201.070 Condemnation of property.
212.590 Power of condemnation.
220.310 Condemnation.
224.73-100 Sewage treatment company may condemn rights-of-way -- Approval
required -- Objections.
267.280 Condemnation of land not affected by drainage.
268.515 Power of condemnation.
Page 273 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
277.050 Corporation constructing or operating union station may condemn land.
278.502 Condemnation for pipelines and related facilities, including rights of ingress
and egress.
280.210 Condemnation of land for ferry purposes.
280.230 Grant of unclaimed or abandoned ferry privilege to another.
381.635 Right of condemnation of underground passageway to mine.
381.636 Findings required by commissioners in condemnation of underground
passageway -- Basis of compensation -- Immediate possession.
381.660 Condemnation for underground water pipes.
416.010 Institution of condemnation action by railroad.
416.100 Condemnation by county judge/executive for road purposes.
416.110 Condemnation by fiscal court for road purposes.
416.130 Dam and electric companies may make surveys and condemn property.
416.150 Condemnation by telephone companies.
416.210 Right of burial association or corporation to condemn land for cemetery --
Governmental approval needed -- Procedure.
416.220 Owner of real estate providing public sleeping accommodations and meals --
Condemnation for water supply -- Furnishing of water to owner of property
condemned.
416.230 Condemnation for oil or gas pipelines and related facilities -- Petition.
416.330 Limitation on right of ingress and egress for pipeline.
416.340 Water associations may condemn property.
416.350 Right of condemnation by owner to gain ingress or egress to public road.
416.360 Acquisition of real property necessary to locate or relocate public utility
facilities by public agency with power of eminent domain for public improvement
projects.
416.540 Definitions for KRS 416.540 to 416.670.
Page 274 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2377
416.550 Right to condemn.
416.570 Filing of petition.
416.580 Commissioners -- Appointment -- Report -- Compensation -- Vacancy --
Majority required -- Eminent domain proceedings.
416.590 Issuing summons.
416.600 Filing answer.
416.610 Trial by court on pleadings -- Interlocutory judgment.
416.620 Trial of exceptions to interlocutory judgment -- Questions as to compensation
to be tried by jury -- Appeals.
416.630 Money paid into court.
416.640 Conflicting claimants to condemned land.
416.650 Proceedings governed by Rules of Civil Procedure.
416.660 Standards for determining compensation -- Changes in value -- Taking date.
416.670 Limitations on condemnation powers -- Rights of current landowner.
416.675 Public use required -- No condemnation for indirect benefit -- Exemption.
416.680 Short title.
Page 275 of 275
XXXX 3/4/2026 9:40 AM Jacketed